Forbidden. by Tabitha Suzuma.
CHAPTER ONE.
Lochan.
I gaze at the smal, crisp, burned-out black husks scattered across the chipped
white paint of the windowsils. It is hard to believe that they were ever alive. I
wonder what it would be like to be shut up in this airless glass box, slowly
baked for two long months by the relentless sun, able to see the outdoors – the
wind shaking the green trees right there in front of you – hurling yourself
again and again at the invisible wal that seals you off from everything that is
real and alive and necessary until eventualy you succumb: scorched,
exhausted, overwhelmed by the impossibility of the task. At what point does a
fly give up trying to escape through a closed window – do its survival
instincts keep it going until it is physicaly capable of no more, or does it
eventualy learn after one crash too many that there is no way out? At what
point do you decide that enough is enough?
I turn my eyes away from the tiny carcasses and try to focus on the mass of
quadratic equations on the board. A thin film of sweat coats my skin, trapping
wisps of hair against my forehead, clinging to my school shirt. The sun has
been pouring through the industrial-sized windows al afternoon and I am
foolishly sitting in ful glare, half blinded by the powerful rays. The ridge of
the plastic chair digs painfuly into my back as I sit semi-reclined, one leg
stretched out, heel propped up against the low radiator along the wal. My shirt
cuffs hang loose around my wrists, stained with ink and grime. The empty
page stares up at me, painfuly white, as I work out equations in lethargic,
barely legible handwriting. The pen slips and slides in my clammy fingers; I
peel my tongue off my palate and try to swalow. I can’t. I have been sitting
like this for the best part of an hour, but I know that trying to find a more
comfortable position is useless. I linger over the sums, tilting the nib of my
pen so that it catches on the paper and makes a faint scratching sound – if I
finish too soon I wil have nothing to do but look at dead flies again. My head
hurts. The air stands heavy, pregnant with the perspiration of thirty-two
teenagers crammed into an overheated classroom. There is a weight on my
chest that makes it difficult to breathe. It is far more than this arid room, this
stale air. The weight descended on Tuesday, the moment I stepped through the
school gates, back to face another school year. The week has not yet ended
and already I feel as if I have been here for al eternity. Between these school
wals, time flows like cement. Nothing has changed. The people are stil the
same: vacuous faces, contemptuous smiles. My eyes slide past theirs as I
enter the classrooms and they gaze past me, through me. I am here but not
here. The teachers tick me off in the register but no one sees me, for I have
long perfected the art of being invisible.
There is a new English teacher – Miss Azley. Some bright young thing from
Down Under: huge frizzy hair held back by a rainbow-coloured headscarf,
tanned skin and massive gold hoops in her ears. She looks alarmingly out of
place in a school ful of tired, middle-aged teachers, faces etched with lines of
bitterness and disappointment. No doubt once, like this plump, chirpy Aussie,
they entered the profession ful of hope and vigour, determined to make a
difference, to heed Gandhi and be the change they wanted to see in the world.
Now, after decades of policies, inter-school red tape and crowd control, most
have given up and are awaiting early retirement – custard creams and tea in
the staffroom the highlight of their day. But the new teacher hasn’t had the
benefit of time. In fact she doesn’t look much older than some of the pupils in
the room. A bunch of guys erupt into a cacophony of wolf whistles until she
swings round to face them, disdainfuly staring them down so that they start to
look uncomfortable and glance away. Nonetheless, a stampede ensues when
she commands everyone to arrange the desks in a semicircle, and with al the
jostling, play-fighting, desk-slamming and chair-sliding, she is lucky nobody
gets injured. Despite the mayhem, Miss Azley appears unperturbed – when
everyone finaly settles down, she gazes around the scraggly circle and beams.
‘That’s better. Now I can see you al properly and you can al see me. I’l expect
you to have the classroom set up before I arrive in future, and don’t forget that
al the desks need to be returned to their places at the end of the lesson.
Anyone caught leaving before having done their bit wil take sole
responsibility for the furniture arrangements for a week. Do I make myself
clear?’ Her voice is firm but there appears to be no malice. Her grin suggests
she might even have a sense of humour. The grumbles and complaints from
the usual troublemakers are surprisingly muted.
She then announces that we are going to take turns introducing ourselves.
After expounding on her love of travel, her new dog and her previous career
in advertising, she turns to the girl on her right.
Surreptitiously I slide my watch round to the inside of my wrist and train my
eyes on the seconds flashing past. Al day I have been waiting for this – final
period – and now it is here I can hardly bear it. Al day I’ve been counting
down the hours, the lessons, until this one. Now, al that’s left is the minutes,
yet they seem interminable. I am doing sums in my head: calculating the
number of seconds before the last bel. With a start I realize that Rafi, the
dickhead to my right, is blabbering on about astrology again – almost
everyone in the room has had their turn now. When Rafi finaly shuts up about
stelar constelations, there is sudden silence. I look up to find Miss Azley
staring directly at me.
‘Pass.’ I examine my thumbnail and automaticaly mumble my usual response
without looking up.
But, to my horror, she doesn’t take the hint. Has she not read my file? She is
stil looking at me.
‘Few activities in my lessons are optional, I’m afraid,’she informs me.
There are sniggers from Jed’s group. ‘We’l be here al day then.’
‘Didn’t anyone tel you? He don’t speak English—’
‘Or any other language.’ Laughter.
‘Martian maybe!’
The teacher silences them with a look. ‘I’m afraid that’s not how things work
in my lessons.’
Another long silence folows. I fiddle with the corner of my notepad, the eyes
of the class scorching my face. The steady tick of the wal clock is drowned
out by the pounding of my heart.
‘Why don’t you start off by teling me your name?’ Her voice has softened
slightly. It takes me a moment to figure out why. Then I realize that my left
hand has stopped fiddling with the notepad and is now vibrating against the
empty page. I hurriedly slide my hand beneath the desk, mumble my name
and glance meaningfuly at my neighbour. He launches eagerly into his
monologue without giving the teacher time to protest, but I can see she has
backed down. She knows now. The pain in my chest fades to a dul ache and
my burning cheeks cool. The rest of the hour is taken up with a lively debate
about the merits of studying Shakespeare. Miss Azley does not invite me to
participate again.
When the last bel finaly shrieks its way through the building, the class
dissolves into chaos. I slam my textbook shut, stuff it in my bag, get up and
exit the room rapidly, diving into the home-time fray. Al along the main
corridor over-excited pupils are streaming out of doors to join the thick
current of people: I am bumped and buffeted by shoulders, elbows, bags, feet
. . . I make it down one staircase, then the next, and am almost across the
main hal before I feel a hand on my arm.
‘Whitely. A word.’
Freeland, my form tutor. I feel my lungs deflate.
The silver-haired teacher with the holow, lined face leads me into an empty
classroom, indicates a seat, then perches awkwardly on the corner of a
wooden desk.
‘Lochan, as I’m sure you are aware, this is a particularly important year for
you.’
The A-level lecture again. I give a slight nod, forcing myself to meet my
tutor’s gaze.
‘It’s also the start of a new academic year!’ Freeland announces brightly, as if
I needed reminding of that fact. ‘New beginnings. A fresh start . . . Lochan,
we know you don’t always find things easy, but we’re hoping for great things
from you this term. You’ve always exceled in written work, and that’s
wonderful, but now you’re in your final year we expect you to show us what
you’re capable of in other areas.’
Another nod. An involuntary glance towards the door. I’m not sure I like the
way this conversation is heading. Mr Freeland gives a heavy sigh. ‘Lochan, if
you want to get into UCL, you know it’s vital you start taking a more active
role in class . . .’
I nod again.
‘Do you understand what I’m saying here?’
I clear my throat. ‘Yes.’
‘Class participation. Joining in group discussions. Contributing to the lessons.
Actualy replying when asked a question. Putting your hand up once in a
while. That’s al we ask. Your grades have always been impeccable. No
complaints there.’
Silence.
My head is hurting again. How much longer is this going on for?
‘You seem distracted. Are you taking in what I’m saying?’
‘Yes.’
‘Good. Look, you have great potential and we would hate to see that go to
waste. If you need help again, you know we can arrange that . . .’
I feel the heat rise to my cheeks. ‘N-no. It’s OK. Realy. Thanks anyway.’ I
pick up my bag, sling the strap over my head and across my chest, and head
for the door.
‘Lochan,’ Mr Freeland cals after me as I walk out. ‘Just think about it.’
At last. I am heading towards Bexham, school rapidly fading behind me. It is
barely four o’clock and the sun is stil beating down, the bright white light
bouncing off the sides of cars which reflect it in disjointed rays, the heat
shimmering off the tarmac. The high street is al traffic, exhaust fumes,
braying horns, school kids and noise. I have been waiting for this moment
since being jolted awake by the alarm this morning, but now it is finaly here I
feel strangely empty. Like being a child again, clattering down the stairs to
find that Santa has forgotten to fil up our stockings; that Santa, in fact, is just
the drunk on the couch in the front room, lying comatose with three of her
friends. I have been focusing so hard on actualy getting out of school that I
seem to have forgotten what to do now I’ve escaped.
The elation I was expecting does not materialize and I feel lost, naked, as if
I’d been anticipating something wonderful but had suddenly forgotten what it
was. Walking down the street, weaving in and out of the crowds, I try to think
of something – anything – to look forward to.
In an effort to shake myself out of my strange mood, I jog across the cracked
paving stones past the litterlined gutters, the balmy September breeze lifting
the hair from the nape of my neck, my thin-soled sneakers moving
soundlessly over the pavement. I loosen my tie, puling the knot halfway down
my chest, and undo my top shirt buttons. It’s always good to stretch my legs
at the end of a long, dul day at Belmont, to dodge, skim and leap over the
smeared fruit and squashed veg left behind by the market stals. I turn the
corner into the familiar narrow road with its two long rows of smal, run-down
brick houses stretching gradualy uphil.
It’s the street I’ve lived in for the past five years. We only moved into the
council house after our father took himself off to Australia with his new wife
and the child support stopped. Before then, home had been a dilapidated
rented house on the other side of town, but in one of the nicer areas.
We were never wel-off, not with a poet for a father, but nonetheless, things
were easier in so many ways. But that was a long, long time ago. Home now
is number sixty-two, Bexham Road: a two-storey, three-bedroomed, grey
stuccoed cube, thickly sandwiched in a long line of others, with Coke bottles
and beer cans sprouting amongst the weeds between the broken gate and the
faded orange door.
The road is so narrow that the cars, with their boarded-up windows or dented
fenders, have to park with two wheels on the kerb, making it easier to walk
down the centre of the street than on the pavement. Kicking a crushed plastic
bottle out of the gutter, I dribble it along, the slap of my shoes and the grate of
broken plastic against tarmac echoing around me, soon joined by the
cacophony of a yapping dog, shouts from a children’s footbal game and
reggae blasting out of an open window. My bag bounces and rattles against
my thigh and I feel some of my malaise begin to dissipate. As I jog past the
footbalers, a familiar figure overshoots the goalpost markers and I exchange
the plastic bottle for the bal, easily dodging the pint-sized boys in their
oversized Arsenal T-shirts as they folow me up the road, yelping in protest.
The blond firework dives towards me: a tow-headed little hippy with hair
down to his shoulders, his once white school shirt now streaked with dirt and
hanging over torn grey trousers. He manages to get ahead of me, running
backwards as fast as he can, shouting franticaly,
‘To me, Loch, to me, Loch. Pass it to me!’
With a laugh I do, and whooping in triumph, my eight-year-old brother grabs
the bal and runs back to his mates, yeling, ‘I got it off him, I got it off him!
Did you see?’
I slam into the relative cool of the house and sag back against the front door
to catch my breath, brushing the damp hair off my forehead. Straightening up,
I pick my way down the halway, my feet automaticaly nudging aside the
assortment of discarded blazers, book bags and school shoes that litter the
narrow corridor. In the kitchen I find Wila up on the counter, trying to reach a
box of Cheerios from the cupboard. She freezes when she sees me, one hand
on the box, her blue eyes wide with guilt beneath her fringe. ‘Maya forgot my
snack today!’
I lunge towards her with a growl, grabbing her round the waist with one arm
and swinging her upside down as she squeals with a mixture of terror and
delight, her long golden hair fanning out beneath her. Then I dump her
unceremoniously onto a kitchen chair and slap down the cereal box, milk
bottle, bowl and spoon.
‘Half a bowlful, no more,’ I warn her with a raised finger. ‘We’re having an
early dinner tonight –
I’ve got a ton of homework to do.’
‘When?’ Wila sounds unconvinced, scattering sugarcoated hoops across the
chipped oak table that is the centrepiece of our messy kitchen. Despite the
revised set of House Rules that Maya taped to the fridge door, it is clear that
Tiffin hasn’t touched the overflowing bins in days, that Kit hasn’t even begun
washing the breakfast dishes piled up in the sink, and that Wila has once
again mislaid her miniature broom and has only succeeded in adding to the
crumbs littering the floor.
‘Where’s Mum?’ I ask.
‘Getting ready.’
I empty my lungs with a sigh and leave the kitchen, taking the narrow wooden
stairs two at a time, ignoring Mum’s greeting, searching for the only person I
realy feel like talking to. But when I spot the open door to her empty room, I
remember that she is stuck at some afterschool thing tonight and my chest
deflates. Instead I return to the familiar sound of Magic FM blasting out of the
open bathroom door.
My mother is leaning over the basin towards the smeared, cracked mirror,
putting the finishing touches to her mascara and brushing invisible lint off the
front of her tight silver dress. The air is thick with the stench of hairspray and
perfume. As she sees me appear behind her reflection, her brightly painted
lips lift and part in a smile of apparent delight. ‘Hey, beautiful boy!’
She turns down the radio, swings round to face me and holds out an arm for a
kiss. Without moving from the doorway, I kiss the air, an involuntary scowl
etched between my brows.
She begins to laugh. ‘Look at you – back in your uniform and almost as
scruffy as the kiddies!
You need a haircut, sweetie. Oh dear, what’s with the stormy look?’
I sag against the doorframe, trailing my blazer on the floor. ‘It’s the third time
this week, Mum,’ I protest wearily.
‘I know, I know, but I couldn’t possibly miss this. Davey finaly signed the
contract for the new restaurant and wants to go out and celebrate!’ She opens
her mouth in an exclamation of delight and, when my expression fails to thaw,
swiftly changes the subject. ‘How was your day, sweetie pie?’
I manage a wry smile. ‘Great, Mum. As usual.’
‘Wonderful!’she exclaims, choosing to ignore the sarcasm in my voice. If
there’s one thing my mother excels at, it’s minding her own business. ‘Only a
year now – not even that – and you’l be free of school and al that siliness.’
Her smile broadens. ‘And soon you’l finaly turn eighteen and realy wil be the
man of the house!’
I lean my head back against the doorjamb. The man of the house. She’s been
caling me that since I was twelve, ever since Dad left.
Turning back to the mirror, she presses her breasts together beneath the top of
her low-cut dress.
‘How do I look? I got paid today and treated myself to a shopping spree.’ She
flashes me a mischievous grin as if we were conspirators in this little
extravagance. ‘Look at these gold sandals.
Aren’t they darling?’
I am unable to return the smile. I wonder how much of her monthly wage has
already been spent.
Retail therapy has been an addiction for years now. Mum is desperate to cling
onto her youth, a time when her beauty turned heads in the street, but her
looks are rapidly fading, face prematurely aged by years of hard living.
‘You look great,’ I answer roboticaly.
Her smile fades a little. ‘Lochan, come on, don’t be like this. I need your help
tonight. Dave is taking me somewhere realy special – you know the place
that’s just opened on Stratton Road opposite the cinema?’
‘OK, OK. It’s fine, have fun.’ With considerable effort I erase the frown and
manage to keep the resentment out of my voice. There is nothing particularly
wrong with Dave. Of the long string of men my mother has been involved
with ever since Dad left her for one of his coleagues, Dave has been the most
benign. Nine years her junior and the owner of the restaurant where she now
works as head waitress, he is currently separated from his wife. But like each
of Mum’s flings, he appears to possess the same strange power al men have
over her, the ability to transform her into a giggling, flirting, fawning girl,
desperate to spend her hard-earned cash on unnecessary presents for her
‘man’ and tight-fitting, revealing outfits for herself. Tonight it is barely five
o’clock and already her face is flushed with anticipation as she tarts herself up
for this dinner, no doubt having spent the last hour fretting over what to wear.
Puling back her freshly highlighted blonde perm, she is now experimenting
with some exotic hairdo and asking me to fasten her fake diamond necklace –
a present from Dave – that she swears is real. Her curvy figure barely fits into
a dress her sixteen-year-old daughter wouldn’t be seen dead in, and the
comment ‘mutton dressed as lamb’, regularly overheard from neighbours’
front gardens, echoes in my ears.
I close my bedroom door behind me and lean against it for a few moments,
relishing this smal patch of carpet that is my own. It never used to be a
bedroom, just a smal storage room with a bare window, but I managed to
squeeze a camp bed in here three years ago when I realized that sharing a
bunk bed with siblings had some serious drawbacks. It is one of the few
places where I can be completely alone: no pupils with knowing eyes and
mocking smirks; no teachers firing questions at me; no shouting, jostling
bodies. And there is stil a smal oasis of time before our mother goes out on
her date and dinner has to get underway and the arguments over food and
homework and bedtime begin.
I drop my bag and blazer on the floor, kick off my shoes and sit down on the
bed with my back against the wal, knees drawn up in front of me. My usualy
tidy space bears al the frantic signs of a slept-through alarm: clock knocked to
the floor, bed unmade, chair covered with discarded clothes, floor littered
with books and papers, spiled from the piles on my desk. The flaking wals are
bare save for a smal snapshot of the seven of us, taken during our final annual
holiday in Blackpool two months before Dad left. Wila, stil a baby, is on
Mum’s lap, Tiffin’s face is smeared with chocolate ice cream, Kit is hanging
upside down off the bench, and Maya is trying to yank him back up. The only
faces clearly visible are Dad’s and mine – we have our arms slung across each
other’s shoulders, grinning broadly at the camera. I rarely look at the photo,
despite having rescued it from Mum’s bonfire. But I like the feel of it being
close by: a reminder that those happier times were not simply a figment of my
imagination.
CHAPTER TWO.
Maya.
My key jams in the lock again. I curse, then kick the door in my usual
manner. The moment I step out of the late afternoon sunshine and into the
darkened halway, I sense that things are already a little wild. Predictably the
front room is a tip – crisp packets, book bags, school letters and abandoned
homework strewn across the carpet. Kit is eating Cheerios straight from the
box, trying to throw the odd one across the room into Wila’s open mouth.
‘Maya, Maya, look what Kit can do!’ Wila cals excitedly to me as I shed my
blazer and tie in the doorway. ‘He can get them into my mouth al the way
from over there!’
Despite the mess of cereal trampled into the carpet, I can’t help smiling. My
little sister is the cutest five-year-old in history. Her dimpled cheeks, flushed
pink with exertion, are stil gently rounded with baby chubbiness, her face lit
with a soft innocence. Since losing her front teeth she has taken to poking the
tip of her tongue through the gap when she smiles. Her waist-length hair
hangs down her back, straight and fine like gold silk, the colour matched by
the tiny studs in her ears. Beneath an overgrown fringe, her large eyes wear a
permanently startled look, the colour of deep water. She has exchanged her
uniform for a flowery pink summer dress, her current favourite, and is
hopping from foot to foot, delighted by her teenage brother’s antics.
I turn to Kit with a grin. ‘Looks like the two of you have been having a very
productive afternoon.
I hope you remember where we keep the vacuum cleaner.’
Kit responds by throwing a handful of cereal in Wila’s direction. For a
moment I think he is just going to ignore me, but then he declares, ‘It’s not a
game, it’s target practice. Mum won’t care – she’s out with Lover Boy again
tonight, and by the time she makes it home she’l be too wasted to notice.’
I open my mouth to object to Kit’s choice of words, but Wila is egging him
on, and seeing that he is neither sulking nor arguing, I decide to let it pass,
and colapse on the couch. My thirteen-year-old brother has changed in recent
months: a summer growth spurt has accentuated his already skinny frame, his
sandy hair has been cut short to show off the fake diamond stud in his ear and
his hazel eyes have hardened. Something has shifted in his manner too. The
child is stil there but buried beneath an unfamiliar toughness: the change
around the eyes, the defiant set of the jaw, the harsh, mirthless laugh al give
him an alien, jagged edge. Yet during brief, genuine moments like these,
when he is just having fun, the mask slips a little and I see my kid brother
again.
‘Is Lochan doing dinner tonight?’ I ask.
‘Obviously.’
‘Dinner . . .’ Wila’s hand flies to her mouth in alarm. ‘Lochie said one last
warning.’
‘He was bluffing—’ Kit tries to forestal her, but she is off down the corridor
to the kitchen at a galop, always anxious to please. I sit up on the couch,
yawning, and Kit starts flicking cereal at my forehead.
‘Watch it. That’s al we’ve got for the morning and I don’t see you eating it off
the floor.’ I stand up. ‘Come on. Let’s go see what Lochan’s cooked up.’
‘Fucking pasta – what else does he ever make?’ Kit tosses the open cereal box
onto the armchair, spiling half its contents across the cushions, his good mood
evaporating in a heartbeat.
‘Wel, perhaps you could start learning how to cook. Then we could al three
take turns.’
Kit shoots me a condescending look and stalks ahead of me into the kitchen.
‘Out, Tiffin. I said, get the bal out of the room.’ Lochan has a boiling
saucepan in one hand and is trying to manhandle Tiffin through the door with
the other.
‘Goal!’ Tiffin yels, shooting the bal under the table. I catch it, toss it into the
corridor and grab Tiffin as he tries to dive past me.
‘Help, help, she’s strangling me!’ he yels, miming asphyxiation.
I manoeuvre him onto his chair. ‘Sit!’
At the sight of food he complies, grabbing his knife and fork and beating out
a drum rol on the table. Wila laughs and picks up her cutlery to copy.
‘Don’t . . .’ I warn her.
Her smile fades, and for a moment she looks chastened. I feel a pang of guilt.
Wila is loving and biddable, whereas Tiffin is always bursting with energy
and mischief. As a consequence she is always witnessing her brother get away
with murder. Moving quickly round the kitchen, I set out the plates, pour the
water, return the cooking ingredients to their respective homes.
‘OK, tuck in, everyone.’ Lochan has dished up. Four plates, one pink Barbie
bowl. Pasta with cheese, pasta with cheese and sauce, pasta with sauce but no
cheese, broccoli – which neither Kit nor Tiffin wil touch – craftily hidden
round the sides.
‘Helo, you.’ I catch his sleeve before he heads back to the cooker, and smile.
‘You OK?’
‘I’ve been home two hours and they’ve already gone crazy.’ He shoots me a
look of exaggerated despair and I laugh.
‘Mum left already?’
He nods. ‘Did you remember the milk?’
‘Yeah, but we need to do a proper shop.’
‘I’l go after school tomorrow.’ Lochan spins round in time to catch Tiffin
leaping for the door.
‘Oi!’
‘I’m done, I’m done! I’m not hungry any more!’
‘Tiffin, would you just sit down at the table like a normal person and eat your
meal?’ Lochan’s voice begins to rise.
‘But Ben and Jamie are only alowed out for another half-hour!’ Tiffin yels in
protest, his face scarlet beneath his mop of tow-coloured hair.
‘It’s six-thirty! You’re not going back outside tonight!’
Tiffin throws himself back into his chair in fury, arms folded, knees drawn up.
‘That’s so not fair! I hate you!’
Lochan wisely ignores Tiffin’s antics and instead turns his attention to Wila,
who has given up trying to use a fork and is eating the spaghetti with her
fingers, tilting back her head and sucking in each strand from the bottom.
‘Look,’ Lochan shows her. ‘You wind it round like this . . .’
‘But it keeps faling off!’
‘Just try a bit at a time.’
‘I can’t,’she moans. ‘Lochie, cut it up for me?’
‘Wila, you need to learn—’
‘But fingers is easier!’
Kit’s place remains empty as he works his way round the kitchen, opening
and slamming cupboard doors.
‘Let me save you some time – the only food we’ve got left is on the table,’
Lochan says, picking up his fork. ‘And I haven’t put any arsenic in it, so it’s
unlikely to kil you.’
‘Great, so she’s forgotten to leave us any money for Asda again? Wel, of
course, it’s al right for her – Lover Boy’s taking her to the Ritz.’
‘His name’s Dave,’ Lochan points out from behind a forkful of food. ‘Caling
him that doesn’t make you sound in any way cool.’
Swalowing my mouthful, I manage to catch Lochan’s eye and give a barely
perceptible shake of the head. I sense Kit is gearing up for an argument, and
Lochan, usualy so adept at sidestepping confrontation, looks tired and on edge
and seems to be steering blindly for a head-on colision tonight.
Kit slams the last cupboard with such force that everyone jumps. ‘What
makes you think I’m trying to sound cool? I’m not the one stuck in an apron
because his mother is too busy spreading her legs for—’
Lochan is out of his chair in a flash. I lunge for him and miss. He launches
himself at Kit and grabs him by the colar, slamming him up against the fridge.
‘You speak like that in front of the little ones again and I’l—’
‘You’l what?’ Kit has his older brother’s hand round his throat, and despite
the cocky smirk, I recognize a glimmer of fear in his eyes. Lochan has never
threatened him physicaly before, but in recent months their relationship has
deteriorated. Kit has begun to resent Lochan more and more deeply for
reasons I struggle to understand. Yet, despite his initial shock, he somehow
manages to retain the upper hand with the mocking expression, the look of
condescension for the brother nearly five years his senior.
Suddenly Lochan seems to realize what he is doing. He lets go of Kit and
springs back, stunned by his own outburst.
Kit straightens up, a slow sneer creeping onto his lips. ‘Yeah, that’s what I
thought. Gutless. Just like at school.’
He has gone too far. Tiffin is silent, munching slowly, his eyes wary. Wila is
gazing anxiously at Lochan, tugging nervously at her ear, her meal forgotten.
Lochan is staring at the now empty doorway through which Kit has just
departed. He wipes his hands on his jeans and takes a long, steadying breath
before turning round to face Tiffin and Wila. ‘Hey, come on, guys, let’s finish
up.’ His voice quavers with false cheer.
Tiffin eyes him dubiously. ‘Were you gonna punch him?’
‘No!’ Lochan looks deeply shocked. ‘No, of course not, Tiff. I’d never hurt
Kit. I’d never hurt any of you. Jeez!’
Tiffin returns to his meal, unconvinced. Wila says nothing, solemnly sucking
each finger clean, silent resentment radiating from her eyes.
Lochan doesn’t return to his seat. Instead he appears at a loss, chewing the
corner of his lip, his face working. I lean back in my chair and reach for his
arm. ‘He was just trying to wind you up as usual . . .’
He doesn’t respond. Instead, he takes another deep breath before glancing at
me and saying,
‘D’you mind finishing this up?’
‘Course not.’
‘Thanks.’ He forces a reassuring smile before leaving the room. Moments
later I hear his bedroom door close.
I manage to persuade Tiffin and Wila to finish their food, and then put
Lochan’s barely touched plate in the fridge. Kit can have the stale bread on
the counter for al I care. I give Wila a bath and force a protesting Tiffin to
take a shower. After vacuuming the front room, I decide that an early bedtime
would do them no harm and studiously ignore Tiffin’s furious protests about
the lingering evening sunlight. As I kiss them in their bunks, Wila puts her
arms round my neck and holds me close for a moment.
‘Why does Kit hate Lochie?’she whispers.
I draw back a little in order to look into her eyes. ‘Sweetheart, Kit doesn’t
hate Lochie,’ I say carefuly. ‘Kit’s just in a bad mood these days.’
Her deep blue eyes flood with relief. ‘So they love each other realy?’
‘Of course they do. And everybody loves you.’ I kiss her again on the
forehead. ‘Nighty-night.’
I confiscate Tiffin’s Gameboy and leave the two of them listening to an audio
book, then make my way down to the far end of the corridor, where a ladder
leads up to the box-sized attic, and shout up at Kit to turn the music down.
Last year, after one pitiful complaint after another about having to share a
room with his younger siblings, Kit was helped by Lochan to clear the
previously unused tiny attic of al the junk left there by former owners. Even
though the space is too smal to stand up in properly, it is Kit’s lair, the private
den in which he spends most of his time when at home, its sloping wals
painted black and plastered with rockchicks, the dry, creaking floorboards
covered with a Persian rug Lochan unearthed from some charity shop. Cut off
from the rest of the house by a steep ladder that Tiffin and Wila have been
strictly forbidden to climb, it is the perfect hideaway for someone like Kit.
The music fades to a monotonous bass thud as I finaly close the door to my
room and start my homework.
The house is quiet at last. I hear the audio book come to an end and the air
fals silent. My alarm clock reads twenty past eight, and the golden dusk of the
Indian summer is fading rapidly. Night is faling, the streetlamps coming on
one after the other, casting a funereal light on the exercise book in front of
me. I finish off a comprehension exercise and find myself staring at my own
reflection in the darkened window. On an impulse I stand up and walk out
onto the landing.
My knock is tentative. Had it been me, I’d have probably stalked out of the
house, but Lochan isn’t like that. He’s far too mature, far too sensible. Never
once in al the nights since Dad left has he stormed out – not even when Tiffin
plastered his hair down with treacle then refused to have a bath, or when Wila
sobbed for hours on end because someone had given her dol a Mohican.
However, things have been going rapidly downhil lately. Even before his
adolescent metamorphosis, Kit was prone to throwing a tantrum whenever
Mum went out for the evening – the school counselor claimed that he blamed
himself for Dad leaving, that he stil harboured the hope that he might return
and therefore felt deeply threatened by anyone trying to take his father’s
place.
Personaly I always suspected it was something far simpler: Kit doesn’t like
the little ones getting al the attention for being smal and cute and Lochan and
I teling everyone what to do, while he’s stuck in noman’s-land, the archetypal
middle child with no partner in crime. Now that Kit has gained the necessary
respect at school by joining a gang who sneak out of the gates to smoke weed
in the local park at lunch time, he bitterly resents the fact that at home he is
stil considered just one of the children. When Mum’s out, which is
increasingly often, Lochan is the one in charge, the way it’s always been;
Lochan, the one she dumps on whenever she has to work overtime or fancies
a night out with Dave or the girls.
There is no answer to my knock, but when I wander downstairs I find Lochan
asleep on the couch in the front room. A thick textbook rests against his chest,
its pages splayed, and sheets of scrawled, spidery calculations litter the carpet.
Uncurling his fingers from the book, I gather his things into a pile on the
coffee table, pul the blanket off the back of the couch, and lay it over him.
Then I sit in the armchair and draw up my legs, resting my chin on my knees,
watching him sleep beneath the soft orange glow of the streetlamps faling
through the curtainless window.
Before there was anything, there was Lochan. When I look back on my life, al
sixteen and a half years of it, Lochan was always there. Walking to school by
my side, propeling me in a shopping troley across an empty car park at
breakneck speed, coming to my rescue in the playground after I’d caused a
class uprising by caling Little Miss Popular ‘stupid’. I stil remember him
standing there, fists clenched, an unusualy fierce look on his face, chalenging
al the boys to a fight despite being vastly outnumbered. And I suddenly
realized that, so long as I had Lochan, nothing and no one could ever harm
me. But I was eight then. I’ve grown up since those days. Now I know that
Lochan won’t always be here, won’t be able to protect me for ever. Although
he’s applying to study at University Colege, London, and says he wil continue
to live at home, he could stil change his mind and see that this is his chance to
escape. Never before have I imagined my life without him – like this house,
he is my only point of reference in this difficult existence, this unstable and
frightening world. The thought of him leaving home fils me with a terror so
strong it takes my breath away. I feel like one of those seaguls covered with
oil from a spil, drowning in a black tar of fear.
Asleep, Lochan looks like a boy again – ink-stained fingers, creased grey Tshirt, scuffed jeans and bare feet. People say there is a strong family
resemblance – I don’t see it. For a start he is the only one of us with bright
green eyes, as clear as cut glass. His shaggy hair is tar-black, covering the
nape of his neck and reaching his eyes. His arms are stil tanned from summer,
and even in the half-light I can make out the faint outline of his biceps. He is
beginning to develop an athletic look. He hit puberty late, and for a while
even I was taler than he was, something I teased him about mercilessly, caling
him ‘my little brother’, back when I thought that kind of thing funny. He took
it al on the chin of course, the way he does everything.
But recently things have begun to change. Despite the fact that he is painfuly
shy, most of the girls in my year fancy him – filing me with a conflicting
mixture of annoyance and pride. Yet he is stil unable to talk to his peers,
rarely smiles outside these wals, and always, always wears the same distant,
haunted look, a hint of sadness in his eyes. At home, however, when the little
ones aren’t being too difficult or when we are joking together and he feels
relaxed, he sometimes displays an entirely different side: a love of mischief, a
dimple-cheeked grin, a self-deprecating sense of humour.
But even during these brief moments, I feel he is hiding a darker, unhappier
part of himself – the part that struggles to cope at school, in the outside world;
a world where for some reason he has never felt at peace.
A car backfires across the street, jolting me out of my thoughts. Lochan lets
out a smal cry and struggles up, disorientated.
‘You fel asleep,’ I inform him with a smile. ‘I think we could market
trigonometry as a new treatment for insomnia.’
‘Shit. What time is it?’ He appears panicked for a moment, pushing back the
blanket and swinging his feet to the floor, running his fingers through his hair.
‘Just gone nine.’
‘What about—’
‘Tiffin and Wila are fast asleep and Kit’s busy being an angry teenager in his
room.’
‘Oh.’ He relaxes slightly, rubbing his eyes with the heels of his hands and
blinking sleepily down at the floor.
‘You look whacked. Perhaps you should forget homework for tonight and go
to bed.’
‘No, I’m OK.’ He gestures towards the pile of books on the coffee table.
‘Anyway, gotta finish revising that lot before the test tomorrow.’ He reaches
out to switch on the lamp, casting a smal circle of light on the floor.
‘You should have told me you had a test. I’d have done dinner!’
‘Wel, you did everything else.’ There is an awkward pause. ‘Thanks for – for
sorting them out.’
‘No problem.’ I yawn, shifting sideways in the armchair to hang my legs over
the armrest, and comb the hair away from my face. ‘Perhaps from now on we
should just leave Kit’s meal on a tray at the bottom of the ladder. We can cal it
room service. Then we might al get a bit of peace.’
The hint of a smile touches his lips, but then he turns away to stare out of the
blank window and silence descends.
I take a sharp breath. ‘He was being a little shit tonight, Loch. That stuff about
school . . .’
He seems to freeze. I can almost see the muscles tighten beneath his T-shirt as
he sits sideways on the couch, an arm slung over the back, one foot on the
ground, the other tucked beneath him. ‘I’d better finish this . . .’
I recognize my cue. I want to say something to him, something along the lines
of: It’s all an act.
Everyone else is pretending anyway. Kit may have surrounded himself with a
group of kids who spit in the face of authority, but they’re just as scared as
everyone else. They make fun of others and pick on loners just so they can
belong. And I’m not much better. I might appear confident and chatty, but I
spend most of my time laughing at jokes I don’t find funny, saying things I
don’t really mean – because at the end of the day that’s what we’re all trying
to do: fit in, one way or another, desperately trying to pretend we’re all the
same.
‘Goodnight then. Don’t work too late.’
‘Night, Maya.’ He smiles suddenly, dimples forming at the corners of his
mouth. But when I pause in the doorway, looking back at him, he is flicking
through a textbook, his teeth chafing at the permanent, painfuly red sore
beneath his bottom lip.
You think no one else understands, I want to tel him, but you’re wrong. I do.
You’re not alone.
CHAPTER THREE.
Lochan.
Our mother looks raddled in the harsh grey morning light. She nurses a mug
of coffee in one hand, a cigarette in the other. Her bleached hair is a tangled
mess, and smudged eyeliner has leaked into black halfmoons beneath her
bloodshot eyes. Her pink silk robe is knotted over a skimpy nightdress – her
disheveled appearance a clear sign that Dave did not stay over last night. In
fact I don’t even remember hearing them come in. On the rare occasions they
come back to this house, there is the bang of the front door, muffled laughter,
keys being dropped on the doorstep, loud shushes and more thuds, folowed by
cackling laughter as he attempts to give her a piggyback up the stairs. The
others have learned to sleep through it, but I have always been a light sleeper
and their slurred voices force me to acknowledge consciousness, even as I
press my eyelids closed and try to ignore the grunts and squeals and the
rhythmic squeak of bedsprings from the main bedroom.
Tuesday is Mum’s day off, which means that for once she gets to sort out
breakfast and take the little ones to school. But it’s already quarter to eight,
Kit has yet to appear, Tiffin is eating breakfast in his underwear and Wila has
no clean socks and is bemoaning the fact to anyone who wil listen. I fetch
Tiffin’s uniform and force him to get dressed at the table since Mum seems
unable to do much more than sip coffee and chain-smoke at the window.
Maya goes off in search of Wila’s socks and I hear her pound on Kit’s door
and yel something about the consequences of getting another late slip.
Mum finishes her last cigarette and comes to sit with us at the table, talking
about plans for the weekend that I know wil never materialize. Both Wila and
Tiffin start chatting away at once, delighted by the attention, their breakfast
forgotten, and I feel my muscles tense.
‘You’ve gotta be out of the house in five minutes and that breakfast needs to
be eaten before then.
’
Mum catches me by the wrist as I pass. ‘Lochie-Loch, sit down for a moment.
I never get a chance to talk to you. We never sit down like this – as a family.’
With a monumental effort I swalow my frustration. ‘Mum, we’ve got to be at
school in fifteen minutes and I have a maths test first thing.’
‘Oh, so serious!’ She puls me down into the chair beside her and cups my
chin in her hand.
‘Look at you, so pale and stressy – always studying. When I was your age I
was the most beautiful girl at school – all the guys wanted to go out with me.
I used to cut class and spend al day in the park with one of my boyfriends!’
She winks conspiratorialy at Tiffin and Wila, who both burst into paroxysms
of giggles.
‘Did you kiss your boyfriend on the mouth?’ Tiffin enquires with an evil
snicker.
‘Oh yes, and not just on the mouth.’ She winks at me, running her fingers
through her tangled hair with a girlish smile.
‘Yuck!’ Wila swings her legs violently under the table, throwing back her
head in disgust.
‘Did you lick his tongue,’ Tiffin persists, ‘like they do on TV?’
‘Tiffin!’ I snap. ‘Stop being disgusting and finish your breakfast.’
Tiffin reluctantly picks up his spoon, but his face breaks into a grin as Mum
quickly nods her head at him with a mischievous smile.
‘Aargh, that’s gross!’ He starts making gagging noises just as Maya comes in,
trying to coax Kit through the doorway.
‘What’s gross?’she enquires as Kit slinks grumpily into his chair and drops
his head to the table with a thud.
‘You don’t want to know,’ I begin quickly, but Tiffin fils her in anyway.
Maya puls a face. ‘Mum!’
‘Yeah, wel, that little story realy kick-started my appetite,’ Kit snaps irritably.
‘You’ve got to eat something,’ Maya insists. ‘You’re stil growing.’
‘No he’s not, he’s shrinking!’ Tiffin guffaws.
‘Shut up, you little shit.’
‘Loch! Kit caled me a little shit!’
‘Sit down, Maya,’ Mum says with a gooey smile. ‘Ah, look at al of you, so
smart in your uniforms. And here we are having breakfast al together as a
family!’
Maya gives her a tight smile as she butters toast and places it on Kit’s plate. I
feel my pulse begin to rise. I can’t leave until they’re al ready or there’s a
good chance that Kit wil cut school again and Mum wil keep Tiffin and Wila
at home until mid-morning. And I can’t be late. Not because of the test
. . . because I can’t be the last one to walk into the classroom.
‘We’ve got to go,’ I inform Maya, who is stil trying to persuade breakfast into
Kit as he remains slumped with his head on his arms.
‘Oh, why are my bunnies in such a rush this morning!’ Mum exclaims.
‘Maya, wil you get your brother to relax? Look at him . . .’ She rubs my
shoulder, her hand like a burn through the fabric of my shirt. ‘So tense.’
‘Loch’s got a test and we realy are going to be late if we don’t make a move,’
Maya informs her gently.
Mum stil has her other hand clenched tightly round my wrist, preventing me
from getting up to grab my usual cup of coffee. ‘You’re not honestly nervous
about a stupid test, are you, Loch?
Because there are far more important things in life, you know. The last thing
you want to do is turn into a nerd like your father, nose always buried in a
book, living like a tramp just to get one of those useless PhD thingies. And
look where his posh Cambridge education got him – a flipping poet, for
chrissakes! He’d have earned more money sweeping the streets!’ She gives a
derisive snort.
Raising his head suddenly, Kit asks sneeringly, ‘When’s Lochan ever failed a
test? He’s just afraid of coming in late and—’
Maya threatens to stuff the toast down his throat. I disengage myself from
Mum’s clasp and rattle through the front room, colecting blazer, walet, keys,
bag. I bump into Maya in the halway and she tels me to go ahead, she’l make
sure Mum leaves on time with the little ones and Kit gets to school. I squeeze
her arm in thanks and then I’m off, running down the empty street.
I reach school with seconds to spare. The huge concrete building rises up
before me, spreading its tentacles outwards, sucking in the other ugly, smaler
blocks with barren walkways and endless tunnels. I make it to the maths room
just before the teacher shuffles in and starts handing out the papers. After my
half-mile sprint I can hardly see – red blotches pulsate before my eyes. Mr
Morris stops by my desk and my breath catches in my throat.
‘Are you al right, Lochan? You look as if you’ve just run a marathon.’
I nod quickly and take the paper from him without looking up.
The test begins and silence descends. I love tests. I have always loved tests,
exams of any kind.
As long as they are written. As long as they take up the whole lesson. As long
as I don’t have to speak or look up from my paper until the bel goes.
I don’t know when it started – this thing – but it’s growing, muffling me,
suffocating me like poison ivy. I grew into it. It grew into me. We blurred at
the edges, became an amorphous, seeping, crawling thing. Sometimes I
manage to distract myself, trick myself out of dweling on it, convince myself
that I’m OK. At home, for instance, with my family, I can be myself, be
normal again. Until last night. Until the inevitable happened; until news finaly
filtered down the Belmont grapevine that Lochan Whitely was a socialy inept
weirdo. Even though Kit and I never realy got along, the realization that he is
ashamed of me takes hold: a horrible, clutching, sinking feeling in my chest.
Just thinking about it makes the floor tilt beneath my chair. I feel as if I am on
a slippery slope and al I can do is plummet downwards. I know al about being
ashamed of a family member – the number of times I’ve wished my mother
would act her age in public, if not in private. It’s horrible, being ashamed of
someone you care about; it eats away at you. And if you let it get to you, if
you give up the fight and surrender, eventualy that shame turns to hate.
I don’t want Kit to be ashamed of me. I don’t want him to hate me, even if I
feel like I hate him sometimes. But that little messed-up kid ful of anger and
resentment is stil my brother; he’s stil family.
Family: the most important thing of al. My siblings may drive me crazy at
times but they are my blood.
They’re al I’ve known. My family is me. They are my life. Without them I
walk the planet alone.
The rest are al outsiders, strangers. They never metamorphose into friends.
And even if they did, even if I found, by some miracle, a way of connecting to
someone outside my family – how could they possibly compare to those who
speak my language and know who I am without having to be told? Even if I
were able to meet their eyes, even if I were able to speak without the words
cluttering up my throat, unable to surface, even if their gaze didn’t burn holes
in my skin and make me want to run a milion miles, how would I ever be able
to care about them the way I care about my brothers and sisters?
The bel goes and I am one of the first out of my seat. As I pass the rows and
rows of pupils, they al seem to look up at me. I see myself configured in their
eyes: the guy who always buries himself at the very back of every class, who
never speaks, always sits alone in one of the outdoor stairwels during break,
hunched over a book. The guy who doesn’t know how to talk to people, who
shakes his head when picked on in class, who is absent whenever there is
some kind of presentation to do. Over the years they have learned just to let
me be. When I first arrived here, there was plenty of ribbing, plenty of
pushing around, but eventualy they grew bored. Occasionaly a new pupil has
tried to strike up a conversation. And I’ve tried, I realy have. But when you
can only come up with one-word answers, when your voice fails you
altogether, what more can you do? What more can they? The girls are the
worst, especialy these days. They try harder, are more tenacious. Some even
ask me why I never speak – as if I can answer that. They flirt, try and get me
to smile. They mean wel, but what they don’t understand is that their mere
presence makes me want to die.
But today, mercifuly, I am left alone. I speak to no one for the whole morning.
I catch sight of Maya across the lunch hal, and she glances at the usual girl
gabbing away at her side and then rols her eyes. I smile. As I fork my way
through mouthfuls of watery shepherd’s pie, I watch her pretend to listen to
her friend, Francie, but she keeps glancing over at me, puling faces to crack
me up. Her white school shirt, several sizes too big, hangs over her grey skirt,
several inches too short. She is wearing her white PE lace-ups because she
has misplaced her school shoes. She is without socks, and a large plaster,
surrounded by a multitude of bruises, covers a scraped knee. Her auburn hair
reaches her waist, long and straight like Wila’s. Freckles smatter her
cheekbones, accentuating the natural palor of her skin. Even when she is
serious, her deep blue eyes always hold a glimmer that suggests she is about
to smile. Over the last year she has turned from pretty to beautiful in an
unusual, delicate, unnerving way. Boys chat her up endlessly – alarmingly.
After lunch I take my class copy of Romeo and Juliet, which I actualy read
years ago, and ensconce myself on the fourth step down of the north stairwel
outside the science block, the one least frequently used. This is how my
wasted hours accumulate, much like my loneliness. I keep my book open in
case anyone approaches, but I’m not realy in the mood to read it again.
Instead, from my concrete post, I watch a plane trace a white slash across the
deep blue of the sky. I look at the tiny aircraft, shrunk down by distance, and
marvel at the vast expanse between al those people on that huge crowded
plane, and me.
CHAPTER FOUR.
Maya.
‘When are you going to introduce him to me?’ Francie asks me mournfuly.
From our usual position on the low brick wal at the far end of the playground,
she has folowed my gaze to the lone figure sitting hunched on the steps
outside the science building. ‘Is he stil single?’
‘I told you a milion times: he doesn’t like people,’ I reply tersely. I look at her.
She exudes a kind of restless energy, the zest for life that comes naturaly with
being an extrovert. Trying to imagine her going out with my brother is almost
impossible. ‘How d’you know you’l even like him?’
‘Because he’s fucking hot!’ Francie exclaims with feeling.
I shake my head with a smile. ‘But the two of you have nothing in common.’
‘What’s that supposed to mean?’ She looks hurt suddenly.
‘He doesn’t have anything in common with anyone,’ I reassure her quickly.
‘He’s just different. He
– he doesn’t realy speak to people.’
Francie tosses back her hair. ‘Yeah, so I’ve heard. Taciturn as hel. Is it
depression?’
‘No.’ I play with a strand of hair. ‘The school made him see a counselor last
year but that was just a waste of time. He speaks at home. It’s just with people
he doesn’t know, people outside the family.’
‘So what? He’s just shy.’
I sigh doubtfuly. ‘That’s a bit of an understatement.’
‘What’s he got to be shy about?’ Francie asks. ‘I mean, has he looked in a
mirror recently?’
‘He’s not just like that around girls,’ I try to explain. ‘He’s like that with
everyone. He won’t even answer questions in class – it’s like a phobia.’
Francie whistles in disbelief. ‘God, has he always been like that?’
‘I don’t know.’ I stop playing with my hair for a moment and think. ‘When we
were young, we were like twins. We were born thirteen months apart, so
everyone thought we were twins anyway. We did everything together. I mean,
everything. One day he had tonsilitis and couldn’t go to school. Dad made me
go and I cried al day. We had our own secret language. Sometimes, when
Mum and Dad were at each other’s throats, we pretended we couldn’t speak
English, so we spoke to no one but each other for the whole day. We started
getting into trouble at school. They said that we refused to mix, that we had
no friends. But they were wrong. We had each other. He was my best friend in
the world. He stil is.’

I come home to a house ful of silence. The hal is empty of bags and blazers.
Maybe she’s taken them to the park, I think hopefuly. Then I almost laugh out
loud. When was the last time that happened? I go into the kitchen – cold
coffee mugs, overflowing ashtrays and cereal congealing at the bottom of
bowls. Milk, bread and butter stil left out on the table, Kit’s hardened uneaten
toast staring accusingly up at me. Tiffin’s forgotten book bag on the floor.
Wila’s abandoned tie . . . A sound from the front room prompts me to spin on
my heel. I walk back down the hal, noticing the dappled sunlight highlight the
dusty surfaces.
I find Mum looking dolefuly up at me from beneath Wila’s duvet on the
couch, a wet cloth covering her forehead.
I gape at her. ‘What happened?’
‘I think I’ve got stomach flu, sweetie. I’ve got this pounding headache and
I’ve been throwing up al day.’
‘The kids—’ I begin.
Her face dims and then reignites again, like a flickering match in the dark.
‘They’re at school, sweetie pie, don’t worry. I took them in this morning – I
was al right then. It was only after lunch that I started—’
‘Mum . . .’ I feel my voice begin to rise. ‘It’s four thirty!’
‘I know, sweetie. I’l get up in a minute.’
‘You were supposed to pick them up!’ I am shouting now. ‘They finish school
at half past three, remember?’
My mother looks at me, a horrible, bottomless look. ‘But isn’t it you or
Lochan today?’
‘Today’s Tuesday! It’s your day off! You always fetch them on your day off!’
Mum closes her eyes and lets out a little moan, modulated to elicit pity. I want
to hit her. Instead I lunge for the phone. She has turned the ringer off but the
answerphone’s little red light flashes accusingly. Four messages from St
Luke’s, the last one terse and angry, suggesting that this isn’t the first time Ms
Whitely has been extremely late. I instantly press calback, rage thudding
against my ribs.
Tiffin and Wila wil be terrified. They wil think they have been abandoned,
that she has walked out, as she keeps threatening to do when she’s been
drinking.
I get through to the school secretary and start blurting out my apologies. She
cuts me off with a swift, ‘Isn’t your mother the one who should be caling,
dear?’
‘Our mother isn’t wel,’ I say quickly. ‘But I’m leaving right now and I’l be at
the school in ten minutes. Please tel Wila and Tiffin I’m coming. Please,
please just tel them that Mum’s fine and Maya’s on her way.’
‘Wel, I’m afraid they’re not here any more.’ The secretary sounds a little put
out. ‘They were eventualy picked up by the childminder half an hour ago.’
My legs buckle. I sink down onto the arm of the couch. My body has gone so
limp, I nearly drop the phone. ‘We don’t have a childminder.’
‘Oh—’
‘Who was it? What did she look like? She must have given a name!’
‘Miss Pierce wil know who it was. The teachers don’t let the children go off
with just anyone, you know.’ Again the prim voice, coupled now with a
defensive edge.
‘I need to speak to Miss Pierce.’ My voice shakes with barely controled calm.
‘I’m afraid Miss Pierce left when the children were finaly picked up. I can try
and reach her on her mobile . . .’
I can hardly breathe. ‘Please ask her to come straight back to the school. I’l
meet her there.’
I hang up and I am literaly shaking. Mum lifts the flannel from her face and
says, ‘Sweetie, you sound upset. Is everything al right?’
I am racing through the hal, shoving on shoes, grabbing keys, mobile phone,
pressing speed-dial one as I slam out of the house. He answers on the third
ring.
‘What’s happened?’
I can hear laughter and jeering in the background, fading as he leaves his
after-school revision class. We both keep our phones on at al times. He knows
I’d only cal during school hours in an emergency.
I blurt out the events of the last five minutes. ‘I’m on my way to their school
now.’ A juggernaut brays its horn at me as I streak across the main road.
‘Meet you there,’ he says.

When I arrive at St Luke’s, I find the gates closed. I start to shove and kick at
them until the caretaker takes pity on me and comes over to unlock them.
‘Easy,’ he says. ‘What’s al the panic?’
Ignoring him, I run to the school doors and pound on them. I am buzzed
through and lurch along the fluorescent-lit corridor which, stripped of the
chaos of children, seems eerie and surreal. I spot Lochan at the far end,
talking to the school secretary. He must have run al the way too. Thank God,
thank God. Lochan wil know what to do.
He hasn’t noticed my arrival and so I slow to a dignified walk, straighten my
clothes, take deep breaths and try to calm myself down. I’ve learned the hard
way, through the various dealings I’ve had with figures of authority, that if
you start getting upset or angry, they treat you like a child and demand to
speak to your parents. Lochan has worked hard on the art of appearing calm
and articulate in these circumstances, but I’m al too aware what a terrible
struggle it is for him. As I approach, I notice that his hands are shaking
uncontrolably by his sides.
‘Miss P-Pierce was the only person to see them leave?’ he is asking. I can tel
he’s having to force himself to meet the secretary’s gaze.
‘That’s right,’says the horrible platinum blonde I’ve always despised. ‘And
Miss Pierce would of never—’
‘But surely – surely there’s another number she can be reached on?’ His voice
is clear and firm.
No one but I could detect the subtle tremor.
‘I told you – I tried. Her mobile’s switched off. But like I said, I left a
message on her home line—
’
‘Please could you just keep trying her phone?’
The secretary mutters something and disappears back inside her office. I
touch Lochan’s hand. He jumps as if he has been shot, and beneath the calm
exterior I see that he is crumbling too.
‘She keeps talking about a childminder,’ he says to me raggedly, backing out
into the corridor and grabbing my hand. ‘Did Mum ever say anything to you
about paying someone to fetch them?’
‘No!’
‘Where is she now?’
‘Lying on the couch with a flannel on her face,’ I whisper. ‘When I asked her
where Tiffin and Wila were, she said she thought it was our turn to pick them
up!’
Lochan is breathing hard. I can see the rapid rise and fal of his chest beneath
his school shirt. His bag and blazer are nowhere to be seen and he has
removed his tie. It takes me a moment to realize he is trying to disguise the
fact that he is stil just a schoolboy.
‘I’m sure it’s some kind of misunderstanding,’ he says, desperate optimism
creeping into his voice. ‘Another parent must have come in late and picked
them up. It’s al right. We’re going to get this sorted out, Maya. OK?’ He
squeezes my hands and gives me a tense smile.
I nod, forcing myself to breathe. ‘OK.’
‘I’d better go back and speak to the—’
‘D’you want me to?’ I ask quietly.
The heat immediately springs to his cheeks. ‘Of course not! I can – I can sort
this—’
‘I know,’ I back-pedal quickly. ‘I know you can.’
He leaves my side to cross the office threshold and takes an audible breath.
‘Stil – stil no luck?’
‘Nope. She could of got stuck in traffic, I s’pose. She could be anywhere,
realy.’
I hear Lochan exhale in exasperation. ‘Look, I’m sure the teacher wouldn’t
have wilfuly let them go with a stranger. B-but you’ve got to understand that,
right now, these children are missing. So I think it would be best if you caled
the headmaster or the deputy or – or someone who can help.
We’re going to have to notify the police, and they’re probably going to want
to speak to the people who run this school.’
In the corridor, out of sight of Platinum Blonde, I sag against the wal and
press the back of my hand against my mouth. Police means the authorities.
The authorities means Social Services. Lochan realy must think that Tiffin
and Wila have been kidnapped if he is wiling to risk getting them involved.
I am beginning to feel increasingly wobbly, so I go and sit down on the stairs.
I don’t understand how Lochan can stand there being so controled and
sensible until I notice the damp patch of sweat on the back of his shirt, the
increasing tremor in his hands. I want to get up and squeeze them, tel him it’s
going to be al right. Except I don’t know that it is.
The headmaster, a stout, greying man, arrives at the same time as Miss Pierce
– Wila’s teacher. It transpires that she waited for over half an hour with both
children before a lady, Sandra someone, showed up, apparently under
instructions to fetch them.
‘But surely you must have got a last name?’ Lochan is saying for the second
time.
‘Naturaly we have a record of each child’s parent or guardian or childminder.
But the only contact information we were ever given for Tiffin and Wila was
the mother’s name and a home number,’ Miss Pierce, a pinched, pink-cheeked
young woman, is saying. ‘And despite al our attempts, we couldn’t get
through. So when this lady arrived saying she was a family friend and had
been asked to pick up the children, we had no reason to disbelieve her.’
I see Lochan’s hands clench into fists behind his back. ‘Surely checking who
the children go home with is part of your job!’ He’s beginning to lose it now:
the cracks are starting to show.
‘I would have thought it part of the parent’s job to pick up their children on
time,’ Miss Pierce retorts, piqued, and suddenly I want to take her head and
smash it against Platinum Blonde’s and scream, Don’t you realize that while
you stand there acting all self-righteous and arguing over who is to blame, a
paedophile might be speeding off with my little brother and sister?
‘Where are the parents in al this?’ the headmaster interrupts. ‘Why have we
only got the siblings here?’
I feel the breath catch in my throat.
‘Our mother is il right now,’ Lochan says, and even as he comes out with this
wel-practised line I can tel that he is struggling to keep his voice calm.
‘Too il to come down the road and find out what has happened to her
children?’ Miss Pierce asks.
There is a silence. Lochan is staring at the teacher, his shoulders rising and
faling rapidly. Don’t react, I beg him silently, pressing my knuckles against
my lips.
‘Wel, look, I think we should alert the authorities,’ the headmaster is now
saying. ‘I’m sure it’s a false alarm, but obviously we need to be on the safe
side.’
Lochan is backing away now, tugging at his hair in a characteristic gesture of
extreme distress.
‘OK. Yes, of course. But can you just give us a minute?’
He moves away from the office door and rushes over. ‘Maya, they want to cal
the police—’ His voice is shaking and his face glistens with sweat. ‘They’l
come to the house. Mum – she’l have to be involved . . . Was she sober?’
‘I don’t know. She’s definitely hung over!’
‘Maybe – maybe I should stay here and wait for the police while you go home
and try and get her together. Hide any bottles and open al the windows.’ He is
gripping the tops of my arms so hard they hurt. ‘Do whatever you can to get
rid of the smel. Tel her to cry or – or something, so that she appears hysterical
instead of—’
‘Lochan, I’ve got it, I can do it. Go ahead and cal the police. I’l make sure
they never know—’
‘They’l take the kids away and separate us—’ His voice is fragmenting.
‘No they won’t. Lochie, cal the police – this is more important!’
Drawing back, he cups his hands over his nose and mouth, his eyes wide, and
nods at me. I’ve never seen him look so afraid. Then he turns and walks back
across the halway and into the office.
I break into a run, heading towards the heavy double doors at the end of the
corridor. The black and white lino disappears rhythmicaly beneath my feet.
The bright colours on the wals seem to swim .
. . The sudden shout from behind me rips like a bulet through my chest.
‘They’ve found Sandra’s number!’
One hand on the door, I stop. Lochan’s face is alight with relief.
When they finaly come through the school doors after another agonizing tenminute wait, Tiffin is blowing pink bubbles, his mouth ful of gum, and Wila is
brandishing a lolipop. ‘Look what I got!’
I hug Wila so tight I can feel her heart beat against mine. Her lemon-scented
hair is in my face, and al I can do is squeeze her and kiss her and try and keep
her in my arms. Lochan has one arm round Tiffin as he wriggles and giggles
in his grasp.
It’s clear that neither of them have a clue that anything was amiss, so I bite
my tongue to stop myself from crying. Sandra turns out to be nothing more
sinister than an elderly lady, childminder to one of the boys in another class.
According to her, Lily Whitely rang just after four this afternoon, explaining
that she was too il to leave the house and asking whether she could do her a
favour and pick up the children. Sandra had kindly returned to the school,
colected Wila and Tiffin and tried to drop them back home. Getting no reply
when she rang the bel, she dropped a note through the door and took them
back to her own charge’s house, awaiting Lily’s phone cal.
As we cross the playground, I hold Tiffin and Wila tightly with each hand and
try my best to engage in the prattle about their unexpected ‘playdate’. I
overhear Lochan thanking Sandra and see him scribble down his mobile
number, teling her to cal him should Lily ever ask her for a ‘favour’ of this
kind again. As soon as we leave the school, Tiffin tries to disengage himself
from my grasp, looking for something in the gutter to kick and dribble down
the road. I tel him I’l play Battleships with him for half an hour if he holds my
hand al the way home. Surprisingly, he agrees, bounding up and down like a
yo-yo on the end of my arm, threatening to dislocate it from its socket, but I
don’t care. As long as he keeps hold of my hand, I realy don’t care.
We folow Lochan al the way home. He strides ahead, and something prevents
me from trying to catch up with him. Tiffin and Wila don’t seem to mind:
they are stil ful of stories about the new PlayStation they got to try out. I start
a spiel on stranger-danger but it emerges that they have already been picked
up by Calum’s childminder several times.
As soon as we get in, Tiffin and Wila spot Mum, stil half passed out on the
couch. With a whoop they run over to her, delighted to find her home for a
change, their anecdotes pouring out al over again. Mum uncovers her face,
sits up and laughs, hugging them tight. ‘My little bunnies,’she says.
‘Did you have a good time? I missed you al day, you know.’
I stand in the doorway, the sharp edge of the frame cutting into my shoulder,
watching this little scene unfold in silence. Tiffin is showing off his juggling
skils with some old tennis bals and Wila is trying to interest Mum in a game
of Guess Who? It takes me a moment to realize that Lochan disappeared
upstairs the moment we entered the house. I turn away from the front room,
utterly spent, and slowly climb the stairs. Music blasting from the attic above
reassures me that at least the third child made it home without incident. I go
into my room, shed my blazer and tie, kick off my shoes, and flop down on
my bed in an exhausted heap.
I must have dozed off, for when I hear Tiffin shout ‘Dinner!’ I sit up in bed
with a start to discover a bluish dusk filing the smal room. Combing the hair
out of my eyes with my fingers, I pad sleepily downstairs.
The atmosphere in the kitchen is jarring. Mum has mutated into a butterfly –
al wispy skirts and trailing sleeves and bright, patterned colours. She has
showered and washed her hair – having apparently recovered from her earlier
bout of flu. The heavy make-up gives her away – clearly she isn’t staying in
to watch EastEnders tonight. She has cooked up some kind of baked beans
and sausage dish that Kit is prodding around disdainfuly with his fork. Tiffin
and Wila sit side by side, swinging their legs and trying to kick each other
under the table, tel-tale signs of chocolate round their mouths, ignoring the
unappetizing mixture laid out before them.
‘This isn’t food.’ Head propped up on his hand, Kit scowls down at his plate,
flicking the pieces of sausage around his plate. ‘Can I go out?’
‘Just shut up and eat,’ Lochan snaps uncharacteristicaly, reaching into the
cupboard for glasses.
Kit is about to retort, then appears to decide against it and starts prodding at
his food again. The tone of Lochan’s voice suggests that this is no time to
argue.
‘Wel, get started, everyone,’ Mum says with a nervous giggle. ‘I know I’m
not the world’s best cook, but I can assure you this tastes a lot better than it
looks.’
Kit snorts and mutters something inaudible. Wila lances a single baked bean
with the prong of her fork and brings it reluctantly to her mouth, licking it
gingerly with the tip of her tongue. With a long-suffering air, Tiffin takes a
mouthful of sausage and then puls a face, his eyes watering, ready to either
gag or spit it out. I quickly bring over the water jug and fil the glasses. Finaly
Lochan sits down. He smels of school and sweat, and his tousled black hair
contrasts sharply with his wan face. I notice the clench of his jaw, the stormy
look in his eyes, and feel the tension radiate from his body like white heat.
‘Are you going out again tonight, Mum?’ Wila asks, taking delicate bird bites
out of a piece of sausage.
‘No, she’s not,’ Lochan says quietly without looking up. Beneath the table, I
press my foot against his in warning.
Mum turns to him in surprise. ‘Davey’s picking me up at seven,’she protests.
‘It’s OK, bunnies.
I’l tuck you in before I go.’
‘Forget about it,’ Tiffin mumbles angrily.
‘Seven o’clock is a very early bedtime,’ Wila comments with a sigh, spearing
a second bean.
‘You’re not going out again tonight,’ Lochan mutters at her.
There is a stunned silence. ‘Told you he thinks he rules the place!’ Kit looks
up from his plate, delighted at his chance to chip in. ‘Are you gonna let him
boss you around like this, Mum?’
I shoot Kit a warning look and shake my head. His face instantly darkens
again. ‘What – I’m not even alowed to talk now?’
‘Oh, I won’t be late—’ Mum says with a benign smile.
‘You’re not going out!’ Lochan shouts suddenly, slamming his hand down on
the table. The crockery rattles and everyone jumps. I feel a familiar tension
headache grip my temples.
Mum claps a hand to her throat and lets out a highpitched exclamation of
surprise, a kind of shril laugh. ‘Oh, listen to the big man of the house, teling
his mummy what to do!’
‘See how the other half live,’ Kit mutters.
Lochan throws down his fork, his face puce, the cords standing out in his
neck. ‘Two hours ago you were too damn hungover to make it down the street
to fetch your own children from school, and you couldn’t even remember
you’d asked someone else to pick them up!’
Mum opens her eyes wide. ‘But, darling, aren’t you pleased I’m feeling so
much better?’
‘That’s not going to last if you go out for another night on the piss!’ Lochan
yels, gripping the edge of the table with both hands, his knuckles white. ‘We
nearly had to involve the police today.
Nobody had any idea where the kids were. Anything could have happened to
them, and you’d have been too out of it to notice!’
‘Lochie!’ Mum’s voice quivers like a little girl’s. ‘I had food poisoning. I
couldn’t stop throwing up. I didn’t want to disturb you and Maya at school.
What else was I supposed to do?’
‘Food poisoning, my arse!’ Lochan leaps up so violently he sends his chair
crashing back against the tiles. ‘When are you going to face reality and accept
you’ve got an alcohol problem?’
‘Oh, I’ve got a problem!’ Mum’s eyes flash suddenly, the little-girl act tossed
aside. ‘I’m not a conventional mother – so sue me. I’ve had a hard life! I’ve
finaly met someone great and I want to go out and have some fun! Fun –
something you might want to try experiencing, Lochan, instead of living your
life with your head in a book like your father. Where are your friends, hey?
When do you ever go out – or bring someone home for that matter?’
Kit has rocked back in his chair, watching the scene with relish.
‘Mum, please don’t—’ I reach out for her but she swats me away. I smel fresh
alcohol on her breath – in this state she is capable of saying anything, doing
anything. Especialy as Lochan has mentioned the unmentionable.
Lochan has turned to stone, one hand gripping the sideboard for support.
Tiffin has his hands clamped over his ears and Wila is looking from one face
to the other, her eyes wide and staring.
‘Come on.’ I get up and pul them after me into the corridor. ‘Go up to your
room and entertain yourselves for a while. I’l bring you some sandwiches in a
minute.’
Wila scampers fearfuly up the stairs; Tiffin scowls, trailing in her wake. ‘We
should of stayed at Calum’s,’ I hear him mutter and his words make my throat
ache.
With no choice but to return to the kitchen in an attempt at damage-control, I
find Mum stil shouting, her eyes narrowed under the weight of her lids.
‘Don’t look at me like that – you know exactly what I’m talking about.
You’ve never had a proper girlfriend, never even managed to make a single
friend, for chrissakes! What does being top of the class matter when the
school keeps teling me you need to see a psychologist because you’re so shy
you can’t even speak to anyone! The only person who’s got a problem is
you!’
Lochan hasn’t moved: he’s staring at her with a look of sick horror. His lack
of response only serves to spur Mum on as she starts trying to justify her
outburst by fueling her own rage. ‘You take after him in every way – thinking
you’re better than everyone else with your long words and your top grades.
You have absolutely no respect for your own mother!’she shrieks, her face
mottled with fury.
‘How dare you speak to me like that in front of my children!’
I position myself in front of her and start manoeuvring her out of the kitchen.
‘Just go out with Dave,’ I beg her. ‘Go and meet him early or something.
Surprise him! Go, Mum, just go.’
‘You always take his side!’
‘I’m not taking anyone’s side, Mum. I just think you’re getting yourself into a
state, which isn’t a very good idea considering you haven’t been feeling very
wel.’ I manage to get her into the halway.
She grabs her handbag, but not without one last barb thrown over her
shoulder. ‘Lochan, you can accuse me of not being a normal mother the day
you start acting like a normal teenager!’
I propel her out of the door, and it is an effort not to slam it hard behind her.
Instead I lean against it, afraid she might unlock it and come storming back
in. I close my eyes for a moment. When I open them again, I notice a figure
sitting at the top of the stairs.
‘Tiffin, haven’t you got homework to do?’
‘She said she was gonna tuck us in.’ There’s a tremor in his voice.
‘I know,’ I say quickly, straightening up. ‘And she meant it. But I said I would
do it instead because she was running late—’
‘I don’t want you to do it, I want Mum!’ Tiffin shouts, and jumping up, he
runs into his room, slamming the door behind him.
Back in the kitchen, Kit has his feet on the table, shaking with silent laughter.
‘God, what a fucked-up family this is!’
‘Just go upstairs. You’re not helping,’ I tel him quietly.
He opens his mouth to protest, then launches himself angrily to his feet, his
chair screeching against the tiles. Grabbing Tiffin and Wila’s dinner money
from the hal table, he makes for the front door.
‘Where are you going?’ I shout after him.
‘Out to get some fucking food!’
Lochan is pacing the kitchen floor. He seems somehow dismantled, confused.
His face is variegated with lines of crimson, giving his skin a curious raw
look.
‘I’m sorry, I shouldn’t have started it—’ He sounds like he is being shaken. I
try to touch his arm but he jumps away from me as if stung. His pain is almost
tangible: the hurt, the resentment, the fury, al filing the smal room.
‘Lochie, you had every right to lose your temper. What Mum did today was
inexcusable. But listen to me . . .’ I position myself in front of him and try to
touch him again. ‘Lochie, listen. That stuff she said was just her way of
lashing out. You mentioned her drinking and she just can’t deal with the truth.
So she tried to find the most hurtful thing she could to throw back at you—’
‘She meant it, she meant every word.’ He tugs at his hair, rubs his cheeks.
‘And she’s right. I’m not – I’m not normal. There’s something wrong with me
and—’
‘Lochie, don’t worry about that right now, OK? It’s something you can work
on – it’s something that’s going to get better with time!’
Puling away from me, he continues to pace, as if the continuous movement
wil stop him faling apart. ‘But she’s like Kit. She’s – she’s—’ He can’t bring
himself to say the word. ‘Ashamed,’ he whispers finaly.
‘Lochie, stop for a minute. Look at me.’
I grab him by the arms and hold him stil. I can feel him trembling beneath my
touch.
‘It’s al right. The kids are al right and that’s al that matters. Don’t listen to her.
Never, ever listen to her. She’s just a bitter old cow who never grew up. But
she’s not ashamed of you. No one’s ashamed of you, Lochie. God, how could
anyone be? We al know that without you this family would fal apart.’
He drops his head in defeat. I can feel the clenched muscles in his shoulders
beneath my fingers.
‘It is faling apart.’
I give him a smal, desperate shake. ‘Lochan, it’s not. Wila and Tiffin are fine.
I’m fine! Kit is your standard screwed-up teenager. We’re al together – al
those years since Dad left – since Mum’s problem started. We haven’t been
taken into care, and that’s entirely thanks to you.’
There is a long silence. Al I can see is the top of Lochan’s head. He leans
towards me slightly. I reach up and put my arms around him and hold him
tight. I lower my voice to a whisper. ‘You’re not just my brother, you’re my
best friend.’
CHAPTER FIVE.
Lochan.
I replay that sentence over and over during the next few days. It is a way of
blotting out everything else – the awful incident with Tiffin and Wila, the row
with my mother, the constant hel that is school.
Every time I decline to answer a question in class, each moment I spend alone
bent over a book, I am reminded of what my family think of me. Pathetic. A
socialy inept weirdo. A teenage son who can’t get a friend, let alone a
girlfriend. I try – I realy try: smal things, like asking my neighbour for the
time.
He has to lean across the aisle to ask me to repeat my question. I can’t even
hear the sound of my own voice. I stil don’t fuly understand it – I managed to
talk to the school staff the afternoon Tiffin and Wila disappeared. But that was
an emergency, and the horror of the situation overrode any inhibitions I might
have had. Talking to adults is bearable; it’s talking to people my age that’s
impossible. So I keep replaying Maya’s words in my head. Maybe there is
someone who isn’t ashamed of me after al. Perhaps there is one member of
my family whom I haven’t totaly let down.
But the void yawns open like a cavern inside my chest. I feel so damn lonely
al the time. Even though I’m surrounded by pupils, there is this invisible
screen between us, and behind the glass wal I am screaming – screaming in
my own silence, screaming to be noticed, to be befriended, to be liked.
And yet when a friendlylooking girl from my maths class comes up to me in
the canteen and says
‘Mind if I sit here?’ I just give a quick nod and turn away, hoping to God she
won’t try to engage me in conversation. And at home it’s hardly as if I’m
alone, either. The house is never silent – but Kit is stil going through his evil
phase, Tiffin is only interested in his Gameboy and his footie friends, and
Wila is sweet but stil just a baby. I play Twister and Hide-and-Seek with the
little ones, help them with their homework, feed them, bathe them, read them
goodnight stories, but al the while I have to stay upbeat for them, put on the
damn mask, and sometimes I fear it wil crack. Only with Maya can I realy be
myself. We share the burden together and she is always on my side, by my
side. I don’t want to need her, to depend on her, but I do, I realy do.
At lunch break I am sitting in my usual place during the tired afternoon,
watching the cold light slowly move across the empty stairwel beneath me,
when footsteps from above startle me. I lower my eyes to my book. Behind
me, the feet slow and I feel my pulse rate rise. Someone passes me on the
steps.
I feel a leg brush against my shirtsleeve and I concentrate on the page of
blurred print before me. To my horror, just below me, the footsteps stop
altogether.
‘Hi!’ a girl’s voice exclaims.
I flinch. Force myself to look up. I meet the browneyed gaze of someone I
vaguely recognize. It takes me several seconds to place her. It’s the girl Maya
always hangs around with. I can’t even remember her name. And she is
looking at me with a wide, toothy grin.
‘Hi,’she says again.
I clear my throat. ‘Hi,’ I mumble.
I’m not sure she can even hear me. Her gaze is unflinching and she seems to
be waiting for something more.
‘The Hours,’she comments, glancing down at my book. ‘Isn’t that a film?’
I nod.
‘Any good?’ Her determination to make conversation is impressive. I nod
again and return to the page. ‘I’m Francie,’she says, stil grinning broadly.
‘Lochan,’ I reply.
She raises her eyebrows meaningfuly. ‘I know.’
I can feel my fingers making damp indentations in the pages of the book.
‘Maya talks about you al the time.’
There is nothing subtle about this girl. Her frizzy hair and dark skin contrast
sharply with her blood-red lipstick and she is wearing an obscenely short skirt
and huge silver hoops in her ears.
‘You know who I am, right? You’ve seen me hanging around with your
sister?’
Another nod, the words evaporating as soon as they reach my throat. I start
chewing my lip.
Francie looks at me pensively with a little smile. ‘You don’t talk much, do
you?’
My face starts to burn. If she hadn’t been a friend of Maya’s, I would be
pushing past her down the stairs by now. But Francie seems more curious
than amused.
‘People say I never stop talking,’she continues breezily. ‘It pisses them off.’
You’re telling me.
‘I have a message for you,’ Francie declares suddenly. ‘From your sister.’
I feel myself tense. ‘W-what is it?’
‘Nothing serious,’she says quickly. ‘Just that your mum is taking your
brothers and sister out to McDonald’s tonight so there’s no need to rush home.
Maya wants you to meet her at the postbox at the end of the street after
school.’
‘M-Maya asked you to c-come here and tel me that?’ I ask, waiting for her to
smirk at my stammer.
‘Wel, not exactly. She was trying to send you a text, but then she was kept in
to finish off some coursework so I figured I might as wel tel you myself.’
‘Thanks,’ I mumble.
‘And . . . I also wanted to invite you to have a drink at Smileys with Maya and
me, since the two of you don’t have to go rushing off for once.’
I stare at her, mute.
‘Is that a yes?’ She eyes me hopefuly.
My mind has gone blank. I can’t for the life of me think of an excuse. ‘Uh,
wel – OK.’
‘Cool!’ Her face lights up. ‘I’l see you at the postbox after school!’
She is gone as suddenly as she arrived.
At the final bel I pack my bag with unsteady hands; I am the last to trail out of
the classroom. I make a dive for the toilets and lock myself in a cubicle.
Sitting on the closed lid after peeing, I try to pul myself together. On the way
out I stop in front of the mirrors. In the afternoon light the pale face staring
back at me has the glittering green eyes of some alien creature. Leaning over
the basin, I cup icy water in my hands and bring it up to my face, pressing my
cheeks into the shalow puddles. I want to hide out here for ever, but someone
else bangs in through the door and I have no choice but to leave.
Maya and Francie are standing side by side by the postbox at the end of the
street, talking in rapid-fire to each other, their eyes scanning the crowds. It
takes al the wil in the world to stop me from doubling back, but the look of
expectation on Maya’s face forces me forward. Her face breaks into a smile of
delight as she catches sight of me.
‘Thought you were going to do a no-show!’she whispers.
I smile again and nod, words running through my mind like a stream of
effervescent bubbles.
‘Wel, come on, guys!’ Francie exclaims after a moment’s awkward silence.
‘Are we going to Smileys or not?’
‘Absolutely,’ Maya says, and as she turns to folow her friend, her hand
brushes against mine in a gesture of reassurance – or perhaps it is thanks.
Smileys is stil mercifuly empty at this time. We take a smal round table by the
window and I hide behind the menu, my tongue rubbing the rough skin
beneath my lip.
‘Are you guys getting food?’ Francie wants to know.
Maya glances at me and I give a subtle shake of the head.
‘Shal we share some garlic bread?’ Francie suggests. ‘I’m dying for a Coke.’
Maya leans back in her seat to try and catch the waiter, and Francie turns to
me. ‘So, are you looking forward to getting the hel out of Belmont?’
I put down the menu and nod, forcing a smile.
‘You’re so lucky,’ Francie continues. ‘Just another nine months and you’l be
free of this hel-hole.
’
Maya finishes ordering and returns to the one-sided conversation, which even
Francie is struggling to maintain. ‘Lochan’s going to UCL,’she announces
proudly.
‘Wel, no, I – I’m applying—’
‘It’s a dead cert.’
‘Shit, you must realy be smart!’ Francie exclaims.
‘He is,’ Maya informs her. ‘He’s been predicted four As.’
‘Fuck!’
I wince and catch Maya’s eye, pleading with her to back off. I want to object,
play it down, but I can feel the heat rushing to my face and the words
evaporating from my mind the moment I conjure them up.
Maya elbows me gently. ‘Francie’s no fool either,’she says. ‘She is actualy
the only person I know who can touch the tip of her nose with her tongue.’
We al laugh. I breathe again.
‘You think I’m kidding?’ Francie chalenges me.
‘No . . .’
‘He’s just being polite,’ Maya informs her. ‘I think he’s gonna need proof.’
Francie is al too keen to oblige. She sits up straight, extends her tongue as far
as it wil go, curls it upwards and touches the very tip to her nose. The crosseyed look completes the picture.
Maya fals against me with mirth and I find myself laughing too. Francie’s
OK. As long as this doesn’t last too long, I think I’m going to survive.
Suddenly there is a commotion in the doorway. Francie spins round in her
seat and I identify a group of Belmont pupils by their uniform.
‘Hey, guys!’ Francie shouts. ‘Over here!’
They clatter over, and through blurred vision I recognize a couple of girls
from Maya’s class, a guy from one of the other year groups and Rafi, a guy
from English. There are greetings and backslaps, and two tables are pushed
together and more chairs drawn up.
‘Whitely!’ Rafi exclaims in astonishment. ‘What the hel are you doing here?’
‘Just, uh, my sister—’
‘He’s hanging out with us!’ Francie exclaims. ‘Is that a crime? He’s Maya’s
brother – didn’t you know?’
‘Yeah, I just never thought I’d see him in a place like this!’ There is no malice
in Rafi’s laughter, just genuine surprise, but now everybody’s looking at me
and the two other girls are talking.
Maya is doing the introductions, but although I can hear the voices, I can no
longer make sense of what is being said. Emma, who has been going out of
her way to bump into me since the beginning of term, is determined to engage
me in conversation. Their sudden intrusion just as I was beginning to relax,
combined with the fact that they al know me as the class weirdo, is suddenly
al too much, and I feel like the prey in some claustrophobic nightmare. Their
words are like hammers, pounding my skul.
I give in to the tide and feel myself beginning to drown. Their mouths move
underwater, opening and closing, I read the question marks on their faces –
most of their questions are directed at me – but panic has caused my senses to
shut down. I cannot distinguish one sentence from another: it has al turned
into a blanket of noise. Abruptly I scrape back my chair and get to my feet,
grabbing my bag and blazer. I mumble something about having left my
mobile at school, raise my hand in goodbye and lunge for the door.
I head down one street, then another. I’m not even sure where I’m going. I
suddenly feel stupidly close to tears. I drape my blazer over my school bag
and hook the strap over my shoulder, walking as fast as I can, the air rasping
in my lungs, the sound of traffic drowned out by the frantic thud of my heart.
I hear the smack of shoes on the pavement behind me and instinctively move
aside to let the jogger past, but it’s Maya, grabbing me by the arm.
‘Slow down, Lochie, please – I’ve got a realy bad stitch . . .’
‘Maya, what the hel are you doing? Go back to your friends.’
She catches hold of my hand. ‘Lochie, wait—’
I stop and pul away from her suddenly, stepping back. ‘Look, I appreciate the
effort, but I’d rather you just left me alone, OK?’ My voice begins to rise. ‘I
didn’t ask you for help, did I?’
‘Hey, hey!’ She steps towards me, holding out her hand. ‘I wasn’t trying to do
anything, Loch. It was al Francie’s idea. I only went along with it because she
told me you’d agreed.’
I run my hands through my hair. ‘Jesus, this was such a fucking mistake. Now
I’ve gone and embarrassed you in front of your friends . . .’
‘Are you insane?’ She laughs, grabs my hand and swings my arm as we start
walking again. ‘I’m glad you left! Gave me an excuse to get out too.’
I check my watch, feeling myself relax slightly. ‘You know, since Mum’s
looking after the kids for once, we have the whole evening free.’ I raise a
tentative eyebrow.
Maya flicks back her hair and a smile lights up her face, her eyes widening in
animation. ‘Ooh, were you thinking of fleeing the country?’
I grin. ‘Tempting . . . But maybe something more along the lines of catching a
film?’
She tilts her face up to the sky. ‘But the sun’s shining. It stil feels like
summer!’
‘OK then, you choose.’
‘Let’s just walk,’she says.
‘Walk?’
‘Yes. Let’s catch a bus over to Chelsea Harbour. Let’s ogle the houses of the
rich and famous and wander down by the river.’
CHAPTER SIX.
Maya.
As we walk along Chelsea Embankment, I stuff my blazer and tie into my bag
and the warm evening breeze brushes my skirt against my bare thighs. The
sun is just beginning to turn orange, sprinkling drops of gold across the
water’s scaly surface, muscled like the back of a serpent. This is my favourite
time of day, the afternoon barely ended, the evening not yet begun; the
languid hours of sunshine stretch out ahead of us before fading into dusky
twilight. High above us the bridges are heavy with congested traffic –
overloaded buses and impatient cars and reckless cyclists, men and women
sweating in suits, desperate to get home, ferries and tugboats passing below.
Gravel crunches underfoot as we cross the large, empty expanses between the
glass office buildings, past the luxury apartments that stack their way high
into the sky. It is so sunny that the world feels like a blank of light, a stil
whiteness. I toss Lochan my bag, take a running step, skip and hop, and do a
cartwheel, the grainy path rough against my palms. The sun momentarily
disappears and we are plunged into cool blue shade as we pass beneath the
bridge, our footsteps suddenly magnified, bouncing off the smooth arch of the
supports, startling a pigeon up into the sky. A few paces to my left, keeping a
safe distance from my antics, Lochan strides along, hands in his pockets,
shirtsleeves roled up to the elbows. A light thread of veins is visible on his
temples, and the shadows beneath his eyes lend him a haunted look.
He glances at me with his bright green gaze and gives one of his trademark
lopsided smiles. I grin and do another cartwheel, and Lochan lengthens his
stride to match mine, appearing faintly amused. But when his gaze shifts
away, the smile fades and the lip-biting starts up again. Despite his loping
presence at my side, I feel there is a space between us, an indefinable
distance. Even when his eyes are on me, I sense that he doesn’t quite see me,
his thoughts somewhere else, out of reach. I lose my footing coming out of a
forward walkover and stumble against him, almost relieved to feel him solid
and alive. He laughs briefly and steadies me but quickly goes back to sucking
his lip, his teeth chafing the sore. When we were young, I could do something
sily and break the spel, pul him out of it, but now it’s harder. I know there are
things he doesn’t tel me. Things he has on his mind.
When we reach the shops, we buy pizza and Coke from a takeaway and head
towards Battersea Park. Inside the gates, we wander out into the middle of the
vast expanse of greenery, away from the trees, aligning ourselves with the
sun, now lying westward and losing its briliance. Cross-legged, I examine a
bruise on my shin while Lochan kneels in the grass, opening the pizza box
and handing me a slice. I take it and stretch out my legs, lifting my chin to
feel the sun on my face.
‘This is a milion times nicer than hanging out with those dorks from school,’ I
inform him. ‘That was a good move, leaving when you did.’
Munching solidly, he shoots me a penetrating look and I can tel he is trying to
read my mind, seeking the motive behind my words. I meet his gaze ful on,
and the corner of his mouth twitches upwards as he realizes I am being
completely honest.
I give up on the food before he does and lean back on my elbows, watching
him eat. He’s clearly starving. I open my mouth to tel him he has tomato
sauce on his chin, then change my mind. My smile, however, doesn’t go
unnoticed.
‘What?’ he asks with a brief laugh, swalowing his last mouthful and wiping
his hands on the grass.
‘Nothing.’ I try to reel in the smile, but with his red-streaked chin, tousled
hair, untucked shirt and grubby cuffs flapping loosely against his hands, he
looks like a taler, dark-haired version of Tiffin at the end of a busy school day.
‘Why are you looking at me like that?’ he persists, regarding me quizzicaly, a
touch self-conscious now.
‘Nothing. I was just thinking of what Francie says about you.’
A hint of wariness touches his eyes. ‘Oh, not that again . . .’
‘Your dimples are apparently very cute.’ I bite back a grin.
‘Ha ha.’ A little smile and he is looking down, puling at the grass, a flush
creeping up his neck.
‘And you have arresting eyes – whatever that means.’
A grimace of embarrassment. ‘Piss off, Maya. You just made that up.’
‘I didn’t. I’m teling you – she says things like that. What else . . . ? Oh yes:
your mouth is apparently very snoggable.’
He chokes, showering me with Coke. ‘Maya!’
‘I’m not kidding! Those were her exact words!’
He is blushing hard now, peering intently into the Coke can. ‘Can I finish this
or are you stil thirsty?’
‘Stop trying to change the subject,’ I laugh.
He shoots me an evil look and swigs down the dregs.
‘She even said she caught sight of you through the open door of the boys’
changing rooms and you looked realy—’
He kicks out at me. He is stil half joking but it hurt.
I feel confused. Beneath the jokey exterior, he suddenly seems upset. I appear
to have inadvertently crossed some invisible line.
‘OK.’ I raise my hands in surrender. ‘But you get the idea, right?’
‘Yeah, thanks a lot.’ He gives another wry smile to show he isn’t angry, and
then turns his face away into the breeze. There is a long silence and I close
my eyes, feeling the last of the summer sun on my face. The tranquility is
unnerving. Muted playground shrieks reach us from what seems like a milion
miles away. Somewhere amongst the trees, a dog lets out a couple of short,
sharp yaps. I rol over onto my stomach and prop my chin on my hands.
Lochan hasn’t realized I’m watching him, and al signs of laughter have been
completely erased from his face. Elbows resting on drawn-up knees, he gazes
out across the park and I can feel his mind working. Scrutinizing his face for
lingering signs of annoyance, I find none. Only sadness.
‘You OK?’
‘Yeah.’ He doesn’t turn.
‘Realy?’
He’s about to say something but then remains silent. Instead he starts rubbing
at his sore with the side of his thumb.
I sit up. Reaching out, I gently pul his hand down from his face. His eyes dart
to meet mine.
‘Maya, I’m not going to go out with Francie.’
‘I know. That’s OK. It doesn’t matter,’ I say quickly. ‘She’l get over it.’
‘Why are you so keen to set us up?’
I feel awkward suddenly. ‘I dunno. I guess – I guess I thought if you went out
with a friend of mine at least I’d stil get to see you. You wouldn’t – you’d be
less likely to go away.’
He frowns, uncomprehending.
‘It’s just that if you meet somebody next year at university—’ A smal pain
rises in the back of my throat. I cannot finish the sentence. ‘I mean, of course
I want you to, but I don’t – I’m scared . . .’
He gives me a long, steady look. ‘Maya, surely you know I’d never leave you
– you or the others.
’
I force a smile and look down, tugging at the blades of grass. But one day you
will, I can’t help thinking. One day we’ll all leave each other to forge families
of our own. Because that’s the way the world works.
‘To be honest, I doubt if I’m ever going to go out with anyone,’ Lochan says
quietly.
I look up in surprise. He glances at me and then away, an uncomfortable
silence hanging between us.
I can’t help smiling. ‘That’s sily, Loch. You’re the best-looking guy at
Belmont. Every girl in my class has a crush on you.’
Silence.
‘Are you saying you’re gay?’
The corners of his mouth twitch in amusement. ‘If there’s one thing I do
know, it’s that I’m not!’
I sigh. ‘That’s a pity. I always thought it would be pretty cool to have a gay
brother.’
Lochan laughs. ‘Don’t lose hope yet. There’s stil Kit and Tiffin.’
‘Kit? Yeah, right! Rumour has it he’s already got a girlfriend. Francie swears
she saw him snogging a girl from the year above in an empty classroom.’
‘Let’s just hope he doesn’t get her pregnant,’ Lochan says acerbicaly.
I wince and try to banish the thought from my mind. I don’t even want to
think of Kit with a girl.
He’s only thirteen, for chrissakes.
I sigh. ‘I’ve never even kissed anyone – unlike most of the girls in my class,’ I
confess quietly, running my fingers through the long grass.
He turns to me. ‘So?’ he says gently. ‘You’re only sixteen.’
I pick at the stems and pout. ‘Sweet sixteen and never been kissed . . . What
about you – have you ever—?’ I break off abruptly, suddenly realizing the
absurdity of my question. I try to think of a way of turning it around, but it’s
too late: Lochan is already picking at the ground with his fingernails, the
colour high in his cheeks.
‘Yeah, right!’ He gives a derisive snort, avoiding my gaze, intent on the smal
hole he is digging in the earth. ‘Like – like that’s ever going to happen!’ With
a short laugh, he glances at me as if imploring me to join in, and through the
embarrassment I see the pain in his eyes.
Instinctively I move closer, stopping myself from reaching out and squeezing
his hand, hating myself for my moment of thoughtlessness. ‘Loch, it’s not
always going to be like this,’ I tel him gently.
‘One day—’
‘Yeah, one day.’ He smiles with forced nonchalance and gives a brief,
dismissive shrug. ‘I know.’
A long silence stretches out between us. I look up at him in the scattered light
of the afternoon, now nearing its end. ‘Do you ever think about it?’
He hesitates, the blood stil hot in his cheeks, and for a moment I think he isn’t
going to reply. He continues picking at the earth, stil studiously avoiding my
gaze. ‘Course.’ It’s so quiet that for a moment I think I might have imagined
it.
I look at him sharply. ‘Who?’
‘There’s never realy been anyone . . .’ He stil refuses to look up, but even
though he’s increasingly uncomfortable, he isn’t trying to get out of the
conversation. ‘I just think that somewhere there must be—’ He shakes his
head, as if suddenly aware he has said too much.
‘Hey, me too!’ I exclaim. ‘Somewhere in my head I have this idea of a perfect
guy. But I don’t think he even exists.’
‘Sometimes—’ Lochan begins, then breaks off.
I wait for him to continue. ‘Sometimes . . . ?’ I prompt gently.
‘I wish things were different.’ He takes a deep breath. ‘I wish everything
wasn’t so damn hard.’
‘I know,’ I say quietly. ‘Me too.’
CHAPTER SEVEN.
Lochan.
Summer gives way to autumn. The air turns sharper, the days grow shorter,
grey clouds and persistent drizzle alternating with cold blue skies and bracing
winds. Wila loses her third tooth, Tiffin attempts to cut his own hair when a
supply teacher mistakes him for a girl, Kit is suspended for three days for
smoking weed. Mum starts spending her days off with Dave and, even when
she’s working, frequently stays over at his flat above the restaurant to avoid
the daily commute. On the few occasions she’s home, she’s rarely sober for
long, and Tiffin and Wila have given up asking her to play with them or tuck
them in. I make regular trips to the bottle bank after dark.
The school term grinds on. There is too much to do and too little time to do it
in: the coursework keeps piling up, I forget to go shopping, Tiffin needs new
trousers, Wila needs new shoes, bils are waiting to be paid, Mum loses her
chequebook again. As she continues to fade stil further from family life,
Maya and I tacitly divide up the chores: she cleans, helps with homework,
does the bedtime routine; I shop, cook, sort out bils, colect Tiffin and Wila
from school. One thing neither of us can manage, however, is Kit. He has
started smoking openly now – albeit banished to the doorstep or the street.
Maya calmly talks to him about the health risks and he laughs in her face. I
try a firmer approach and earn myself a string of expletives. At the weekends
he goes out with a gang of troublemakers from school: I persuade Mum to
give me the money to buy him a second-hand mobile but he refuses to answer
it when I cal. I implore her to impose a curfew but she’s rarely around to
enforce it, or when she is, she stays out later than he does. I instal a curfew
myself and Kit immediately starts staying out even later, as if returning home
within the alotted time is a sign of weakness, of capitulation. And then the
inevitable happens: one night he doesn’t come home at al.
At two in the morning, after caling him repeatedly and getting redirected to
voicemail, I phone Mum in sheer desperation. She is in a club somewhere –
the background noise is deafening: music, shouting, cheering. As we’re
already in the smal hours of the morning, her speech is slurred and the fact
that her son has gone missing barely seems to register. Laughing and breaking
off every few words to talk to Dave, she informs me I need to learn to relax,
that Kit is a young man now and should have some fun. I am about to point
out he could be lying face down in a gutter when I suddenly realize I’m
wasting my breath. With Dave she can pretend she is young again, free of the
restrictions and responsibilities of motherhood. She never wanted to grow up
– I remember our father citing this as a reason for leaving. He accused her of
being a bad mother – but then the only reason they got married was because
she accidentaly fel pregnant with me – a fact she likes to remind me of
whenever we have an argument. And now that I am just a few months away
from being legaly classed an adult, she feels freer than she has done in years.
Dave already has a young family of his own. He has made it very clear that he
doesn’t want to take on someone else’s. And so she shrewdly keeps him away,
only bringing him back to the house when everyone is asleep or out at school.
With Dave she has reinvented herself – a young woman caught up in a
passionate romance. She dresses like a teenager, spends al her money on
clothes and beauty treatments, lies about her age, and drinks, drinks, drinks –
to forget that youth and beauty are behind her, to forget that Dave has no
intention of marrying her, to forget that at the end of the day she is just a
forty-five-year-old divorcee in a dead-end job with five unwanted children.
Yet understanding the reasons behind her behaviour does little to stem the
hate.
It is now half past two and I am beginning to panic. Seated on the sofa,
strategicaly positioned so that the weak light of the naked bulb fals directly on
my books, I have been straining to read through my notes for at least three
hours, the scrawled words bleeding into each other, dancing about the page.
Maya came to say good-night over an hour ago, purple shadows beneath her
eyes, her freckles contrasting starkly with the palor of her skin. I am stil in my
uniform, the usual ink-stained cuffs pushed up, shirt half unbuttoned. From
deep within my skul, a metalic shaft of pain bores its way through my right
temple. Once again I glance up at the clock and my insides knot in fear and
rage. I stare at my ghostly reflection in the darkened windowpane. My eyes
hurt, my whole body throbs with stress and exhaustion. I have not the
slightest idea what to do.
Part of me simply wants to blot the whole thing out – go to bed and just pray
Kit is back by the time I wake up in the morning. But another part of me is
forced to remember that he is little more than a child. An unhappy, selfdestructive child who has got in with the wrong crowd because they provide
him with the company and admiration his family do not. He could have been
in a fight, he could be mainlining heroin, he could be breaking the law and
screwing up his life before it has even begun.
Worse stil, he could be the victim of a mugger or some rival gang – his
behaviour has begun to earn him quite a reputation in the area. He could be
lying bleeding somewhere, knifed or shot. He may hate me, he may resent
me, he may blame me for everything that’s wrong in his life, but if I give up
on him, then he has no one left at al. His hatred of me wil have been
completely justified. Yet what can I possibly do? He refuses to share any part
of his life with me, so I don’t know any of his friends or where he hangs out. I
don’t even have a bike to go combing the streets with.
The clock now reads a quarter to three: nearly five hours after Kit’s weekend
curfew. He never actualy comes home before ten but rarely stays out much
past eleven. What places around here are even open at this time? Nightclubs
require ID – he has a fake one but even an idiot couldn’t mistake him for an
eighteen-year-old. He has never been anywhere near as late as this before.
Fear snakes into my mind. It curls around itself, its body pressing against the
wals of my skul.
This is not rebelion: something has happened. Kit is in trouble and no one is
there to help him. I feel clammy and shivery with sweat. I have no choice but
to go out and walk the streets, searching for an open bar, a nightclub –
anything. But first I need to wake Maya so she can cal me if Kit returns. My
mind flashes back to the exhaustion imprinted on her face and the thought of
dragging her out of bed sickens me, but I have no choice.
My first knock is far too soft – I’m afraid of waking the little ones. But if Kit
is hurt or in trouble, there is no time to lose. I turn the handle and push the
door open. Lamplight fals through the gap in the curtains, iluminating her
sleeping face, her tawny hair fanned out over the pilow. She has kicked back
the sheet and is sleeping face down, splayed out like a starfish, knickers in ful
view.
I bend down and gently shake her. ‘Maya?’
‘Mm . . .’ She rols away from me in protest.
I try again. ‘Maya, wake up, it’s me.’
‘Huh?’ Roling onto her side, she props herself up on her elbow, looking up at
me groggily, blinking beneath a curtain of hair.
‘Maya, I need your help.’ The words come out louder than I intended, the
mounting panic catching in my throat.
‘What?’ She is suddenly alert, struggling to sit up, brushing the hair away
from her face. She flicks on the bedside light and squints at me, wincing.
‘What’s going on?’
‘It’s Kit – he hasn’t come home and it’s almost three. I – I think I should go
and look for him. I think something must have happened.’
She squeezes her eyes shut and then opens them wide again, as if trying to
gather her thoughts.
‘Kit’s stil out?’
‘Yes!’
‘Have you tried his mobile?’
I recount my futile attempts at getting through to both Kit and Mum. Maya
stumbles out of bed and folows me down into the halway as I hunt for my
keys. ‘But, Lochie, d’you have any idea where he could be?’
‘No, I’l just have to look . . .’ I rummage through my jacket pockets and then
through the pile of junk mail and unopened bils on the hal table, sending them
flying. My hands have started shaking.
‘Jesus, where the fuck are my keys?’
‘Lochie, you’re never going to find him by combing the streets. He could be
on the other side of London!’
I spin round to face her. ‘What the hel d’you suggest I do then?’
I startle myself with the force of my voice. Maya takes a step back.
I stop and heave a deep breath, cupping my hands over my mouth, then
running them through my hair. ‘Sorry. I just – I just don’t know what to do.
Mum was incoherent on the phone. I couldn’t even persuade the bitch to
come home!’ I choke on the word bitch and find myself with barely enough
breath to finish speaking.
‘OK,’ Maya says quickly. ‘OK, Lochie. I’l stay down here and wait. And I’l
cal you the moment he turns up. Have you got your phone?’
I feel the pockets of my trousers. ‘No – shit – and my keys—’
‘Here . . .’ Maya reaches for her coat on the peg and digs out her phone and
keys. Grabbing them, I wrench open the door.
‘Wait!’ She throws me my jacket.
I pul it on as I stride out into the cold night air.
It’s dark, the houses al sleeping save for a few stil iluminated with the
flickering blue light of television screens. The silence is eerie – I can hear the
juggernauts shifting their loads miles away on the ridge of the motorway. I
walk rapidly down to the end of our road and turn onto the high street.
The place has a deserted, haunted look, the shop shutters battened down over
their dark interiors.
Trash from the market stal stil litters the street, a drunk staggers out of the alnight Tesco and two skimpily clad young women weave their way across the
pavement arm in arm, shril voices crisscrossing the stil night air. Suddenly a
car, pulsating with music, accelerates down the road, narrowly missing the
drunk, its tyres screeching as it takes a corner. I spot a group of guys hanging
around a closed pub. They are al dressed the same: grey hoodies, baggy jeans
sliding down their hips, white trainers. But as I cross the road and head
towards them, I realize they are far too old to be part of Kit’s lot. I quickly
turn my head away again, but one of them shouts out: ‘Hey, what the fuck you
lookin’ at?’
I ignore them and keep on going, hands deep in my pockets, fighting the
instinct to lengthen my stride. Like wolves, they folow the scent of fear. For a
moment I think they’re going to come after me, but it’s only their laughter and
obscenities that float in my wake.
My heart continues to pound as I reach the end of the high street and cross the
junction, my mind running at ful tilt. This is exactly why a thirteen-year-old
boy should not be roaming the streets at this time of night. Those guys were
bored: drunk or high or both, and just looking for a fight. At least one would
have had a weapon of some sort – a broken bottle, if not a knife. Gone are the
days of simple fist-fights, especialy round here. And what chance would a
hot-head like Kit stand against a gang?
It is beginning to drizzle and the headlights of passing taxis splinter the dark,
iluminating the wet tarmac. I cross the junction blindly and get honked at by
an irritable cabbie. I wipe the sweat from my face with my shirtsleeve,
adrenaline coursing through my body. The sudden wail of a police car makes
me start violently; the sound fades into the distance and I jump again as a
cacophony of demented yaps explodes from my pocket. When I pul out
Maya’s phone, my hands are shaking. ‘What?’ I shout.
‘He’s back, Lochie. He’s home.’
‘What?’
‘Kit’s back. He came through the door just this second. So you can come
home. Where are you, anyway?’
‘Bentham Junction. I’l see you in a minute.’
I return the phone to my pocket and turn round. Chest heaving, my breath
coming in gasps, I watch the late-night cars flash by. Right, calm down, I tel
myself. He’s home. He’s fine. But I can feel the sweat running down my back
and there is this pressure in my chest like a baloon that’s about to burst.
I am walking too fast, breathing too fast, thinking too fast. There’s a stabbing
pain in my side and my heart is pounding against my ribcage. He’s home, I
keep teling myself. He’s OK – but I don’t know why I don’t feel more
relieved. In fact I feel physicaly sick. I was so sure something bad had
happened to him. Why else would he have failed to answer his phone – to
cal?
As I near the house, the streetlamps blur and dance, and everything feels
strangely unreal. My hands are shaking so hard I can’t unlock the door: the
metal keys keep slipping in my clammy fingers.
I end up dropping them and lean one hand against the door to steady myself
as I bend down to search. When the door suddenly opens, I stumble blindly
into the brightly lit hal.
‘Hey, watch out.’ Maya’s hand steadies me.
‘Where is he?’
The sound of canned laughter belts out of the front room and I push past. Kit
is lying back, one arm behind his head, feet up on the couch, chuckling at
something on TV. He reeks of cigarettes and booze and weed.
Suddenly the compressed anger of so many months explodes through my
body like molten rock.
‘Where the hel have you been?’
Spinning the remote round and round in his hand, he takes a moment before
flicking his eyes briefly away from the screen. ‘Absolutely none of your
business.’ His gaze returns to the television and he starts chuckling again,
turning up the volume, pre-emptively drowning out any further attempts at
conversation.
I lunge for the remote and snatch it from his hand, catching him unawares.
‘Give that back, you arsehole!’ He is on his feet in an instant, grabbing my
arm and twisting it.
‘It’s four in the morning! What the fuck have you been doing?’
I grapple with him, trying to push him off, but he is surprisingly strong. A bolt
of pain shoots up my arm from my hand to my shoulder, and the remote fals
to the floor. As Kit makes a dive for it, I grab his shoulders and yank him
back. He hurls himself round, and there is a blinding crack of pain as his fist
makes contact with my jaw. I launch myself at him, grabbing him by the
colar, losing my balance and dragging him down to the floor. My head hits the
coffee table and for a moment the lights seem to go out, but then I resurface
and I’ve got my hands round his throat and his face is crimson, his eyes wide
and bulging. He kicks me in the stomach, again and again, but I don’t let go, I
can’t let go, even when he knees me in the groin. There is someone else
puling at my hands, someone else in the way, someone shouting at me,
screaming in my ear: ‘Stop it, Lochie, stop it! You’re going to kil him!’
I’ve let go, he’s got away, doubled over on hands and knees, coughing and
retching, strings of saliva hanging from his mouth. Someone is restraining me
from behind, pinning my arms to my sides, but al the strength has suddenly
left me and I can barely sit up. I hear gasping sounds from Kit as he lurches to
his feet, and suddenly he is towering over me.
‘You ever touch me again and I’l kil you.’ His voice is hoarse and rasping. I
hear him leave, hear him thunder up the wooden stairs, hear the sound of a
wailing child. I seem to be faling, except the carpet is solid beneath me and
the cold hard wal presses against my back. Through a dim haze I see Wila
wrap her legs around Maya’s waist as Maya lifts her into a hug and murmurs,
‘It’s al right, it’s al right, my love – they just had a sily argument.
Everything’s fine now. Let’s go back upstairs and tuck you into bed, OK?’
They leave the room and the wails fade but continue above me, on and on and
on.
My legs are unsteady as I make my way to my room. Safely inside, I sit down
on the edge of the bed, elbows on knees, cupping my hands over my nose and
mouth, trying to stop hyperventilating, the pain in my stomach sending smal
aftershocks through my body. I feel sweat running down the sides of my face
and cannot stop trembling. The halo round the light bulb above me expands
and retracts, creating dancing spots of light. The ful horror of what happened
is only just starting to hit me. I have never got into any kind of physical fight
with Kit before, yet tonight I provoked one, I almost wanted one; once I’d got
my hands round his throat, I honestly didn’t want to let go. I don’t understand
what’s happening to me – I seem to be unraveling. So Kit came home a few
hours late – what teenager hasn’t? Parents get angry with their children, sure:
they shout, threaten, swear at them maybe, but they don’t try to strangle them.
The knock on the door sends another jolt through my body. But it’s only
Maya, looking completely wiped out as she sags against the doorframe.
‘Are you al right?’
Hands stil covering my mouth, I nod, desperate for her to leave but unable to
speak. She observes me soberly in the gloom, hesitates for a moment, then
switches on my overhead light and comes in.
I take my hands away from my face, clenching them into fists to stop them
shaking. ‘I’m fine,’ I say, my voice raw and ragged. ‘We should al just go to
bed.’
‘You don’t look fine.’ She closes the door and leans against it, her eyes huge,
her expression unreadable. I can’t tel if she’s angry, horrified, disgusted . . .
‘Maya, I’m sorry, I – I just lost it . . .’ A jagged pain runs through me.
‘I know, Loch, I know.’
I want to tel her just how sorry I am. I want to ask her whether Wila is OK. I
want to ask her to check on Kit, make sure he’s not packing his bags and
planning to run away, reassure me that I haven’t hurt him, even though I know
I have. But I can’t get the words out. Only the sound of my heaving breaths
fils the air. I press my hands against my nose and mouth to try to muffle the
sound, push my elbows down hard against my knees in an effort to stop
shaking, and find myself rocking back and forth without knowing why.
Peeling herself off the door, Maya moves towards me, taking a seat beside me
on the bed.
Instinctively my arm flies up to ward her off. ‘Maya, d-don’t – I don’t need
—’
She takes my outstretched hand and gently puls it onto her lap, rubbing my
palm in circular motions with her thumb. ‘Try and relax.’ Her voice is gentle
– too gentle. ‘It’s al right. Everyone’s OK. Wila’s gone back to sleep and Kit’s
fine.’
I shift away from her, struggling to disengage my hand from hers. ‘I – I just
need some sleep . . .’
‘I know you do, but you have to calm down first.’
‘I’m trying!’
Her face is pinched with concern and I’m aware that the sight of me in this
state is doing little to reassure her. Her fingers are warm on my wrist, moving
up to stroke the inside of my arm, the touch of her hand somehow comforting.
‘Lochie, it wasn’t your fault.’
I bite down hard and turn away.
‘It wasn’t your fault,’she says again. ‘Lochie, you know that. Kit’s been
trying to provoke you into something like this for ages. Anyone would have
snapped.’
There is a mounting pain at the back of my throat, a warning pressure behind
my eyes.
‘You can’t keep blaming yourself for everything, just because you’re the
eldest. None of this is your fault – Mum’s drinking, Dad leaving, Kit turning
out the way he has. There’s nothing more you could have done.’
I don’t know how she’s figured al this out. I don’t understand how she is able
to read my mind like this. I turn to face the wal, shaking my head to tel her
she’s wrong. I pul my hand away from hers and rub the side of my face,
trying to shield it from view.
‘Lochie . . .’
No. I can’t take this any more, I can’t, I can’t. I’m not even going to get her
out of the room before it’s too late. My eyes pulsate with a rising ache. If I
move, if I speak, if I so much as blink, I’m going to lose this battle.
Her hand touches my shoulder, strokes my back. ‘It’s not always going to be
like this.’
A tear skims the side of my cheek. I put my hand up to my eyes to stop the
next one. My fingers are suddenly wet. I take a deep breath and try to hold it,
but a smal sound escapes.
‘Oh – Loch, no. Don’t – not over this!’ Maya sounds softly desperate.
I move closer to the wal, wishing I could disappear into it. I press my fist hard
against my mouth.
Then the bottled breath explodes from my lungs with a violent choking sound.
‘Hey, hey . . .’ Despite her reassuring tone, I recognize the note of panic.
‘Lochie, please, listen to me. Just listen. Tonight was hideous, but it’s not the
end of the world. I know things have been realy, realy tough recently, but it’s
al right, it’s al right. Kit’s fine. You’re only human. These things happen .
. .’
I try to dry my eyes on my shirtsleeve, but the tears keep coming and I can’t
understand why I am so utterly powerless to stop them.
‘Shh, come here—’ Maya tries to pul me round to face her, I push her roughly
away. She tries again. Frenziedly I fend her off with one arm.
‘Don’t! Maya, stop it, for chrissakes – please! Please! I can’t – I can’t—!’ The
sobs burst out with each word. I can’t breathe, I’m terrified, I’m faling apart.
‘Lochie, calm down. I just want to hold you, that’s al. Just let me hold you.’
Her voice adopts the soothing tone she uses when Tiffin or Wila are upset.
She’s not going to give up.
I scrape the fingernails of one hand against the wal, violent sobs running in
shock waves through my body, tears soaking my sleeve. ‘Help,’ I find myself
gasping. ‘I don’t understand what’s wrong with me!’
Maya slides into the space between me and the wal, and suddenly there is
nowhere for me to hide any more. As she puts her arms around me and puls
me close, I try to resist one final time, but I am drained of al strength. Her
body is warm against mine – alive, familiar, reassuring. I press my face
against the curve of her neck, my hands clutching at the back of her
nightdress as if she might suddenly disappear.
‘I – I didn’t mean to – I didn’t mean to – Maya, I didn’t mean to!’
‘I know you didn’t mean to, Lochie. I know that, I know.’
She is talking to me softly now, almost whispering, one arm wrapped tightly
around me, the other stroking the back of my head, rocking me gently back
and forth. I cling to her as the sobs rack my body with such force, I think I wil
never be able to stop.
CHAPTER EIGHT.
Maya.
I open my eyes and find myself staring up at an unfamiliar ceiling. My head
feels fuzzy with sleep, and it isn’t until I find myself blinking over at a desk
laden with A-level textbooks, a chair covered in discarded shirts and trousers,
that I remember where I am. There is a distinctive smel too – not unpleasant,
but unmistakably Lochan. A slight weight on my chest prompts me to look
down, and with a start I see an arm slung over my ribcage, bitten-down
fingernails, a large black digital watch secured around the wrist. Lochan is
fast asleep by my side, stretched out on his front, pressed up against the wal,
his arm draped over me.
My mind flashes back to the previous night and I remember the fight,
remember coming up and finding him in a realy bad way, the shock of seeing
him on the verge of tears, the feeling of horror and helplessness as he broke
down and sobbed – the first time since the day Dad left. Seeing him like that
sucked me back through the years, back to the day Dad came to the house for
that ‘special goodbye’
before catching the flight that was to take him and his new wife to the other
side of the world. There were presents, and photos of the new house with the
pool, and promises of school holidays with him there, and assurances that he
would be back regularly. The others had naturaly bought into the whole
charade – they were stil so young – but somehow Lochan and I sensed that
was it, we would not be seeing our dad again – ever. And it wasn’t long
before we were proved right.
The weekly phone cals became monthly, then only on special occasions, then
stopped altogether.
When Mum told us his new wife had just given birth, we knew it was only a
matter of time before even the birthday presents ceased. And cease they did.
Everything ceased. Even Mum’s child support.
We older two had expected it – just never guessed he would erase us al from
his life quite so fast. I clearly remember that moment after the final goodbye,
after the front door had closed and the sound of Dad’s car faded down the
street. Huddled up against the pilows with my new cuddly dog and the picture
of the house I knew I’d never get to visit, I was suddenly overcome by a huge
surge of rage and hatred for a father who had once claimed to love me so
much. But to my surprise and annoyance, Lochan had seemed to go along
with it al, rejoicing with the others at the idea of us al jetting off to Australia
some day soon. I actualy thought he was stupid. I sulked and ignored him al
day while he forced himself through his charade. Only later that night, once
he thought I was asleep, did he break down – softly sobbing into his pilow in
the bunk above mine. He had been inconsolable then too –
fighting me off when I attempted to give him a hug before finaly giving in,
letting me snuggle under the duvet and cry with him. We’d promised each
other then that even when we grew up, we would always stay together. Finaly,
exhausted and al cried out, we’d falen asleep. And now here we are, five
years on, and so much has changed, and yet so little.
It feels strange, lying here in Lochan’s bed with him sleeping beside me. Wila
used to climb into bed with me whenever she had nightmares – in the
morning I’d wake up to find her smal body pressed against mine. This is
Lochan though: my brother, my protector. Seeing his arm slung so casualy
across me makes me smile – he would be very quick to remove it if he woke.
I don’t want him to wake up just yet though. His leg is pressed against mine,
squashing it slightly. He is stil in his school clothes, his shoulder heavy
against my arm, pinning it to the bed. I am wel and truly wedged in
– in fact we both are: his other arm has disappeared down the narrow crack
between the mattress and the wal. I turn my head gingerly to see if he looks as
if he might wake up anytime soon. He doesn’t.
He is sound asleep, taking those long, deep, rhythmical breaths, his face
turned towards me. It’s not often that I have him so near – not since we were
young. It is strange to observe him at such close range: I see things I’ve
barely noticed before. The way his hair, drenched in a shaft of sunlight
slanting through the curtains, is not quite jet-black but actualy contains
streaks of golden brown. I can make out a pattern in the fine tracing of veins
beneath the skin of his temples, even distinguish the individual hairs of his
eyebrows. The faint white scar above his left eye from a childhood fal has not
completely faded, and his eyelids are fringed with surprisingly long dark
lashes. My eyes folow the smooth ridge of his nose down to the bow of his
upper lip, so clearly defined now that his mouth is relaxed. His skin is
smooth, almost translucent; the only blemish a self-inflicted sore beneath his
mouth where his teeth have repeatedly rubbed, chafed and scraped at the skin
to leave a smal crimson wound: a reminder of his ongoing battle with the
world around him. I want to stroke it away, erase the hurt, the stress, the
loneliness.
I find myself thinking back to Francie’s comment. A kissable mouth . . . What
does that mean exactly? At the time I thought it was funny, I don’t any more. I
wouldn’t want Francie to kiss Lochan’s mouth. I wouldn’t want anyone to. He
is my brother, my best friend. The idea of anyone seeing him like this, so
close, so exposed, is suddenly unbearable. What if they hurt him, broke his
heart? I don’t want him to fal in love with some girl – I want him to stay here,
loving us. Loving me.
He shifts slightly, his arm sliding up my ribcage. I can feel his sweaty warmth
against my side. The way his nostrils contract slightly each time he inhales
reminds me of the tenuous, precarious hold we al have on life. Asleep, he
looks so vulnerable it frightens me.
There are shouts, yelps from downstairs. Thundering feet on the stairs. A loud
bang against the door. Tiffin’s unmistakable, over-excited voice yeling,
‘Homey! Homey!’
Lochan’s arm contracts and he opens his eyes with a start. For a long moment
he just stares at me, emerald irises flecked with blue, his face very stil. Then
his expression begins to change.
‘What – what’s going on?’
I smile at the blurriness of his speech. ‘Nothing. I’m stuck.’
He glances down at his arm, stil slung across my chest, and retracts it quickly,
struggling to sit up.
‘Why are you—? What on earth are you doing here?’ He looks disorientated
and slightly panicked for a moment, tousled hair hanging in his eyes, face
hazy with sleep. The imprint of the pilow has left scarlet indentations across
his cheek.
‘We were talking late last night, remember?’ I don’t want to mention the fight,
or its aftermath. ‘I guess we both just crashed out.’ I pul myself up against the
head-board, curl my legs up beneath me and stretch. ‘I haven’t been able to
move for the last fifteen minutes because you were half crushing me.’
He has retreated to the far end of the bed, leaning against the wal, dropping
his head back with a thud. He closes his eyes for a moment. ‘I feel rough,’ he
murmurs as if to himself, hugging his knees, his torso limp and yielding.
Concern grips me: it’s not like Lochan to complain. ‘Where does it hurt?’
He releases his breath with a ghost of smile. ‘Everywhere.’
The smile fades when I don’t return it and he holds me with his gaze, eyes
heavy with sadness.
‘Today’s Saturday, right?’
‘Yes, but everything’s fine. Mum’s up – I heard her voice a few minutes ago.
And Kit’s up too. It sounds like they’re al downstairs having breakfast or
brunch or something.’
‘Oh. OK. Good.’ Lochan sighs in relief and closes his eyes again. I don’t like
the way he is talking, sitting, behaving. He seems helpless somehow, in pain
and utterly defeated. There is a long silence. He doesn’t open his eyes.
‘Lochie?’ I venture softly.
‘Yeah.’ He looks at me with a start and blinks rapidly as if attempting to
engage his brain.
‘Stay here while I get you some coffee and painkilers, OK?’
‘No, no . . .’ He catches me by the wrist to restrain me. ‘I’m fine. I’l wake up
properly once I’ve had a shower.’
‘OK. There’s paracetamol in the bathroom cabinet.’
He gazes blankly at me. ‘Right,’ he says duly.
Nothing happens. He doesn’t move. I begin to feel uneasy.
‘You’re not looking too good, you know,’ I inform him gently. ‘How about
you get back into bed for a bit and I’l bring you breakfast?’
He turns his head to look at me again. ‘No – seriously, Maya, I’m fine. Just
give me a minute, OK?’
The unspoken rule in our family is that Lochan is never il. Even last winter,
when he had flu and a high temperature, he insisted he was wel enough to do
the school run.
‘Then I’m going to get you some coffee,’ I declare abruptly, jumping up from
the bed. ‘Go and have a hot shower and—’
He stops me, catching my hand before I reach the door. ‘Maya . . .’
I turn, tightening my fingers around his. ‘What?’
His jaw tenses and I see him swalow. His eyes seem to be searching mine,
hoping for something –
a sign of understanding perhaps. ‘I can’t – I realy don’t think I can—’ He
breaks off, breathing deeply. I wait. ‘I don’t think I’ve got the energy to do the
whole family meal thing today.’ He puls an apologetic face.
‘Wel, of course I’l do it, you sily!’ I think for a moment and begin to smile.
‘Hey, I’ve got an even better idea.’
‘What?’ He looks hopeful suddenly.
I grin. ‘I’l get rid of them al – you’l see.’
I stand in the doorway for a moment, soaking up the chaos. They are seated
around the kitchen table, a mess of Coco Pops, Coke cans, Jaffa Cakes and
crisps strewn out in front of them. Mum must have sent Tiffin to the corner
shop when she discovered only muesli and brown bread for breakfast.
But at least she’s up before noon, albeit stil in her sleazy pink dressing gown,
her blonde hair uncombed, great bags beneath her bloodshot eyes. Judging by
the ashtray, she has already been through half a packet of cigarettes, but
despite her appearance, she seems surprisingly spry and perky, helped no
doubt by the shot of whisky I can smel in her coffee.
‘Princess!’ She holds out her arms. ‘You look like an angel in that dress.’
‘Mum, this is the same nightie I’ve been wearing for the last four years,’ I
inform her with a sigh.
Mum just smiles complacently, my words barely registering, but Kit chuckles
through a mouthful of Coco Pops, showering the table. I’m relieved to see
that he looks none the worse for his run-in with Lochan last night. Beside
him, Tiffin is trying to juggle with three oranges from the fruit bowl, his sugar
levels clearly sky-high. Wila is talking rapidly and indistinctly, her mouth
crammed to capacity, chocolate smeared across her chin. I make some coffee,
retrieve the muesli from the cupboard and start slicing the bread on the
sideboard.
‘Wanna Mars bar?’ Tiffin offers me generously.
‘No thanks, Tiff. And I think you’ve probably had enough chocolate for
today. Remember what happens when you have too much sugar?’
‘I get sent to the head,’ Tiffin responds automaticaly. ‘But I ain’t at school
now.’
‘I’m not at school now,’ I correct him. ‘Hey, guess what, I’ve had a realy good
idea for a family day out!’
‘Oh, how lovely!’ Mum exclaims eagerly. ‘Where are you going to take
them?’
‘Actualy I was thinking of a day out with the whole family,’ I continue
jovialy, careful to keep the edge out of my voice. ‘And we’d definitely want
you to come too, Mum!’
Kit glances up at me with dark, mistrustful eyes, snorting in derision. ‘Yeah,
let’s go to the seaside or something and have a fucking picnic and pretend
we’re just one big happy family.’
‘Where, where?’ Tiffin shouts.
‘Wel, I was thinking we could al go to—’
‘The zoo, the zoo!’ Wila cries, practicaly faling off her chair in excitement.
‘No, the park!’ Tiffin counters. ‘We can play three-aside footbal.’
‘How about the bowling aley?’ Kit suggests unexpectedly. ‘They have arcade
games there.’
I smile indulgently. ‘We might be able to do al three. There’s a massive
fairground that’s just opened in Battersea Park – there’s a zoo on the other
side of the park, and I think the fairground even has arcade games, Kit.’
A flicker of interest registers in his eyes.
‘Mum, wil you buy me candyfloss?’ Tiffin yels.
‘And me, and me!’ Wila shrieks.
Mum smiles wanly. ‘A day out with al my bunnies. How lovely.’
‘But you’l al have to get ready double quick,’ I warn. ‘It’s almost noon.’
‘Mum, come on!’ Tiffin yels at her. ‘You gotta put on al your make-up and get
dressed right now!’
‘Just one last ciggie . . .’
But Tiffin and Wila have already gone tearing out of the room to put on their
coats and shoes.
Even Kit has swung his feet off the table.
‘Is Lochan coming on this little jaunt?’ Mum asks me, dragging heavily on
her cigarette. I notice Kit’s eyes sharpen suddenly.
‘No, he’s got a ton of homework to catch up on.’ I stop clearing the table
suddenly and slap a hand to my forehead. ‘Oh no. Damn!’
‘What’s the matter, sweetie?’
‘I completely forgot. I can’t come today. I promised I’d babysit the
Davidsons’ new baby this afternoon.’
Mum looks alarmed. ‘Wel, can’t you just cancel and say you’re il or
something?’
‘No, they’re going to a wedding and I told them I’d do it ages ago.’ I can’t
believe what a good liar I am. ‘Besides,’ I add pointedly, ‘we could do with
the money.’
Tiffin and Wila return to the kitchen, bundled up in their coats, and stop,
instantly sensing the change in atmosphere.
‘Clever Maya’s just realized we can’t go after al,’ Kit informs them.
‘We’l go tomorrow instead!’ Mum exclaims brightly. ‘Nooo!’ Tiffin’s howl is
one of despair.
Wila looks up at me accusingly, her blue eyes stricken.
‘But you can stil go with Mum,’ I say casualy, carefuly avoiding her gaze.
Tiffin and Wila turn to gaze at her, their eyes pleading. ‘Mum! Mum,
pleeeease!’
‘Oh, al right, al right,’she sighs, shooting me a pained, almost angry look.
‘Anything for my babies.’
As Mum goes upstairs to get dressed and Tiffin and Wila tear about the house
in a sugar-induced frenzy, Kit returns his feet to the table and starts idly
flicking through a comic. ‘Wel, look how that turned out,’ he mutters without
looking up.
I feel myself tense but continue to clear the table. ‘What difference does it
make?’ I retort quietly.
‘Tiffin and Wila get to go out and have fun and you get five times your usual
pocket money to spend on arcades.’
‘I’m not complaining,’ he says. ‘I just think it’s touching the way you
fabricate this whole complicated lie just ’cos Lochan’s too ashamed to face
the fact that he’s a violent bastard.’
I stop cleaning the table, squeezing the sponge so hard that the warm, soapy
water runs through the cracks between my fingers.
‘Lochan doesn’t know anything about this, OK?’ I retort, my voice low with
repressed anger. ‘It was my idea. Because frankly, Kit, it’s the weekend, Tiffin
and Wila deserve to have a bit of fun, and Lochan and I are completely
shattered from running the house al week.’
‘I bet he is – after trying to kil me last night.’ He glares up at me now, his dark
eyes as hard as pebbles.
I find myself gripping the edge of the table. ‘From what I remember it was a
two-way deal. And Lochan’s so bashed up, he can hardly move.’
A slow grin of triumph spreads across Kit’s face. ‘Yeah, wel, I can’t say I’m
surprised. If he didn’t spend his days hiding in stairwels and actualy learned
to fight like a real—’
I slam my fist down on the table. ‘Don’t give me your macho gang bulshit,’ I
hiss in a furious whisper. ‘Last night wasn’t some kind of sick competition!
Lochan’s realy upset about what happened. He never wanted to hurt you.’
‘How very considerate of him,’ Kit replies, voice dripping with sarcasm, stil
flicking infuriatingly through his magazine. ‘But kind of hard to believe when
just a few hours ago he had his hands around my neck.’
‘You played a part in this too, you know. You punched him first!’ I glance
nervously at the closed kitchen door. ‘Look, I’m not going to get into an
argument with you about who started what. As far as the fight’s concerned,
you’re both as guilty as each other. But just ask yourself this: why the hel
d’you think Lochan was so upset in the first place? How many of your friends
have a brother who would stay up half the night waiting for them to return?
How many of them have a brother who would go scouring the streets at three
in the morning because he was afraid something terrible might have
happened? How many have brothers who shop for them, cook for them,
attend parent–teacher meetings and stick up for them when they’re suspended
from school? Don’t you get it, Kit? Lochan lost it last night because he cares
about you, because he loves you!’
Kit throws the magazine across the table, making me jump, his eyes igniting
in anger. ‘Did I ask him to do any of those things? D’you think I like having
to depend on my fucking brother for every little thing? No, you’re right, my
mates don’t have older brothers like that. They have brothers who hang out
with them, get pissed with them, help them get fake IDs and sneak them into
nightclubs and stuff. Whereas I’ve got a brother who tels me what time I’ve
got to be home and then beats me up if I’m late! He’s not my father! He may
pretend to care, but it’s only because he’s on some sick power trip! He doesn’t
love me like Dad did, but he sure as hel thinks he can tel me what to do every
second of the day!’
‘You’re right,’ I say quietly. ‘He doesn’t love us the way Dad did. Dad
buggered off halfway round the world with his new family the moment things
got tough. Lochan could have left school last year, got himself a job and
moved out. He could choose to run off next year to a university at the other
end of the country. But no, he’s only applying to ones in London, even though
his teachers were desperate for him to try for Oxbridge. He’s staying in
London so he can live here and look after us and make sure we’re al right.’
Kit manages to pul off a sardonic laugh. ‘You’re deluded, Maya. You know
why he isn’t going anywhere? ’Cos he’s too damn scared, that’s why. You’ve
seen him – he can’t even talk to his classmates without stammering like some
kind of retard. And he certainly isn’t staying here because of me. He’s staying
because he’s power-drunk – he gets his kicks from bossing Tiff and Wila
around
’cos it makes him feel better about the fact he can’t even articulate a single
word at school. And he’s staying here because he adores you, because you
always take his side in everything, you think he’s some kind of God, and his
sister’s the only friend he’s got in the world.’ He shakes his head. ‘How
pathetic is that?’
I stare at Kit, stare at the anger in his face, the colour in his cheeks, but most
of al at the sadness in his eyes. It pains me to see him stil hurting so much
about Dad and I keep reminding myself he’s only thirteen. But I just can’t
find a way to make him step out of his own selfcentred circle, even for a
second, and see the situation from any other viewpoint than his own.
Finaly, in desperation, I say, ‘Kit, I understand why you resent Lochan’s
position of authority, I realy do. But it’s not his fault that Dad left and it’s not
his fault that Mum’s the way she is. He’s just trying to look out for us because
there’s no one else. I promise you, Kit, Lochan would much rather have
remained your brother and friend. But just think – under the circumstances,
what else could he possibly have done? What choice did he ever have?’
When the front door finaly slams shut and the excited voices fade down the
street, I heave a sigh of relief and glance at the kitchen clock. How many
hours do we have until Tiffin and Wila start to bicker, Kit starts arguing about
money and Mum decides she has done more than enough to make up for her
absence al week? Factoring in travel time, we can expect three hours – four if
we’re lucky. I feel as if I should immediately start making the most of it, try
out al those things that I’m forever planning to do but putting off because
there is always something more pressing at hand . . . But suddenly it feels
absurdly luxurious just to be sitting here in the silent kitchen, the dappled
sunlight faling through the kitchen window and warming my face – not
thinking, not moving, not worrying about homework or arguing with Kit or
trying to control Tiffin or entertaining Wila. Just being. I feel I could stay here
for ever in the sunny, empty afternoon, slung sideways on a wooden chair, my
arms folded against the smooth curve of its back, watching the sunbeams
dance through the leaves, the branches peering in through the window,
creating swaying shadows on the tiled floor. The sound of silence fils the air
like a beautiful smel: no raised voices, no slamming doors, no pounding feet,
no deafening music or babbling cartoons. I close my eyes, warm sun
caressing my face and neck, filing my eyelids with a bright pink haze, and
rest my head on my folded arms.
I must have falen asleep, for time suddenly seems to have leaped forward and
I find myself sitting up in a shaft of bright white light, wincing and massaging
a crick in my neck and the stiffness in my arms. I stretch and stand up stiffly,
moving over to the kettle and filing it. Padding out into the corridor with two
steaming mugs and heading for the stairs, I hear the rustle of paper behind me
and turn.
Lochan has ensconced himself in the front room, lever arch files, textbooks
and copious notes spread out over the coffee table and carpet around him as
he sits on the floor against the edge of the couch, one leg stretched out
beneath the table, the other drawn up to prop open a hefty tome. He is looking
a lot better: much more relaxed in his favourite green T-shirt and faded jeans,
barefoot, his hair stil wet from the shower.
‘Thanks!’ Sliding the textbook off his lap, he takes the mug from me. He
leans back against the couch, blowing on his coffee as I sit down on the carpet
against the opposite wal, yawning and rubbing my eyes.
‘I’ve never seen anyone sleep with their head hanging off the back of a
wooden chair before –
was the couch not comfortable enough for you?’ His face lights up with a rare
smile. ‘So tel me –
how the hel did you get rid of the whole lot of them?’
I tel him about my fairground suggestion, my lie about the babysitting.
‘And you managed to persuade Kit to accompany them on this little family
outing?’
‘I told him there were arcade games at the fair.’
‘Are there?’
‘No idea.’
We both laugh. But Lochan’s amusement is quick to fade. ‘Did Kit seem . . . ?
Was he . . . ?’
‘Absolutely fine. In true antagonistic form.’
Lochan nods but his eyes remain troubled.
‘Honestly, Lochan. He’s fine. How’s the revision going?’ I ask quickly.
Shoving the huge textbook away from him in disgust, he emits a laboured
sigh. ‘I don’t understand this stuff. And if Mr Parris understood it, at least I
wouldn’t have to be teaching myself from some library book.’
I groan inwardly. I was hoping we’d go out and do something this afternoon –
take a long walk in the park or have a hot chocolate at Joe’s or even treat
ourselves to the cinema – but Lochan’s mocks are only three months away,
and trying to study over the Christmas break with the kids at home al day wil
be a nightmare. I can’t say I’m particularly bothered about my AS-levels –
unlike Lochan I’m just sticking to the subjects I find easiest. My strange
brother, on the other hand, has decided, for reasons best known to himself, to
take on his two most chalenging subjects, further maths and physics, as wel as
English and history, the two big essay ones. My sympathy is limited: just like
our ex-father, he’s a natural academic.
Absent-mindedly sipping his coffee, he picks up his pen again and starts
sketching some complex diagram on the nearest scrap of paper, labeling the
various shapes and symbols with ilegible code.
Closing his eyes for a moment, he proceeds to pick up the scrap and compare
it to the diagram in the book. Crumpling up the sheet, he tosses it across the
room in disgust and starts chewing his lip.
‘Perhaps you need a break,’ I suggest, looking up from the newspaper spread
out at my side.
‘Why the hel can’t I get this to stick?’ He gazes at me imploringly, as if
hoping I wil magicaly conjure up the answer. I look at his pale face, the
shadows beneath his eyes and think: Because you’re exhausted.
‘D’you want me to test you?’
‘Yeah, cheers. Just give me a minute.’
As he returns to his textbook and his diagrams and scribbles, his eyes narrow
in concentration and he continues to gnaw at his lip. I flick idly through the
paper, my mind flitting briefly to the French homework buried at the bottom
of my bag, before deciding it can wait. I reach the sports section without
finding a single article of interest and, suddenly bored, stretch out on my
stomach and pul one of Lochan’s files off the coffee table. Leafing through it,
I glance enviously at the pages and pages of essays, invariably accompanied
by nothing but ticks and exclamations of praise. Nothing but As and A stars –
I wonder if next year I could get away with passing off some of Lochan’s
work as my own.
They’d think I’d morphed into a genius overnight. A recent piece of creative
writing makes me pause: an essay, written less than a week ago, its usual list
of superlatives in the margins. But it’s the teacher’s comment at the end that
catches my attention:
An extremely evocative, powerful depiction of a young man’s inner turmoil,
Lochan. This is a beautifully crafted story about suffering and the human
psyche.
Beneath this panegyric, in large letters, the teacher has added: Please at least
consider reading this out in class. It would really inspire the others and would
be good practice for you ahead of your presentation.
My curiosity aroused, I leaf back through the pages and start reading
Lochan’s essay. It’s about a young man, an undergraduate, returning to
university in the summer break to find out whether he has got his degree.
Joining the throngs that crowd the display boards, the guy discovers to his
astonishment that he has received a first, the only one in his department. But
instead of elation, he feels only a sense of emptiness, and as he moves away
from the crowds of students hugging distressed friends or celebrating with
others, nobody seems to notice him, no one even looks in his direction. He
receives not one single word of congratulation. My first thought is that this is
some kind of ghost story
– that this guy, at some point between sitting finals and coming back to find
out his results, has died in an accident or something – but an eventual greeting
from one of his professors, who manages to mispronounce his name, proves
me wrong. The guy is very much alive. Yet, as he turns his back on the
department and crosses the quad, he looks up at the tal buildings that surround
him, trying to gauge which one wil guarantee him a fatal fal.
The story ends and I raise my head from the page, stunned and shaken, blown
away by the strength of the prose and suddenly close to tears. I glance across
at Lochan, who is drumming his fingers on the carpet, eyes closed, chanting
some physics formula under his breath. I try to imagine him writing this
tragicaly poignant piece, and fail. Who could think up such a story? Who
would be able to write about something like this so vividly unless they had
experienced such pain, such desperation, such alienation themselves . . . ?
Lochan opens his eyes and looks right at me. ‘The force per unit length
between long paralel straight current-carrying conductors: F equals mu to the
power of zero, iota to the power of one, iota to the power of two over two pi r
. . . Oh, for chrissakes let it be right!’
‘Your story is incredible.’
He blinks at me. ‘What?’
‘The English essay you wrote last week.’ I glance down at the pages in my
hand. ‘Tall Buildings.’
Lochan’s eyes sharpen suddenly and I see him tense. ‘What are you doing?’
‘I was flicking through your English file and I found this.’ I hold it aloft.
‘Did you read it?’
‘Yes. It’s bloody good.’
He looks away, appearing acutely uncomfortable. ‘It was just taken from
something I saw on TV.
Could you test me on this now?’
‘Wait . . .’ I refuse to let him brush this aside so easily. ‘Why did you write
this? Who’s the story about?’
‘Nobody. It’s just a story, OK?’ He sounds angry suddenly, his eyes darting
away from mine.
The essay stil in my hand, I don’t move, giving him a long, hard look.
‘You think it’s about me? It’s not about me.’ His voice rises defensively.
‘OK, Lochan. OK.’ I realize I have no choice but to back off.
He is chewing his lip hard, aware that I’m not convinced. ‘Wel, you know,
sometimes you take a few things from your own life, change them, exaggerate
parts,’ he concedes, turning away.
I take a deep breath. ‘Have you ever—? Do you sometimes feel like this?’
I brace myself for another angry reaction. But instead he just gazes blankly at
the opposite wal. ‘I think – I think maybe everyone does . . . now and again.’
I realize this is the closest I’m going to get to an admission and his words
make my throat ache.
‘But you know – you do know you’l never ever find yourself alone like the
guy in your story, right?’ I say in a rush.
‘Yeah, yeah, of course.’ He gives a quick shrug.
‘Because, Lochan, you’l always have someone who loves you – just you –
more than anybody in the world.’
We are silent for a moment and Lochan goes back to his formulae, but the
colour is stil high in his cheeks and I can tel he’s not realy taking anything in.
I glance back down at the teacher’s scrawled message at the end.
‘So, hey – did you ever read this out in class?’ I ask brightly.
He looks up at me with a laboured sigh. ‘Maya, you know I’m crap at stuff
like that.’
‘But this is so good!’
He puls a face. ‘Thanks, but even if that were true, it wouldn’t make any
difference.’
‘Oh, Lochie . . .’
Drawing up his knees, he leans back against the couch, turning his head to
gaze out of the window. ‘I’ve got to give this damn presentation soon,’ he
says quietly. ‘I don’t know – I realy don’t know what the hel to do.’ He seems
to be asking me for help.
‘Did you ask if you could hand it in as a written assignment?’
‘Yes, but it’s that crazy Aussie. I’m teling you, she’s got it in for me.’
‘From the comments and the grades she’s been giving you, it’s clear she
thinks pretty highly of you,’ I point out gently.
‘It’s not that. She wants – she wants to turn me into some kind of orator.’ He
gives a strained laugh.
‘Maybe it’s time you alowed yourself to be converted,’ I suggest tentatively.
‘Just a little bit. Just enough to give it a go.’
A long silence. ‘Maya, you know I can’t.’ He turns away suddenly, looking
out of the window at two boys on bikes doing stunts in the street. ‘It – it feels
like people are burning me with their stares.
Like there’s no air left in my body. I get the stupid shakes, my heart pounds,
and the words just – they just disappear. My mind goes completely blank and
I can’t even make out the writing on the page. I can’t speak loud enough for
people to hear me, and I know that everyone’s just waiting – waiting for me to
fal apart so they can laugh. They al know – they al know I can’t do it—’ He
breaks off, the laughter gone from his eyes, his breathing shalow and rapid, as
if aware he has already said too much.
His thumb rubs back and forth over the sore. ‘Jesus, I know it’s not normal. I
know it’s something I’ve got to sort out. And – and I wil, I’m sure I wil. I
have to. How else can I ever get a job? I’l find a way. I’m not always going to
be like this . . .’ He takes a deep breath, tugging at his hair.
‘Of course you’re not,’ I reassure him quickly. ‘Once you’re free of Belmont,
the whole stupid school system—’
‘But I’l stil have to find a way to get through uni – and work, after that . . .’
His voice quavers suddenly and I see desperation in his eyes.
‘Have you talked to this English teacher about it?’ I ask. ‘She doesn’t sound
too bad, you know.
Maybe she could help. Give you some tips. Better than that useless counselor
they forced on you –
the one who made you do breathing exercises and asked whether you were
breast-fed as a baby!’
He starts laughing before I do. ‘Oh God, I’d almost forgotten about her – she
realy was a nutcase!’ He sobers suddenly. ‘But the thing is – the thing is, I
can’t – I realy can’t.’
‘You keep saying that,’ I point out gently. ‘But you massively underestimate
yourself, Lochie. I know you could read something out in class. Maybe not
start off with a whole presentation, but perhaps you could agree to read out
one of your essays. Something shorter, a bit less personal. You know, it’s like
with anything: once you take that first step, the next is a whole lot easier.’ I
break off with a smile. ‘You know who first told me that?’
He shakes his head and rols his eyes. ‘No clue. Martin Luther?’
‘You, Lochie. When you were trying to teach me to swim.’
He smiles briefly at the memory, then exhales slowly. ‘OK. Maybe I could try
. . .’ He shoots me a teasing grin. ‘The wise Maya has spoken.’
‘Indeed!’ I suddenly jump to my feet, deciding that on our rare day off a bit of
fun is caled for.
‘And in return for al this wisdom, I want you to do something for me!’
‘Uh-oh.’
I turn on the radio, tuning in to the first pop station I find. I turn to Lochan
and hold out my arms.
He groans, dropping his head back against the cushions. ‘Oh, Maya, please be
kidding!’
‘How am I supposed to practise without a partner?’ I protest.
‘I thought you’d given up salsa dancing!’
‘Only because they moved the lunchtime club to after school. Anyway, I’ve
learned loads of new moves from Francie.’ I push the coffee table out of the
way, pile up the papers and books, and reach down to grab his hand. ‘On your
feet, partner!’
With a dramatic show of reluctance, he obeys, muttering crossly about his
unfinished homework.
‘It’l restore the bloodflow to your brain,’ I tel him.
Trying not to look embarrassed and failing, Lochan stands in the middle of
the room with his hands in his pockets. I raise the volume a couple of
decibels, place one hand in his and the other on his shoulder. We begin with a
few easy steps. Even though he constantly looks down at his feet, he isn’t a
bad dancer. He has a good sense of rhythm and picks up new moves more
quickly than I do. I show him the new steps Francie taught me. Once he’s got
it, we’re on a rol. He treads on my toes a few times, but as we’re both
barefoot it just makes us laugh. After a while I start to improvise. Lochan
twirls me around and nearly sends me into the wal. Finding this highly
amusing, he tries to do it again and again. The sun is on his face, the dust
particles swirl about him in the golden light of the afternoon.
Relaxed and happy, he suddenly, for a brief moment, seems at peace with the
world.
Soon we are breathless, sweaty and laughing. After a while the style of the
music changes – a crooner with a slow beat, but it doesn’t matter because I
am too dizzy from spinning round and laughing to continue. I hook my arms
about Lochan’s neck and colapse against him. I notice the damp hair sticking
to his neck and inhale the smel of fresh sweat. I expect him to pul away and
return to his physics now that our moment of siliness is over, but to my
surprise he just puts his arms around me and we sway from side to side.
Pressed up against him, I can feel the thud of his heart against mine, his
ribcage expanding and contracting rapidly against my chest, the warm
whisper of his breath tickling the side of my neck, the brush of his leg against
my thigh. Resting my arms on his shoulders, I pul back a little to get a look at
his face. But he isn’t smiling any more.
CHAPTER NINE.
Lochan.
The room is plunged in golden light. Maya is stil smiling at me, her face
bright with laughter, tawny wisps of hair hanging in her eyes and down her
back, tickling my hands clasped around her waist. Her face glows like an oldfashioned streetlamp, lit from the inside, and everything else in the room
disappears as if into a dark fog. We are stil dancing, swaying slightly to the
crooning voice, and Maya feels warm and alive in my arms. Just standing
here, moving gently from side to side, I realize I don’t want this moment to
end.
I find myself marveling at how pretty she is, standing here, leaning against me
in her short-sleeved blue shirt, bare arms warm and smooth against my neck.
Her top buttons are undone, revealing the curve of her colarbone, the expanse
of smooth white skin beneath. Her white cotton skirt stops wel above her
knees and I’m aware of her bare legs brushing against the thin, worn fabric of
my jeans.
The sun highlights her auburn hair, catches in her blue eyes. I drink in every
tiny detail, from her soft breaths to the touch of each finger on the back of my
neck. And I find myself filed with a mixture of excitement and euphoria so
strong that I don’t want the moment to ever end . . . And then, out of nowhere,
I am aware of another sensation – a tingling surge across my whole body, a
familiar pressure against my groin. Abruptly I let go of her, shove her away
from me, and stride over to the radio to cut the music.
Heart slamming against my ribs, I withdraw to the couch, coiling into myself,
groping for the nearest textbook to pul across my lap. Stil standing where I
left her, Maya looks at me, a bemused expression on her face.
‘They’re going to be back any minute,’ I tel her by way of explanation, my
voice rushed and ragged. ‘I’ve – I’ve got to finish this.’
Seemingly unperturbed, she sighs, stil smiling, and flops down onto the couch
beside me. Her leg touches my thigh and I recoil violently. I need an excuse to
leave the room but I can’t seem to think straight, my mind a mess of jumbled
thoughts and emotions. I feel flushed and breathless, my heart hammering so
loudly I’m afraid she wil hear it. I need to get as far away from her as
possible.
Pressing the textbook against my thighs, I ask her if she could make me some
more coffee and she obliges, picking up the two used mugs and heading off to
the kitchen.
The moment I hear the rattle of crockery in the sink, I dash upstairs, trying to
make as little noise as possible. I lock myself in the bathroom and lean against
the door as if to reinforce it. I pul off al my clothes, almost tearing at them in
my haste, and, careful not to look down at myself, step under an icy shower,
heaving with shock. The water is so cold it hurts, but I don’t care: it’s a relief.
I have to stop this . . . this – this madness. After just standing there for a
while, eyes tightly closed, I start to go numb and my nerve endings deaden,
erasing al signs of my earlier arousal. It stils the racing thoughts, relieves the
pressure of the madness that has begun crushing my mind. I lean forward
against the wal, letting the frigid water lash my body, until al I can do is
shiver violently.
I don’t want to think – so long as I don’t think or feel, I wil be fine and
everything wil return to normal. Seated at my bedroom desk in a clean T-shirt
and jogging bottoms, wet hair sending cold rivulets down the back of my
neck, I pore over quadratic equations, grappling to keep the figures in my
head, fighting to make sense of the numbers and symbols. I repeat the
formulae under my breath, cover page after page with calculations, and every
time I sense a crack in my self-imposed armour, a chink of light entering my
brain, I force myself to work harder, faster, obliterating al other thoughts. I am
dimly aware of the others returning, of their raised voices in the hal, of the
clatter of plates from the kitchen beneath me. I concentrate on tuning it al out.
When Wila comes in to say they’ve ordered pizza, I tel her I’m not hungry: I
must finish this chapter by tonight, I must work my way through every
exercise at top speed, I have no time to stop and think. Al I can do is work or I
wil go crazy.
The sounds of the house wash over me like white noise, the evening routine
for once unfolding without me. An argument, a door slamming, Mum
shouting – I don’t care. They can sort themselves out, they have to sort
themselves out, I must concentrate on this until it’s so late al I can do is
colapse into bed, and then it wil be morning and none of this wil have
happened. Everything wil be back to normal – but what am I on about?
Everything is normal! I just forgot, for one insane moment, that Maya was my
sister.
For the remainder of the weekend I keep myself closeted in my room, buried
in schoolwork, and leave Maya in charge. In class on Monday I struggle to sit
stil, jittery and restless. My mind has become strangely diffuse – I am
possessed by myriad different sensations at once. There is a light flashing in
my brain, like the headlight of a train in the dark. A vice is slowly tightening
around my head, gripping my temples.
When Maya came into my room yesterday to say goodnight, informing me
she had left my dinner in the fridge, I couldn’t even turn round to look at her.
This morning I shouted at Wila during breakfast and made her cry, dragged
Tiffin out of the door, alegedly causing him grievous bodily harm, completely
ignored Kit and snapped at Maya when she asked me for the third time what
was wrong .
. . I am a person coming undone. I am so disgusted with myself I want to
crawl out of my own skin.
My mind keeps puling me back to that dance: Maya, her face, her touch, that
feeling. I keep teling myself these things happen, I’m sure they are not al that
uncommon. After al, I’m a seventeen-year-old guy – anything can set us off;
just because it happened while I was dancing with Maya doesn’t mean a
thing. But the words do little to reassure me. I’m desperate to escape myself
because the truth of the matter is that the feeling is stil there – perhaps it
always has been – and now that I’ve acknowledged it, I am terrified that
however much I may want to, I wil never be able to turn things back.
No, that’s ridiculous. My problem is that I need someone to focus my
attention on, some object of desire, some girl to fantasize about. I look around
the class but there is no one. Attractive girls –
yes. A girl that I care about – no. She can’t just be a face, a body; there has to
be more than that, some kind of connection. And I can’t connect, don’t want
to connect, with anyone.
I send Maya a text asking her to pick up Tiffin and Wila, then skip last period,
go home to change into my running gear and drag myself round the sodden
periphery of the local park. After a glorious weekend, the day is grey, wet and
miserable: bare trees, dying leaves and slippery mud underfoot.
The air is tepid and damp, a fine veil of drizzle speckles my face. I run as far
and as hard as I can, until the ground seems to shimmer beneath my feet, and
the world around me expands and retracts, blood-red blotches puncturing the
air in front of me. Eventualy pain courses through my body, forcing me to
stop, and I return home to another freezing shower and work until the others
return and the evening chores begin.
Over half-term I play footie out in the street with Tiffin, attempt to strike up
conversations with Kit and play endless games of Hide-and-Seek and Guess
Who? with Wila. At night, after my mind shuts down from information
overload, I rearrange kitchen drawers and cupboards. I go through Tiffin and
Wila’s bedroom, colecting outgrown clothes and discarded toys, and haul
them off to the charity shop. I am either entertaining or tidying or cooking or
studying: I comb through revision notes late into the night, pore over my
books until the smal hours of the morning, until there is nothing else to do but
colapse on my bed and fal into a short, deep and dreamless sleep. Maya
comments on my boundless energy but I feel numb, utterly drained from
trying to keep myself occupied at al times. From now on I wil just do and not
think.
Back at school, Maya is busy with coursework. If she notices a difference in
my behaviour towards her, she doesn’t mention it. Perhaps she too feels
uncomfortable about that afternoon.
Perhaps she too realizes that there needs to be more distance between us. We
negotiate each other with the caution of a bare foot avoiding shards of glass,
confining our brief exchanges to practicalities: the school run, the weekly
shop, ways to persuade Kit to take over the laundry, the likelihood of Mum
turning up sober on parents’ evening, weekend activities for Tiffin and Wila,
dental appointments, figuring out how to stop the fridge leaking. We are never
alone together. Mum is increasingly absent from family life, the pressure of
balancing schoolwork and housework intensifies and I welcome the endless
chores: they literaly leave me with no time to think. Things are beginning to
improve – I’m starting to return to a state of normality – until late one night
there is a knock on my bedroom door.
The sound is like a bomb exploding in an open field.
‘What?’ I am horribly jumpy from an overdose of caffeine. My daily coffee
consumption has reached new heights, the only way to keep up my energy
levels through the days and late into the sleepless nights. There is no reply but
I hear the door open and close behind me. I turn from my desk, biro stil
pressed against the indentations in my fingers, my borrowed school laptop
anchored amidst a sea of scribbled notes. She is in that nightdress again – the
white one that she has long outgrown and that barely reaches her thighs. How
I wish she wouldn’t walk around in that thing; how I wish her copper hair
wasn’t so long and shiny; how I wish she didn’t have those eyes, that she
wouldn’t just wander in uninvited. How I wish the sight of her didn’t fil me
with such unease, twisting my insides, tensing every muscle in my body,
setting my pulse thrumming.
‘Hi,’she says. The sound of her voice pains me. With that single word she
manages to exude both tenderness and concern. With just one word she
conveys so much, her voice caling to me from outside a nightmare. I try to
swalow, my throat dry, a bitter taste trapped in my mouth. ‘Hi.’
‘Am I disturbing you?’
I want to tel her she is. I want to ask her to leave. I want her presence, her
delicate, soapy smel, to evaporate from this room. But when I fail to reply,
she sits down on the end of my bed, inches away from me, one bare foot
tucked beneath her, leaning forward.
‘Maths?’she asks, glancing down at my sheaves of paper.
‘Yeah.’ I return my gaze to the textbook, pen poised.
‘Hey—’ She reaches out for me, making me flinch. Her hand misses mine as I
jerk away, and comes to rest, loose and empty, against the desk’s surface. I
train my eyes back on my computer screen, the blood hurting my cheeks,
heart paining my chest. I am stil aware of her hair, faling like a curtain around
her face, and there is nothing between us but torturous silence.
‘Tel me,’she says simply, her words piercing the fragile membrane that
surrounds me.
I feel my breathing quicken. She can’t do this to me. I lift my eyes to stare out
of the window, but al I see is my own reflection, this smal room, Maya’s soft
innocence by my side.
‘Something’s happened, hasn’t it?’ Her voice continues to puncture the
silence like an unwanted dream.
I push my chair away from her and rub my head. ‘I’m just tired.’ My voice
grates against the back of my throat. I sound alien, even to my own ears.
‘I’ve noticed,’ Maya continues. ‘Which is why I’m wondering why you carry
on running yourself into the ground.’
‘I’ve got a lot of work to do.’
Silence tightens the air. I sense she is not going to be brushed off so easily.
‘What happened, Lochie? Was it something at school? The presentation?’
I can’t tell you. I can’t tell you, of all people. Throughout my life you were
the one person I could turn to. The one person I could always count on to
understand. And now that I’ve lost you, I’ve lost everything.
‘Are you just generaly feeling down about things?’
I bite down on my lip until I recognize the metalic taste of blood. Maya
notices and her questions stop, leaving in their place a muddy silence.
‘Lochie, say something. You’re frightening me. I can’t bear seeing you like
this.’ She reaches again for my hand and this time makes contact.
‘Stop it! Just go to bed and leave me the fuck alone!’ The words fire from my
mouth like bulets, ricocheting off the wals before I can even register what I
am saying. I see Maya’s expression change, her face freeze in a look of
incredulous surprise, her eyes wide with incomprehension. No sooner have
my words slammed into her than she is moving away, flicking her head to
hide the tears pooling in her eyes, the door clicking shut behind her.
CHAPTER TEN.
Maya.
‘Oh my God, oh my God, you’l never guess what happened this morning!’
Francie’s eyes are burning with excitement, the corners of her cherry-red lips
drawn up into a grin.
I drop my bag on the floor and colapse on the seat beside her, my head stil
echoing with Tiffin’s yels as he had to be dragged to school this morning after
a furious row with Kit over a plastic Transformer at the bottom of a cereal
packet. I close my eyes.
‘Nico DiMarco was talking to Matt and—’
I force my eyes open to cut her off. ‘I thought you were going on a date with
Daniel Spencer.’
‘Maya, I may have decided to give Danny a chance while I wait for your
brother to come to his senses, but this has nothing to do with that. Nico was
talking to Matt this morning, and guess what he said . . . guess!’ Her voice
spikes with excitement and Mr McIntyre stops screeching his pen against the
whiteboard for a moment to turn and give us a long-suffering sigh. ‘Girls, if
you could at least pretend to pay attention.’
Francie flashes him her toothy smile and then turns back round in her seat to
face me. ‘Guess!’
‘I have no idea. His ego got so big it exploded and now he needs surgery?’
‘Nooo!’ Francie clatters her non-regulation school shoes against the lino in a
tap-dance of excitement. ‘I overheard him teling Matt Delaney he was going
to ask you out after school today!’
She opens her mouth so wide I can actualy make out her tonsils.
I gaze at her numbly.
‘Wel?’ Francie shakes me brutaly by the arm. ‘Isn’t this huge? Everyone’s
been after him since he broke up with Anorexic Annie, and he’s gone and
picked you! And you’re the only girl in the class who doesn’t wear make-up!’
‘I’m so flattered.’
Francie throws back her head dramaticaly and groans. ‘Aargh! What the hel’s
the matter with you these days? At the beginning of term you were teling me
he was the only guy at Belmont you’d ever consider snogging!’
I heave a sigh. ‘Yeah, yeah. So he’s hot. But he knows it.
I might fancy him just like everyone else, but I never said I wanted to go out
with the guy.’
Francie shakes her head in disbelief. ‘D’you know how many girls would kil
for a date with Nico? I think I’d even put Lochan on hold for a chance to snog
Mister Latino.’
‘Oh God, Francie. Then you go out with him.’
‘I went over to find out if he was serious and he asked me if I thought you’d
be interested! So of course I said yes!’
‘Francie! Tel him to forget it. Tel him at morning break.’
‘Why?’
‘I’m not interested!’
‘Maya, d’you realize what you’re doing here? I mean, he may not give you a
second chance!’
I drag myself through the rest of the day. Francie isn’t talking to me because I
accused her of being a meddling cow when she refused to go back and tel
Nico I wasn’t interested. But I honestly don’t care if she never speaks to me
again. A cold slab of despair presses down on my chest, making it difficult to
catch my breath. My eyes ache with suppressed tears. By mid-afternoon even
Francie is worried, breaking her vow of silence and offering to accompany me
to see the nurse. What could the school nurse offer me? I wonder. A pil to
make the loneliness disappear? A tablet that would get Lochan to speak to me
again? Or perhaps a capsule to turn back time, rewinding the days so I could
break away from Lochan when we’d finished dancing the salsa, instead of
remaining in his arms, swaying to the gentle crooning of Katie Melua. Is he
angry with me because he thinks I planned it somehow? That the salsa was
just a ruse to get him to slow-dance with me, our bodies pressed up against
each other, the heat of his soaking into mine? I didn’t mean to stroke the back
of his neck – it just happened. My thigh rubbing against the inside of his was
just an accident. I never meant any of it to happen. I had no idea that
something like slow-dancing could get a guy aroused. But when I felt it,
pressing against my hip, when I suddenly realized what it was, I felt this crazy
head-rush. I didn’t want to stop dancing. I didn’t pul away.
I can’t bear to think I might have lost our closeness, our friendship, our trust.
He was always so much more than just a brother. He is my soul mate, my
fresh air, the reason I look forward to getting up every morning. I always
knew I loved him more than anyone else in the world – and not just in a
brotherly way, the way I feel about Kit and Tiffin. Yet somehow it never
crossed my mind there could be a whole step beyond . . .
But I know it’s ridiculous, too stupid to even think about. We’re not like that.
We’re not sick.
We’re just a brother and sister who also happen to be best friends. That’s the
way it’s always been between us. I can’t lose that or I will not survive.
By the end of the day Francie is pestering me about Nico DiMarco again. She
seems to think I’m depressed and that having a boyfriend – especialy one of
the hottest guys in school – wil help snap me out of my funk. Perhaps she’s
right. Perhaps I need a distraction. And what better way to show Lochan that
what happened the other day was just an accident, a bit of fun? If I have a
boyfriend then he’l realize that none of that stuff meant anything. And Nico is
very cute. His hair is the same colour as Lochan’s. His eyes are kind of
greenish too. Although Francie is way off beam when she claims they are in
the same league. No way. Lochan is ferociously bright, emotionaly inteligent,
the kindest, most selfless person I know. Lochan has a soul. Nico might be the
same age but he is just a boy in comparison – a spoiled little rich boy, expeled
from his posh private school for smoking weed, a pretty face with an arrogant
swagger, a charm as carefuly crafted as his clothes and hairstyle. But yes, I
suppose the idea of dating him, kissing him even, isn’t totaly repelent.
After the last bel, as we are crossing the playground towards the gates, I see
him heading towards us. He’s been waiting, that much is clear. Francie gives a
half-strangled squawk and elbows me in the ribs so hard I am momentarily
winded, before swerving away. Nico is coming straight for me. As if drawn
towards each other by an invisible cord, we walk and walk. He has removed
his tie even though it’s enough to earn him a detention this side of the school
exit.
‘Maya, hi!’ His smile broadens. He’s very smooth, very confident: he’s been
doing this for years.
He stops close to me, too close, and I have to take a step back. ‘How’re you
doing? I haven’t had a chance to speak to you for ages!’
He is acting like a long-lost friend, despite the fact that we have barely
exchanged more than a few words until now. I force myself to meet his gaze
and smile. I was wrong: his eyes are nothing like Lochan’s – the green is
muddied with brown. His hair is brown too. I don’t know why I ever saw any
similarities.
‘Are you in a hurry,’ he asks, ‘or d’you have time for a drink at Smileys?’
Jesus, he doesn’t waste any time. ‘I have to pick up my little brother and
sister,’ I answer truthfuly.
‘Listen, I’m gonna be straight with you.’ He places his school bag between his
feet as if to indicate that this has turned into a proper conversation, and tosses
the hair out of his eyes. ‘You’re a great girl, you know. I’ve always had – you
know – a kind of thing for you. I didn’t think it was reciprocated so I haven’t
said anything until now. But hel, you know, carpe diem and al that.’
Does he think he’s going to impress me with his command of Latin?
‘I’ve always considered you a good friend, but you know what? I think it
could be even stronger than that, you know. Al I’m saying is – perhaps we
could get to know each other a little better, you know?’
If he says you know one more time, I swear I’m going to scream.
‘I’d be realy honoured if you’d let me take you out to dinner one night. Is
there even the remotest possibility I could get you to agree to that?’ He flashes
his teeth at me again in what could almost pass for a wistful smile. Oh, he’s
good at this al right.
I pretend to consider it for a moment. His smile doesn’t falter. I’m impressed.
‘OK, I suppose . . .
’
His smile broadens. ‘That’s great. Realy great. How would Friday suit you?’
‘Friday’s fine.’
‘Cool. What kind of food do you like? Japanese, Thai, Mexican, Lebanese?’
‘Pizza’s good for me.’
His eyes light up. ‘I know this great restaurant – serves the best Italian food
round here. I’l drive by to pick you up at, say, seven?’
I am about to protest that it would be easier to meet him there when it dawns
on me that having him come to the house might be no bad thing.
‘Al right. Seven o’clock on Friday.’ I smile again. My cheeks are beginning to
ache.
He cocks his head and raises his eyebrows. ‘You’l have to give me your
address!’
He produces a pen while I rummage through my pockets and find a crumpled
receipt. I write down my address and number and hand it back to him. As I do
so, he holds onto my fingers for a moment and flashes another of his highwattage smiles. ‘I look forward to it.’
I’m beginning to think this might be quite fun, even if it’s just to laugh about
him the next day with Francie. I manage a genuine smile this time and say,
‘Yeah, me too.’
Francie leaps out from behind the phone box at the end of the street. ‘Oh my
God, oh my God, tel me everything!’
I wince and bring my hand up to my ear. ‘Aargh, Jesus – try and give me a
heart attack, why don’t you?’
‘You’re blushing! Oh my God, you said yes, didn’t you?’
I briefly recount the conversation. Francie grabs me by the shoulders, shakes
me brutaly and starts to shriek. A woman looks round in alarm.
‘Calm down,’ I laugh. ‘Francie, he’s a complete twat!’
‘So? Tel me you don’t fancy him!’
‘OK, maybe I find him slightly attractive—’
‘I knew it! You were complaining just the other week you’d never kissed a
guy! As of Friday, you’l be able to cross that off your list.’
‘Maybe . . . Listen, I’ve got to run. I’m late for Tiffin and Wila.’
Francie grins at me as I begin to move off. ‘You’re gonna tel me everything,
Maya Whitely. Every little detail. You owe me that much!’
I have to confess that the prospect of a date with Nico does make me feel
fractionaly better.
Fractionaly less abnormal, at least, and that’s quite something. That evening,
as I sit at the kitchen table helping Tiffin and Wila with their homework, my
mind keeps flicking back to the flirtatious exchange, the way he smiled at me.
It’s not a lot – not nearly enough to fil the gaping void inside me –
but it’s something. It’s always nice being fancied. It’s always nice being
wanted. Even if it’s by the wrong person.
I’d let it slip to Tiffin and Wila. I was ten minutes late picking them up, and
when Tiffin demanded to know why, in my stupidity, stil a little dazed, I told
him that I was talking to a boy from school. I thought this would be the end of
it, but I’d forgotten Tiffin is almost nine. ‘Maya’s got a boyfriend, a
boyfriend, a boyfriend!’ he sang al the way home.
Wila looked worried. ‘Does that mean you’re going to go away and get
married?’
‘No, of course not,’ I laughed, trying to reassure her. ‘It just means I’ve got a
friend who’s a boy and maybe I’l go and see him once in a while.’
‘Like Mum and Dave?’
‘No! Nothing like Mum and Dave. I’l probably only ever go out with him
once or twice. And if I do go out with him more than that, it’l stil be hardly
ever. And of course it wil only be when Lochie’s at home to look after you.’
‘Maya’s got a boyfriend!’ Tiffin announces as Kit slams through the door and
executes a whirlwind tour of the kitchen, hunting for snacks.
‘Great. I hope the two of you wil have lots of babies and be very happy
together.’
By dinner time Tiffin has other things on his mind – namely the footbal game
his friends are playing loudly and unhelpfuly right outside the house while he
is stuck inside, simultaneously being force-fed runner beans and griled on his
times tables by Lochan. Wila is studying ‘materials’ at school and wants to
know what everything is made of: the plates, the cutlery, the water jug. Kit,
bored, is in one of his most dangerous moods, trying to wind everyone up so
that he can sit in the eye of the storm and laugh at the chaos he has created al
around him.
‘Four sevens?’ Lochan picks up Tiffin’s fork and spears two runner beans
before handing it back to him. Tiffin looks down at it and grimaces.
‘Come on. Four sevens. You’ve got to be quicker than that.’
‘I’m thinking!’
‘Do it like I told you. Go through it in your head. One seven’s seven, two
sevens are—?’
‘Thirty-three,’ Kit chips in.
‘Thirty-three?’ Tiffin echoes optimisticaly.
‘Tiff, you’ve got to think for yourself.’
‘Why did you put two beans on my fork? It’l make me choke! I hate runner
beans!’ Tiffin exclaims angrily.
‘What are runner beans made of?’ Wila asks.
‘Snake poo,’ Kit informs her.
Wila drops her fork and looks down at her plate in horror.
‘One seven’s seven,’ Lochan continues doggedly. ‘Two sevens are . . . ?’
‘Lochie, I don’t like runner beans too!’ Wila protests.
For the first time in my life I don’t feel the slightest bit inclined to help out.
Lochan has said exactly five words to me since coming home two hours ago:
Have they done their homework?
‘Tiffin, you must know what two sevens are! Just add them together for
chrissakes!’
‘I can’t eat al this, you’ve given me too much!’
‘Hey’ – Kit cocks his head – ‘did you hear those shouts, Tiff? Sounds like
Jamie just scored another goal.’
‘That’s my footbal they’re playing with!’
‘Kit, just leave him alone, wil you?’ Lochan snaps.
‘I’ve finished.’ Wila pushes her plate as far away as possible, knocking over
Kit’s glass in the process.
‘Wila, watch what you’re doing!’ Kit yels.
‘How come she gets to leave al her beans?’ Tiffin begins to shout.
‘Wila, just eat your beans! Tiffin, if you don’t know what four sevens are,
you’re going to fail your test tomorrow!’ Lochan is losing his cool. It gives
me a perverse sort of pleasure.
‘Maya, do I have to eat my beans?’ Wila turns to me plaintively.
‘Ask Lochan, he’s the cook.’
‘I think you’re being a bit free and loose with the word cook there,’ Kit
remarks, chuckling to himself.
‘The boss, then,’ I substitute.
‘Yeah, that’s the one!’
Lochan flashes me a look that says, What have I done to you? Again, I’m
aware of a fleeting sense of satisfaction.
‘Wila, for fuck sake, clean up this mess – you’ve got water al over the table!’
Kit protests.
‘I can’t!’
‘Stop being a baby and get the sponge!’
‘Lochie, Kit said the F word.’
‘I’m not eating any more!’ Tiffin roars. ‘And I’m not doing no more tables,
neither!’
‘Do you want to fail your maths test?’ Lochan shouts back.
‘I don’t care! I don’t care! I don’t care!’
‘Lochie, Kit said the F word!’ Wila wails, angry now.
‘Fuck-a-doodle-do,’ Kit sings.
‘Wil you al just shut up! What the hel’s the matter with you!’ Lochan slams
his fist down on the table.
Tiffin, seizing on this distraction, leaps up, grabs his footbal gloves and races
out of the house.
Wila bursts into noisy tears, slides off her chair and stamps her way up to her
room. Kit tips three plates of uneaten runner beans back into the saucepan and
says, ‘Look, now you can feed us the same old shit tomorrow.’
With a groan, Lochan puts his head in his hands.
Suddenly I feel awful. I don’t know what I was trying to prove. That Lochan
needs me, perhaps?
Or was I just trying to get my own back for the silent treatment? Either way, I
feel lousy. It would have cost me nothing to chip in and diffuse the situation. I
do it al the time, without even having to think about it. I could have prevented
Lochan’s stress levels going through the roof, stopped him feeling like a
failure as yet another family meal ended in mayhem. But I didn’t. And the
worst thing is, I actualy enjoyed watching everything fal apart.
Looking exhausted, Lochan rubs his eyes with a wry smile. Glancing at al the
leftover food, he tries to make a joke of it. ‘Maya, more runner beans? Don’t
be shy!’
He has every right to be angry with the lot of us, but instead he is so forgiving
it makes me ache. I want to say something, do something to take it al back,
but I can’t think of a thing. Chewing his lip, Lochan gets up and starts
clearing away, and I suddenly notice that lately his sore has got bigger, that he
has been gnawing at it more and more. It looks so painful, so raw, that to see
him bite at it like that makes my eyes water. Getting up to help him clear the
table, I remind Kit it’s his turn to do the washing-up and, without thinking,
touch Lochan’s hand to get his attention – but this time, to my surprise, he
doesn’t pul away.
‘Ouch, your poor lip,’ I say gently. ‘You’re going to make it worse.’
‘Sorry.’ He stops chewing and presses the back of his hand self-consciously
against his mouth.
‘Yeah, God, that thing has become realy gross.’ Kit seizes the opportunity to
chip in, his voice loud and brash as, with a crash, he drops a pile of plates
unceremoniously into the sink. ‘The guys at school were asking me if it was
some kind of disease.’
‘Kit, that’s rubbish—’ I begin.
‘What? I’m just agreeing with you. That thing’s gross, and if he keeps on
biting it, he’s gonna end up disfigured.’
I try giving him one of my warning looks but he studiously avoids my eye,
crashing the crockery around in the sink. Lochan leans one shoulder against
the wal, waiting for the kettle to boil, staring out of the darkened window. I
decide to give Kit a hand with the washing-up – Lochan seems to have
ground to a halt and I don’t want to leave the two of them alone together
while Kit stil has the bit between his teeth.
‘So you’ve finaly managed to nail yourself a boyfriend,’ Kit remarks
scathingly as I join him at the sink. ‘Who the hel is it?’
I feel my insides clench. Instinctively my gaze flies over to Lochan, who
drops his hand from his mouth, his head jolting back in surprise.
‘He’s not a boyfriend,’ I correct Kit quickly. ‘Just – just some random guy
from school who asked me out for – uh—’ I break off. Lochan is staring at
me.
‘For – uh – sex?’ Kit suggests.
‘Don’t be so childish. He asked me out for dinner.’
‘Whoa – no introductory drink at Smileys then? Straight in there, wining and
dining you.’ Kit is clearly enjoying watching me squirm. ‘What guy at
Belmont can possibly afford to take a girl out for dinner? Don’t tel me it’s one
of your teachers!’ His eyes light up in delight.
‘Stop being ridiculous. It’s a guy in the year above caled Nico. You don’t
even know him.’
‘Nico DiMarco?’ But of course Lochan does. Shit.
‘Yeah.’ I force myself to meet his look of astonishment over the top of Kit’s
head. ‘I – he asked me out on Friday. Is that – can you – is that al right?’ I
don’t know why I’m suddenly finding it so hard to speak.
‘Uh-oh, you should have asked permission first!’ Kit crows. ‘You’re gonna
have to stick to the curfew, remember. Tel you what, I’l give you my last
condom—’
‘OK, Kit, that’s enough!’ I shout, slamming a plate down on the counter. ‘Go
and bring Tiffin inside and then do your homework!’ I’m the one losing it
now.
‘Fine! Excuse me for breathing!’ Kit throws the washing-up brush into the
sink with a splash and stalks out of the room.
Lochan hasn’t moved from his position by the window, scraping at the sore
with his thumbnail. His face looks hot, his eyes deeply troubled. ‘Nico?
D’you know him? I mean, the guy’s pretty, uh – you know. He’s kind of got a
rep . . .’
I keep my head down, scrubbing the plates hard. ‘Yeah, wel, it’s only a date.
We’l see how it goes.’
Lochan takes a step towards me and then changes his mind and moves back
again. ‘Do you – do you – I mean, do you like him?’
I feel the heat rush to my face and suddenly I am angry again. How dare
Lochan give me the third degree when I agreed to the date for us – for him?
‘Yes, as a matter of fact, I do, OK?’ I stop scrubbing and force my eyes to
meet his. ‘He’s the hottest guy in school. I’ve fancied him for ages. I can’t
wait to go out with him.’
CHAPTER ELEVEN.
Lochan.
It’s fine. In fact it’s great! Maya has finaly found someone she likes, and
what’s more he likes her back, and they are actualy going out together this
Friday. Things are coming together for her at long last; it’s the beginning of
her life as an adult, away from this madhouse, from this family, from me. She
seems happy, she seems excited. Nico mightn’t be the guy I’d have chosen for
her, but he’s al right.
He’s had a couple of proper girlfriends, doesn’t seem to be looking for just
one thing. It’s normal to feel anxious but I’m not going to lose sleep over it.
Maya is nearly seventeen after al, Nico only a year older. Maya wil be fine.
She is a very sensible person, responsible beyond her years; she’l be careful,
and maybe it wil work out. He won’t hurt her – not intentionaly at least. No,
I’m sure he won’t hurt her, he wouldn’t. She is such a lovely person, she is so
precious – he’l see that: he must. He’l know he can never break her heart,
never harm her. He wouldn’t. He couldn’t. So fine, I’m going to be able to
sleep at last. I don’t need to think about this any more. What I do desperately
need is sleep.
Otherwise I’l fal apart. I’m going to fal apart. I am faling apart.
The first rays of dawn begin to touch the edge of the rooftops. I sit on my bed
and watch the pale light dilute the inky blackness, a thin wash of colour
slowly diffusing the eastern sky. The air is chiled as it blows through the
cracks in the window frame, and sparse flecks of rain spatter the pane as the
birds begin to wake. A golden patch of sunlight slants across the wal, slowly
widening like a spreading stain. What is the point of it al? I wonder – this
endless cycle. I haven’t slept al night and my muscles ache from remaining
immobile so long. I’m cold but I can’t find the energy to move or even pul the
duvet up around me. Now and then my head, as though succumbing to a
narcotic, begins to drop, and my eyes close and then reopen with a start. As
the light begins to intensify, so does my misery, and I wonder how it is
possible to hurt so much when nothing is wrong. A sweling despair presses
outward from the centre of my chest, threatening to shatter my ribs. I fil my
lungs with the cold air and then drain them, running my hands gently back
and forth over the rough cotton sheets as if anchoring myself to this bed, to
this house, to this life – in an attempt to forget my utter solitude. The sore
beneath my lip throbs with a pulse and it’s a struggle just to let it alone, not
chafe it in an attempt to annihilate the agony inside my mind. I continue
stroking the covers, the rhythmical movement soothing me, reminding me
that, even if I am breaking up inside, al around me things remain the same,
solid and real, bringing me the hope that perhaps one day I too wil feel real
again.
A single day encompasses so much. The frantic morning routine: trying to
make sure everyone eats breakfast, Tiffin’s high-pitched voice jarring my
ears, Wila’s continuous chatter fraying my nerves, Kit relentlessly reinforcing
my guilt with his every gesture, and Maya . . . It’s best if I don’t think about
Maya. But perversely I want to. I must chafe at the wound, scrape back the
scab, pick at the damaged skin. I cannot leave the thought of her alone. Like
last night at dinner, she is here but not here: her heart and mind have left this
dingy house, the annoying siblings, the socialy inept brother, the alcoholic
mother. Her thoughts are with Nico now, racing ahead to her date this
evening. However long the day may seem, the evening wil arrive and Maya
wil go. And from that moment, part of her life, part of herself, wil be severed
from me for ever. Yet, even as I wait for this to happen, there is so much to
do: coax Kit out of his lair, get Tiffin and Wila to school on time, remember to
test Tiffin on his tables as he tries to run ahead down the road. Make it
through my own school gates, check without being seen that Kit’s in class, sit
through a whole morning of lessons, find new ways of deflecting attention
should a teacher press me to participate, survive lunch, make sure I avoid
DiMarco, explain to the teacher why I can’t give a presentation, make it to the
last bel without faling apart. And finaly pick up Wila and Tiffin, keep them
entertained for the evening, remind Kit of his curfew without prompting a row
– and al the time, al the while, try to purge every thought of Maya from my
mind. And the hands of the kitchen clock wil continue moving forwards,
reaching midnight before starting al over again, as though the day that just
ended never began.
I was once so strong. I used to be able to get through al the smal things, al the
details, the treadmil routine, day after day. But I never realized that Maya was
the one who gave me that strength.
It was because she was there that I could manage, the two of us at the helm,
propping each other up when one of us was down. We may have spent the
bulk of our time looking after the little ones, but beneath the surface we were
realy looking after each other and that made everything bearable, more than
just bearable. It brought us together in an existence only we could understand.
Together we were safe – different but safe – from the outside world . . . Now
al I have is myself, my responsibilities, my duties, my never-ending list of
things to do . . . and my loneliness, always my loneliness – that airless bubble
of despair that is slowly stifling me.
Maya leaves for school ahead of me, dragging Kit with her. She seems
annoyed with me for some reason. Wila dawdles, picking up twigs and crisp,
curled-up leaves along the way. Tiffin abandons us as he spots Jamie at the
end of the road, and I haven’t the strength to cal him back, despite the busy
junction in front of the school. It is a monumental effort not to snap at Wila –
to tel her to hurry, to ask her why she seems so intent on making us both late.
As soon as we reach the school gates, she spots a friend and breaks into a
stumbling run, her coat flapping and flying out behind her. For a moment I
just stand and watch her go, her fine golden hair streaming behind her in the
wind. Her grey pinafore is stained with yesterday’s lunch, her school coat is
missing its hood, her book bag is faling apart, her red tights have a large hole
behind the knee, but she never complains. Even though she is surrounded by
mums and dads hugging their children goodbye, even though she hasn’t seen
her mother for two weeks now, even though she has no memory of ever
having a father. She is only five, yet already she has learned that there is no
point in asking her mother for a bedtime story, that inviting friends over is
something only other children can do, that new toys are a rare luxury, that at
home Kit and Tiffin are the only ones who get their own way. At the age of
five she has already come to terms with one of life’s harshest lessons: that the
world isn’t fair . . . Halfway up the school steps, best friend in tow, she
suddenly remembers she has forgotten to say goodbye and turns, scanning the
emptying playground for my face. When she spots it, her face breaks into a
radiant, plump-cheeked smile, the tip of her tongue poking out through the
gap of her missing front teeth. Raising a smal hand, she waves. I wave back,
my arms fanning the sky.
Entering the school building, I am hit by a wal of artificial heat – radiators
turned up too high. But it isn’t until I walk into the English room and come
face-to-face with Miss Azley that I remember. She smiles at me, a thinly
disguised attempt at encouragement. ‘Are you going to be needing the
projector?
’
I freeze at her desk, a horrible, clutching, sinking feeling in my chest, and say
in a rush, ‘Actualy –
actualy I thought it might work better as a written assignment – there was too
much information to condense into just – just a half-hour . . .’
Her smile fades. ‘But this wasn’t a written assignment, Lochan. The
presentation is part of your coursework. I can’t mark you on this.’ She takes
my file and flicks through it. ‘Wel, you’ve certainly got a lot of material here,
so I suppose you could just read it out.’
I look at her, a cold hand of horror wrapping itself around my throat. ‘Wel, the
thing is—’ I can barely speak. My voice is suddenly no more than a whisper.
She gives a puzzled frown. ‘The thing is?’
‘It’s – it’s not realy going to make much sense if I just read it—’
‘Why don’t you just give it a try?’ Her voice is suddenly gentle – too gentle.
‘The first time is always the hardest.’
I feel the burn in my face. ‘It won’t work. I – I’m sorry.’ I take back the folder
from her outstretched hand. ‘I’l make sure I make up for the failed grade with
– with the rest of my coursework.’
Turning quickly, I find a seat, crimson waves crashing through me. To my
relief she does not summon me back.
Nor does she bring up the subject of the presentation during the lesson.
Instead she covers the gap left by my lack of a contribution by talking to us
about the lives of Sylvia Plath and Virginia Woolf, and a heated debate arises
about the link between mental ilness and the artistic temperament.
Normaly this is a subject I’d find fascinating, but today the words just wash
over me. Outside, the sky disgorges rain, which drums against the dirty
windows, washing them with tears. I look at the clock and see there are only
five more hours to go until Maya’s date. Perhaps DiMarco broke his leg
playing footbal. Perhaps he is in the sick bay right now with food poisoning.
Perhaps he suddenly found some other girl to pul. Any girl other than my
sister. He had the whole school to choose from.
Why Maya? Why the one person who matters the most to me in the world?
‘Lochan Whitely?’ The raised voice jolts through me as I head for the door
amidst the chaos of exiting pupils. I turn my head long enough to see Miss
Azley beckoning me over to her desk and realize I have no choice but to fight
my way back through the fray.
‘Lochan, I think we need to have a little chat.’
Christ, no. Not this, not today. ‘Um – I’m sorry. I – I actualy have maths,’ I
say in a rush.
‘This won’t take long. I’l give you a note.’ She indicates a chair in front of her
desk. ‘Have a seat.’
Lifting the strap of my bag over my head, I take the proffered seat, realizing
there is no way out.
Miss Azley crosses over to the door and closes it with a harsh metalic thud
that sounds like a prison gate.
She comes back towards me and takes the chair by my side, turning to me
with a reassuring smile.
‘There’s no need to look so worried. I’m sure by now you know my bark is
worse than my bite!’
I force myself to look at her, hoping she wil reel off the spiel about the
importance of class participation more quickly if I appear co-operative. But
instead she chooses the roundabout route.
‘What happened to your lip?’
Aware that I’m biting it again, I force myself to stop, my fingers flying to it in
surprise. ‘Nothing –
it’s – it’s nothing.’
‘You should put some Vaseline on it and take up pen-chewing instead.’ She
reaches over to her desk for a couple of gnawed biros. ‘Less painful and does
the job just as wel.’ She gives me another smile.
With al the wil in the world, I cannot return it. The paly smal-talk is throwing
me off-balance.
Something in her eyes tels me she isn’t about to give me a lecture on the
importance of class participation, teamwork and al the usual shit. Her look is
not one of admonishment, but of genuine concern.
‘You know why I’ve kept you back, don’t you?’
I reply with a quick nod, my teeth automaticaly scraping my lip again. Look,
this isn’t a good day, I want to tel her. I could grit my teeth and nod my way
through a heart-to-heart with an over-zealous teacher another time, but not
today. Not today.
‘What is it about speaking out in front of your peers that frightens you so
much, Lochan?’
She has caught me off guard. I don’t like the way she used the word frightens.
I don’t like the way she seems to know so much about me.
‘I’m not – I don’t—’ My voice is dangerously unsteady. The air circulates
slowly in the room. I am breathing too fast. She has cornered me. I’m aware
of sweat breaking out across my back, heat radiating from my face.
‘Hey, it’s al right.’ She leans forward, her concern almost tangible. ‘I’m not
having a go at you, Lochan, OK? But I know you’re bright enough to
understand why you need to be able to speak in public from time to time – not
just for the sake of your academic future but also your personal one.’
I wish I could just get up and walk out.
‘Is it just a problem at school or is it al the time?’
Why the hel is she doing this? Headmaster, detention, expulsion – I don’t
care. Anything but this.
I want to tune her out but I can’t. It’s that damn concern, cutting through my
consciousness like a knife.
‘It’s al the time, isn’t it?’ Her voice is too gentle.
I feel the heat rush to my face. Taking a panicked breath, I let my eyes scour
the classroom, as if seeking a place to hide.
‘It’s nothing to be ashamed of, Lochan. It’s just perhaps something worth
tackling now.’
Face thrumming, I start chewing my lip again, the sharp pain a welcome
relief.
‘Like any phobia, social anxiety is something that can be overcome. I was
thinking maybe we could devise an action plan together to set you on track
for next year at university.’
I can hear the sound of my breathing, sharp and rapid. I reply with a barely
perceptible nod.
‘We’d take it very slowly. One smal step at a time. Perhaps you could aim to
put your hand up and answer just one question each lesson. That would be a
good start, don’t you think? Once you can comfortably volunteer one answer,
you’l find it much easier to answer two, and then three – and, wel, you get the
idea.’ She laughs and I sense she is trying to lighten the atmosphere. ‘Then,
before you know it, you’l be answering every question and no one else wil
have a chance in hel!’
I try to return her smile but it doesn’t work. Take one smal step at a time . . . I
used to have someone helping me do just that. Someone who introduced me
to her friend, encouraged me to read out my essay in class; someone who was
subtly trying to help me with my whole problem, yet I never realized. And
now I’ve lost her – lost her to Nico DiMarco. One evening with him, and
Maya wil realize what a loser I’ve become, start feeling the same way
towards me as Kit and my mother do . . .
‘I’ve noticed you’ve been looking quite stressed recently,’ Miss Azley
remarks suddenly. ‘Which is perfectly understandable – it’s a tough year. But
your grades are as good as ever and you excel at written exams. So you’l sail
through your A-levels: there’s nothing to worry about there.’
I give a tense nod.
‘Are things difficult at home?’
I look at her then, unable to disguise my shock.
‘I have two children to look after,’she says with a little smile. ‘I gather you
have four?’
My heart stutters and almost stops. I stare at her. Who the hel has she been
talking to?
‘N-no! I’m seventeen. I do have two brothers and – and two sisters, but we
live with our mother, and she—’
‘I know that, Lochan. It’s al right.’ It isn’t until she cuts me off that I realize
I’m not speaking in particularly measured tones.
For God’s sake, try to keep it cool! I beg myself. Don’t go and react as if
you’ve got something to hide!
‘What I meant was, you have younger siblings to help take care of,’ Miss
Azley continues. ‘That can’t be easy, on top of al your schoolwork.’
‘But I don’t – I don’t take care of them. They’re – they’re just a bunch of
annoying brats. They certainly drive my mother round the bend . . .’ My laugh
sounds painfuly artificial.
Another strained silence stretches out between us. I glance desperately at the
door. Why is she talking to me about this? Who has she been speaking to?
What other information do they have in that damn file? Are they thinking of
contacting Social Services? Did St Luke’s get in touch with Belmont when
the kids went missing?
‘I’m not trying to meddle, Lochan,’she says suddenly. ‘I just want to make
sure you know that you don’t have to carry the burden alone. Your social
anxiety, the responsibilities at home . . . it’s a lot to have to deal with at your
age.’
Out of nowhere a pain rises through my chest and into my throat. I find
myself biting down on my lip to stop it trembling.
I see her face change and she leans towards me. ‘Hey, hey, listen to me. There
is lots of help available. There’s the school counselor or any one of your
teachers you can talk to – or outside help I can recommend if you don’t want
to involve the school. You don’t have to carry al this on your own—’
The pain in my throat intensifies. I’m going to lose it. ‘I – I realy have to go.
I’m sorry—’
‘Al right, that’s al right. But, Lochan, I’m always here if you want to talk,
OK? You can make an appointment with the counselor at any time. And if
there’s any way I can make things easier in class .
. . We’l forget the presentations for the moment. I’l just mark it as a written
assignment as you suggested. And I’l leave answering questions up to you
and stop pushing you to participate. I know it’s not much, but would that help
at al?’
I don’t understand. Why can’t she just be like the other teachers? Why does
she have to care?
I nod wordlessly.
‘Oh, love, the last thing I wanted was to make you feel worse! It’s just that I
think realy highly of you and I’m worried. I wanted you to know there’s help
available . . .’
It’s only when I hear the defeat in her voice, see the look of shock on her face,
that I realize my eyes have filed with tears.
‘Thank you. C-can I go now?’
‘Of course you can, Lochan. But would you just think about it – think about
talking to someone?’
I nod, unable to utter another word, grab my bag and run from the room.
‘No, stupid. You’re only supposed to lay four places.’ Tiffin yanks one of the
plates off the table and returns it to the cupboard with a loud clatter.
‘Why? Is Kit going to Burger King again?’ Wila nibbles the end of her thumb
nervously, her large eyes darting around the kitchen as if looking for signs of
trouble.
‘Tonight Maya’s going on her date, stupid!’
I turn from the cooker. ‘Stop caling her stupid. She’s younger than you, that’s
al. And how come she’s done her job and you haven’t even started yours?’
‘I don’t want Maya to go out on a date,’ Wila protests. ‘If Maya goes out and
Kit goes out and Mum goes out, that means there’s only three of us left in this
family!’
‘Actualy it means there’s two left ’cos I’m going for a sleepover at Jamie’s,’
Tiffin informs her.
‘Oh no, you’re not,’ I intervene quickly. ‘That wasn’t discussed, Jamie’s
mother never rang, and I’ve already told you to stop inviting yourself over to
other people’s houses – it’s very rude.’
‘Fine then!’ Tiffin shouts. ‘I’l tel her to phone you! She invited me herself, so
you’l see!’ He stalks out of the kitchen just as I begin to dish up.
‘Tiff, get back in here or no Gameboy for a week!’
He arrives at ten past seven. Maya has been on edge ever since she got in. For
the last hour she has been upstairs, vying with Mum for the bathroom. I even
heard the two of them laughing together. Kit jumps up, banging his knee on
the table leg in his haste to be the first to greet him. I let him go and quickly
close the kitchen door behind him. I don’t want to see the guy.
Fortunately Maya doesn’t invite him in. I hear her feet pounding down the
stairs, voices raised in greeting, folowed by: ‘I’l be with you in a minute.’
Kit returns, looking impressed and exclaiming loudly, ‘Whoa, that guy’s
loaded. Have you seen his designer gear?’
Maya rushes in. ‘Thank you for doing this.’ She comes straight over to me
and squeezes my hand in that annoying way she has. ‘I’l take them out al day
tomorrow, I promise.’
I pul away. ‘Don’t be sily. Just have a good time.’
She’s wearing something I’ve never seen before. In fact she looks totaly
different: burgundy lipstick, her long russet hair pinned up, a few stray wisps
delicately framing her face. Smal silver pendants hang from her ears. Her
dress is short, black and figure-hugging, sexy in a sophisticated kind of way.
She smels of something peachy.
‘Kiss!’ Wila cries, flinging up her arms.
I watch her hug Wila, kiss the top of Tiffin’s head, give Kit a punch on the
shoulder and smile again at me. ‘Wish me luck!’
I manage to return the smile and give a smal nod.
‘Good luck!’ Tiffin and Wila shout at the tops of their voices. Maya cringes
and laughs as she hurries out into the corridor.
There are slamming doors and then the sound of an engine starting. I turn to
Kit. ‘He came by car?’
‘Yeah, I told you, he’s loaded! It wasn’t exactly a Lamborghini, but Jeez, he’s
got his own wheels at seventeen?’
‘Eighteen,’ I correct him. ‘I hope he doesn’t intend to drink.’
‘You should have seen him,’ Kit says. ‘That guy’s got class.’
‘Maya looked like a princess!’ Wila exclaims, her blue eyes wide. ‘She
looked like a grown-up too.’
‘OK, who wants more potatoes?’ I ask.
‘Maybe she’l marry him and then she’l be rich,’ Tiffin chips in. ‘If Maya’s
rich and I’m her brother, does that mean I get to be rich as wel?’
‘No, it means she dumps you as a brother ’cos you’re an embarrassment – you
don’t even know your times tables,’ Kit replies.
Tiffin’s mouth fals open and his eyes fil.
I turn to Kit. ‘You’re not even funny, d’you realize that?’
‘Never claimed I was a comedian, just a realist,’ Kit retorts.
Tiffin sniffs and wipes the back of his hand across his eyes. ‘Don’t care what
you say, Maya would never do that, and anyway, I’m her brother until I die.’
‘At which point you’l go to hel and never see anyone again,’ Kit shoots back.
‘If there’s a hel, Kit, believe me, you’l be in it.’ I can feel myself losing my
cool. ‘Now would you just shut up and finish your meal without tormenting
anyone else?’
Kit tosses his knife and fork onto his half-finished plate with a clatter. ‘To hel
with this. I’m going out.’
‘Ten o’clock and no later!’ I shout after him.
‘In your dreams, mate,’ he cals back from halfway up the stairs.
Our mother is next to come in, reeking of perfume and struggling to light a
cigarette without smudging her freshly painted nails. The complete antithesis
to Maya, she is al glitter and crimson lips, her il-fitting red dress leaving little
to the imagination. Soon she disappears again, already unsteady on her high
heels, screeching up at Kit for having nicked her last packet of fags.
I spend the rest of the evening watching TV with Tiffin and Wila, simply too
exhausted and fed up to attempt anything more productive. When they start to
bicker, I get them ready for bed. Wila cries because I get shampoo in her eyes,
and Tiffin forgets to hang the shower curtain inside the bath and floods the
floor. Teeth-brushing seems to take hours: the kiddie toothpaste tube is almost
empty so I use mine instead, which makes Tiffin’s eyes water and Wila gag
into the basin. Then Wila takes fifteen minutes to choose a story, Tiffin sneaks
downstairs to play on his Gameboy and, when I object, gets unreasonably
upset and claims Maya always lets him play while she reads to Wila. Once
they are in bed, Wila is immediately hungry, Tiffin is thirsty by association,
and by the time the clamouring finaly stops it is half past nine and I am
shattered.
But once they are asleep, the house feels eerily empty. I know I should go to
bed myself and try to get an early night but I feel increasingly agitated and on
edge. I tel myself I have to stay up to check that Kit comes home at some
point, but deep down I know that it’s only an excuse. I’m watching some
stupid action movie but I’ve no idea what it’s about or who is supposed to be
chasing who. I can’t even focus on the special effects – al I can think of is
DiMarco. It’s past ten now: they must have finished dinner, they must have
left the restaurant. His father is often away on business – or so Nico claims,
and I have no reason to disbelieve him. Which means he has his mansion to
himself . .
. Has he taken her back there? Or are they in some dodgy car park, his hands
and lips al over her? I begin to feel sick. Maybe it’s because I haven’t eaten al
evening. I want to wait up and see for myself what kind of state she’s in when
she gets home. If she decides to come home. It suddenly strikes me that most
sixteen-year-olds would have some kind of curfew. But I’m only thirteen
months her senior, so am hardly in a position to impose one. I keep teling
myself that Maya has always been so sensible, so responsible, so mature, but
now I remember the flushed look on her face when she came into the kitchen
to say goodbye, the sparkle in her smile, the fizz of excitement in her eyes.
She is stil only a teenager, I realize; she is not yet an adult, however much she
may be forced to behave like one. She has a mother who thinks nothing of
having sex on the floor of the front room while her children lie sleeping
overhead, who brags to them about her teenage conquests, who goes out on
the piss every week and staggers in at six in the morning with smudged makeup and torn clothes. What kind of role model has Maya ever had? For the first
time in her life she is free. Am I so sure she won’t be tempted to make the
most of it?
It’s stupid to think like that. Maya is old enough to make her own choices.
Plenty of girls her age sleep with their boyfriends. If she doesn’t this time, she
wil the next, or the time after, or the time after that. One way or another it’s
going to happen. One way or another I’m going to have to deal with it.
Except I can’t. I can’t deal with it at al. The very idea makes me want to
pound my head against the wal and smash things. The idea of DiMarco, or
anyone, holding her, touching her, kissing her . . .
A deafening bang, a blinding crack, pain shooting up my arm before I realize
I’ve punched the wal with al my might: pieces of paint and plaster are flaking
away from the imprint of my knuckles above the couch. Bent over double, I
clutch my right hand with my left, clenching my teeth to stop myself from
making a sound. For a moment everything darkens and I think I’m going to
pass out, but then the pain hits me repeatedly in shocking, terrifying waves. I
actualy don’t know what hurts more, my hand or my head. The thing I have
feared and railed against these past few weeks – the total loss of control over
my mind – has set in, and I have no way to fight it any more. I close my eyes
and feel the coil of madness climb up my spine and creep into my brain. I
watch it explode like the sun. So this is it, this is what it feels like after a long
hard struggle – to lose the battle and finaly go crazy.
CHAPTER TWELVE.
Maya.
He’s lovely. I don’t know why I ever thought he was some arrogant tosser.
Just goes to show how flawed one’s perception of others can be. He’s
considerate, he’s courteous, he’s polite; he actualy seems genuinely interested
in me. He tels me I look beautiful and then gives me a bashful smile. Once we
are seated in the restaurant, he translates every single item on the menu for me
and doesn’t laugh or even look surprised when I tel him I’ve never tried
artichokes before. He asks me lots of questions, but when I explain that my
family situation is complicated, he appears to take the hint and backs off. He
agrees that Belmont is a shithole and admits he can’t wait to get out. He asks
about Lochan and says he wishes he could get to know him better. He
confides that his father is more interested in his business than in his only son
and buys him ridiculous presents like a car to assuage his guilt for being
abroad half the year. Yes, he is rich and he is spoiled, yet he is as neglected as
we are.
A completely different set of circumstances; the same sad outcome.
We talk for a long time. As he drives me home, I find myself wondering if he
is going to kiss me.
At one point, as we both reach out to turn down the radio, our hands touch
and his lingers on mine for a moment. It feels strange, his fingers unfamiliar.
‘Shal I walk you to your door or would that be . . . awkward?’ He looks at me
hesitantly and smiles when I do. I envision smal faces peering from upstairs
windows and agree that it’s probably best if I get out alone. Fortunately, in the
darkness, he has overshot the front door by two houses so no one from home
can see us.
‘Thank you for dinner. I had a realy good time,’ I say, surprised to find myself
meaning it.
He smiles. ‘Me too. D’you think maybe we could do it again sometime?’
‘Yeah, why not?’
His smile broadens. He leans towards me. ‘Goodnight then.’
‘Goodnight.’ I hesitate, my fingers on the door handle.
‘Goodnight,’ he says again with a smile, but this time he cups my chin in his
hand. His face approaches mine and suddenly the realization hits me. I like
Nico. I actualy think he’s a pretty decent person. He’s good-looking and I’m
attracted to him. But I don’t want to kiss him. Not now. Not ever
. . . I turn my head away just as his face meets mine and his kiss lands on my
cheek instead.
As I draw back, he looks surprised. ‘OK, wel, til next time.’
I take a deep breath, groping for my bag at my feet, grateful for the darkness
that hides the blush spreading across my face. ‘I realy like you as a friend,
Nico,’ I say in a rush. ‘But, I’m sorry, I don’t think I can go out with you
again.’
‘Oh.’ He sounds surprised and a little hurt now. ‘Wel, look, just think about it,
OK?’
‘OK. See you Monday.’ I get out of the car and slam the door behind me. I
wave, and he is stil wearing that look of perplexed amusement as he drives
off, as if he thinks I am playing games.
I lean against a thick tree-trunk, staring up through the drizzle at a moonless
sky. I have never felt so embarrassed in al my life. Why did I spend the whole
evening leading him on? Acting fascinated by his stories, confiding in him?
Why did I agree to see him again ten seconds before teling him we could only
be friends? Why did I turn down a guy who, as wel as being hot, actualy
turned out to be nice?
Because you’re crazy, Maya. Because you are crazy and stupid and you want
to spend the rest of your life as a social outcast. Because you so wanted this to
work, you so desperately wanted this to work, you actually kidded yourself
into believing things were going really well. Until you realized that the idea
of kissing Nico, or any guy you could think of, was not what you wanted at
all.
What does this mean, then – I’m afraid? Scared of physical intimacy? No. I
crave it, I dream about it. But for me there’s no one. No one. Any guy, even
imaginary, would just feel like second best.
Second best to what? I don’t even have an image of the perfect boyfriend. I
just know he must exist.
Because I have al these feelings – of love, longing, wanting to be touched,
dreaming of being kissed –
yet no one to focus them on. It makes me want to scream in frustration. It
makes me feel like a freak.
But worse than that, I feel so desperately disappointed. Because al evening I
believed Nico was the one. And then, when he tried to kiss me in the car, I
realized with total, earth-shattering certainty that it would never feel right.
I trail back up to the house. This stupid dress is so short and skimpy, I’m
beginning to freeze. I feel so empty, so let down. Yet I have only let myself
down. Why couldn’t I have acted normal for a change? Why couldn’t I have
forced myself to kiss him? Maybe it wouldn’t have been so terrible.
Maybe I could have borne it . . . The lights in the front room are stil on. I
check my watch: quarter to eleven. Oh please, not another argument between
Kit and Lochan. I unlock the door and it sticks. I kick it with the stupid high
heels I doubt I’l ever wear again. The house, like a giant tomb, makes no
sound. I slide off my shoes and pad in stockinged feet down the halway to
switch off the light in the front room. Al I want to do is go to bed and forget
about this whole lousy, self-deluded evening.
A figure seated on the edge of the couch makes me jump. Lochan is hunched
over, his head in his hands.
‘I’m back.’
Not even a flicker of acknowledgement.
‘Is Kit stil out?’ I ask with trepidation, fearing another scene.
‘He came in about twenty minutes ago.’ Lochan doesn’t even look up.
Charming.
‘I had a great evening, by the way.’ My tone is caustic. But if he’s feeling
sorry for himself just because he had to put the children to bed on his own for
once, I refuse to give him the satisfaction of knowing that my evening was
crap too.
‘You only went out for dinner?’ Abruptly he lifts his head and favours me
with a penetrating gaze.
Self-conscious under his sudden scrutiny, I become aware that my hair is
coming down, stray strands hanging over my face, damp from standing out in
the drizzle.
‘Yes,’ I answer slowly. ‘Why?’
‘You went out at seven. It’s nearly eleven.’
I can’t believe this is Lochan talking. ‘You’re teling me I have to be home by
a certain time?’ My voice rises in outrage.
‘Of course not,’ he snaps irritably. ‘I’m just surprised. Four hours is a hel of a
long time to spend over dinner.’
I close the front-room door behind me as I feel my blood pressure begin to
rise. ‘It wasn’t four hours. By the time we’d driven halfway across town,
found a place to park, waited for a table . . . We just talked – a lot. Turns out
he’s a pretty interesting guy. He doesn’t exactly have it easy, either.’
As soon as the words are out of my mouth, Lochan leaps up, strides over to
the window, then swings back wildly. ‘I don’t give a damn about how poor
little rich boy didn’t get the exact car he wanted for his eighteenth – I’ve
heard al about that at Belmont. What I’m having trouble understanding is why
the hel you pretend to have just been out for dinner when you’ve been gone
four hours!’
This can’t be happening. Lochan has gone mad. He’s never spoken to me like
this in his life. I’ve never seen him so furious with me before.
‘Are you saying I have to account for my every move?’ I chalenge him, my
eyes widening in disbelief. ‘You’re actualy asking me for a blow-by-blow
account of what happened throughout the whole evening?’ My voice
continues to rise.
‘No! I just don’t want to be lied to!’ Lochan starts to shout.
‘What I do or don’t do on a date is none of your damn business!’ I yel in
return.
‘But why does it have to be secret? Can’t you just be honest?’
‘I am being honest! We went out for dinner, we talked, he drove me home.
End of story!’
‘Do you realy think I’m that gulible?’
This is the last straw. A row with Lochan after a week of being ignored: the
perfect end to an evening of bitter disappointment that, had I alowed it, could
have been so great. Al I wanted to do when I came in was crawl into bed and
try to put this wasted opportunity out of my mind. And instead I find myself
subjected to this.
I start backing away towards the door, raising my hands in surrender.
‘Lochan, I don’t know what the hel your problem is but you’re being an
absolute bastard. What’s happening to you? I come in expecting you to ask
me if I had a nice time, and instead you give me the third degree and then
accuse me of lying! Even if something had happened on this date, what on
earth makes you think I’d want to tel you?’ I turn for the door.
‘So you did sleep with him,’ he says flatly. ‘Like mother, like daughter.’
His words slice the air between us. My hand freezes around the cold metal
knob. Slowly, painfuly, I turn. ‘What?’ The word escapes from me in a smal
puff of air, barely more than a whisper.
Time seems to be suspended. He is standing there in his green T-shirt and
faded jeans, squeezing the knuckles of one hand with the palm of the other,
his back to the giant slice of night. And I find myself facing a stranger. His
face has a curious raw look, as if he’s been crying, but the fire in his eyes
scorches my face. How foolish I was to kid myself I knew him so wel. He is
my brother and yet, for the very first time, appears before me as a stranger.
‘I can’t believe you said that.’ My voice, a quiver of disbelief, emanates from
a being I barely recognize; one that is crushed, hurt beyond repair. ‘I always
thought of you as the one person’ – a steadying breath – ‘the one person who
would never, ever hurt me.’
He looks stricken, his face mirroring the pain and disbelief I feel inside.
‘Maya, I’m not feeling wel – that was unforgiveable. I don’t know what I’m
saying any more.’ His voice is shaking, as appaled as my own. Pressing his
hands to his face, he swings away from me, pacing the room, gasping for
breath, his eyes filed with a wild, almost manic look.
‘I just need to know – please understand – I have to know, otherwise I’m
going to lose my mind!’ He shuts his eyes tight and inhales raggedly.
‘Nothing happened!’ I shout, my anger abruptly replaced by fear. ‘Nothing
happened. Why won’t you believe me?’ I grab him by the shoulders. ‘Nothing
happened, Lochie! Nothing happened –
nothing, nothing, nothing!’ I am practicaly screaming but I don’t care. I don’t
understand what is happening to him. What is happening to me.
‘But he kissed you.’ His voice is holow, devoid of al emotion. Puling away
from me, he crouches down on his heels. ‘He kissed you, Maya, he kissed
you.’ His eyes are half closed, his face expressionless now, as if he is so
depleted he no longer has the strength to react.
‘He didn’t kiss me!’ I yel, grabbing his arms and trying to shake him back to
life. ‘He tried to, OK, but I didn’t let him! D’you know why? D’you want to
know why? D’you realy, realy want to know why?’ Stil gripping him with
both hands, I lean forward, gasping, as tears, hot and heavy, fal down my
cheeks. ‘This is why . . .’ Crying, I kiss Lochan’s cheek. ‘This is why . . .’
With a muffled sob, I kiss the corner of Lochan’s lips. ‘This is why . . . !’
Closing my eyes, I kiss Lochan’s mouth.
I’m faling, but I know I’m OK, because it’s with him, it’s with Lochie. My
hands are on his burning cheeks, my hands are in his damp hair, my hands are
against his warm neck. He is kissing me back now, with strange little sounds
that suggest he might be crying too, kissing me so hard that he is shuddering,
gripping the tops of my arms tight and puling me towards him. I taste his lips,
his tongue, the sharp edges of his front teeth, the soft warmth inside his
mouth. I slide up astride his lap, wanting to get even closer, wanting to
disappear into him, blend my body with his. We come up briefly for air and I
catch sight of his face. His eyes brim with unfalen tears. He emits a ragged
sound; we kiss some more, soft and tender, then fierce and hard again, his
hands grasping at the straps of my dress, twisting them, clenching the material
in his fists as if fighting back pain. And I know how he feels – it’s so good it
hurts. I think I’m going to die from happiness. I think I’m going to die from
pain. Time has stopped; time is racing. Lochie’s lips are rough yet smooth,
hard yet gentle. His fingers are strong: I feel them in my hair and on my neck
and down my arms and against my back. And I never want him to let me go.
A sound explodes like a thunderclap above us; our bodies jolt in unison and
suddenly we are not kissing any more, although I cling to the colar of his Tshirt, his arms strong and tight around me.
There is the sound of the toilet flushing, then the familiar creak of Kit’s
ladder. Neither of us seems able to move, even though the ensuing silence
makes it clear Kit has gone back to bed. My head against Lochan’s chest, I
hear the magnified sounds of his heart – very loud, very fast, very strong. I
can hear his breathing too: sharp jagged spikes piercing the frozen air.
He is the first to break the silence. ‘Maya, what the hel are we doing?’
Although his voice is barely more than a whisper, he sounds close to tears. ‘I
don’t understand: why – why the hel is this happening to us?’
I close my eyes and press against him, stroking his bare arm with my
fingertips. ‘Al I know right now is that I love you,’ I say in quiet desperation,
the words spiling out of their own accord. ‘I love you far more than just as a
brother. I . . . I love you in – in every kind of way.’
‘I feel like that too . . .’ His voice is shocked and raw. ‘It’s – it’s a feeling so
big I sometimes think it’s going to swalow me. It’s so strong I feel it could kil
me. It keeps growing and I can’t – I don’t know what to do to stop it. But –
but we’re not supposed to do this – to love each other like this!’
His voice cracks.
‘I know that, OK? I’m not stupid!’ I’m angry suddenly because I don’t want
to hear it. I close my eyes because I just can’t think about that now. I can’t let
myself think about what it means. I won’t think about what it’s caled. I refuse
to let labels from the outside world spoil the happiest day of my life. The day
I kissed the boy I had always held in my dreams but never alowed myself to
see. The day I finaly ceased lying to myself, ceased pretending it was just one
kind of love I felt for him when in reality it was every kind of love possible.
The day we finaly broke free of our restraints and gave way to the feelings we
had so long denied just because we happened to be brother and sister.
‘We’ve – oh God – we’ve done a terrible thing.’ Lochan’s voice is shaking,
hoarse and breathless with horror. ‘I – I’ve done a terrible thing to you!’
I wipe my cheeks and turn my head to look up at him. ‘We haven’t done
anything wrong! How can love like this be caled terrible when we’re not
hurting anyone?’
He gazes down at me, his eyes glistening in the weak light. ‘I don’t know,’ he
whispers. ‘How can something so wrong feel so right?’
CHAPTER THIRTEEN.
Lochan.
I tel Maya that she needs to sleep but I know I can’t – I’m too afraid to go
upstairs and sit on my bed and go crazy in that tiny room, alone with my
terrifying thoughts. She says she wants to stay with me: she’s frightened that
if she goes away, I’l disappear. She doesn’t need to explain – I feel it too: the
fear that if we part now, this incredible night wil just vanish, evaporate like a
dream, and we wil wake in the morning back in our separate bodies, back in
our ordinary lives. Yet here on the couch, my arms around her as she sits
curled up against me, head resting against my chest, I stil feel frightened –
more frightened than I’ve ever been before. What just happened was
unbelievable yet somehow completely natural, as if deep down I always knew
this moment would come, even though I never once alowed myself to
consciously think about it, to imagine it in any way. Now that it has arrived, I
can only think of Maya, sitting right here against me, her breath warm against
my bare arm.
It’s as if there is a great wal preventing me from crossing to the other side,
from casting my mind out into the external world, the world beyond the two
of us. Nature’s security valve is at work, preventing me from even
contemplating the implications of what just happened, keeping me, for the
moment at least, safe from the horror of what I have done. It’s as if my mind
knows it cannot go there yet, knows that right now I’m not strong enough to
deal with the outcome of these overwhelming feelings, these momentous
actions. But the fear remains – the fear that in the cold light of day we wil be
forced to come to terms with what was, quite simply, an awful mistake; the
fear that we wil have no choice but to bury this night as if it never took place,
a shameful secret to be filed away for the rest of our lives until, brittle with
age, it crumbles to dust – a faint, distant memory, like the powder of a moth’s
wings on a windowpane, the spectre of something that perhaps never
occurred, existing solely in our imagination.
I cannot bear the thought of this being just one moment in time, over almost
before it started, already retreating into the past. I must hold onto it with al my
might. I cannot alow Maya to slip away because, for the first time in my life,
my love for her feels whole, and everything that has led up to this point
suddenly makes sense, as if al this was meant to be. But as I gaze down at her
sleepy face, the freckled cheekbones, the white skin, the dark curl of her
eyelashes, I feel an overwhelming ache, like acute homesickness – a longing
for something I can never have. Sensing my eyes on her, she looks up and
smiles, but it is a sad smile, as if she too knows how precarious our new love
is, how dangerously threatened by the outside world. The ache inside me
deepens, and al I can think of is what it felt like to kiss her, how brief that
moment was and how desperately I want to live it once more.
She keeps on looking at me with that little wistful smile, as if waiting, as if
she knows. And the blood is hot in my face, my heart racing, my breath
quickening, and she notices that too. Raising her head from my chest, she
asks, ‘Do you want to kiss me again?’
I nod, mute, heart pounding anew.
She looks at me expectantly, hopefuly. ‘Go on, then.’
I close my eyes, my breathing laboured, my chest filing with a mounting
sense of despair. ‘I don’t
– I don’t think I can.’
‘Why not?’
‘Because I’m worried . . . Maya, what if we can’t stop?’
‘We don’t have to . . .’
I breathe deeply and turn away, the air around me thrumming with heat.
‘Don’t even think like that!’
Her expression sobers and she brushes her fingers up and down the inside of
my arm, her eyes heavy with sadness. Yet her touch fils me with longing. I
never thought that the mere touch of a hand could stir so much.
‘Al right, Lochie, we’l stop.’
‘You have to stop. Promise me.’
‘I promise.’ She touches my cheek, turning me back towards her. I take her
face in my hands and start to kiss her, gently at first; and as I do so, al the pain
and worry and loneliness and fear start to evaporate until al I can think of is
the taste of her lips, the warmth of her tongue, the smel of her skin, her touch,
her caresses. And then I’m struggling to keep calm and her hands are pressing
against the sides of my face, her breath hot and rapid against my cheek, her
mouth warm and wet. My hands want to touch her al over, but I can’t, I can’t,
and we’re kissing so hard it hurts – it hurts that I can’t do more, it hurts that
however hard I kiss her I can’t . . . I can’t—
‘Lochie . . .’
I don’t care about the promise. I don’t remember why I even suggested it. I
don’t care about anything – anything except for—
‘Easy, Lochie—’
I press my lips back down over her mouth, holding her tight to stop her from
moving away.
‘Lochie, stop.’ This time she puls away and pushes me back, holding me at
arm’s length, her fingers gripping my shoulders. Her lips are red – she looks
flushed and wild and exquisite.
I’m breathing too fast. Much too fast.
‘You made me promise.’ She looks upset.
‘I know, al right!’Jumping up, I start pacing the room. I wish there was an icy
pool of water for me to dive into.
‘Are you OK?’
No, I’m not. I’ve never felt like this before and it scares me. My body seems
to have taken over.
I’m so aroused I can hardly think. I’ve got to calm down. I’ve got to stay in
control. I can’t let this happen. I run my hands through my hair repeatedly and
the air escapes from my lungs in a rush.
‘I’m sorry. I should have said it sooner.’
‘No!’ I spin round. ‘It’s not your fault, for God’s sake!’
‘Al right, al right! Why are you angry?’
‘I’m not! I’m just—’ I stop and lean my forehead against the wal, fighting the
urge to head-butt it.
‘Oh, Jesus, what are we going to do?’
‘Nobody would have to find out,’she says softly, chewing the tip of her
thumb.
‘No!’ I shout.
Storming into the kitchen, I rummage furiously through the freezer for ice
cubes for a cold drink.
Hot acid shoots through my veins and my heart is hammering so hard I can
hear it. It’s not just the physical frustration, it’s the impossibility of our
situation, the horror of what we’ve got ourselves into, the despair of knowing
that I wil never be able to love Maya the way I want to.
‘Lochie, for goodness’sake, calm down.’ Her hand touches my arm as I
wrestle with the freezer drawer.
I knock it away. ‘Don’t!’
She takes a step back.
‘D’you know what we’re doing here? Have you any idea at al? D’you know
what they cal this?’
I slam the freezer shut and move round to the other side of the table.
‘What’s got into you?’she breathes. ‘Why are you suddenly turning on me?’
I stop abruptly and stare at her. ‘We can’t do this,’ I blurt out, aghast with the
sudden realization.
‘We can’t. If we start, how wil we ever stop? How on earth wil we be able to
keep this a secret from everyone for the rest of our lives? We’l have no life –
we’l be trapped, living in hiding, always having to pretend—’
She stares back at me, her blue eyes wide with shock. ‘The kids . . .’she says
softly, a new realization suddenly dawning. ‘The kids – if even one person
found out, they’d be taken away!’
‘Yes.’
‘So we can’t do this? We realy can’t?’ It’s phrased as a question, but I can see
by the stricken look on her face that she already knows the answer.
Shaking my head slowly, I swalow hard and turn to look out of the kitchen
window to hide the tears in my eyes. The sky is on fire and the night has
ended.
CHAPTER FOURTEEN.
Maya.
I’m tired. So terribly tired. It crushes down on me like an invisible force,
obliterating al rational thought, al other feeling. I’m tired of dragging myself
through each day, wearing my mask, pretending everything is OK. Trying to
take in what others are saying, trying to concentrate in class, trying to appear
normal in front of Kit, Tiffin and Wila. I’m tired of spending every minute of
every hour of every day fighting back tears, swalowing repeatedly to try and
ease the constant ache at the back of my throat. Even at night, as I lie there
hugging my pilow, staring out through the open curtains, I don’t alow myself
to give in – because if I did I would fal apart, I would fragment into a
thousand pieces like shattered glass. People constantly ask me what’s the
matter and it makes me want to scream.
Francie thinks it’s because Nico dumped me and I let her – it’s easier than
coming up with another lie.
Nico tries to talk to me a couple of times during break but I make it clear that
I’m in no mood for conversation. He looks hurt, but I’m beyond caring. If it
weren’t for you . . . I find myself thinking. If it weren’t for that date . . .
But how can I blame Nico for making me realize I was in love with my
brother? The feeling had been there for years, rising closer and closer to the
surface with every passing day; only a matter of time before it broke through
our fragile web of denial, forcing us to confront the truth and acknowledge
who we are: two people in love – a love that nobody else could possibly
understand.
Do I realy regret that night? That one moment of joy beyond compare – some
people never experience it in a lifetime. But the downside to that taste of pure
happiness is that, like a drug, a glimmer of paradise, it leaves you craving
more. And after that moment, nothing can ever be the same again. Everything
greys in comparison. The world becomes bland and vacuous, there seems
little point to anything any more. Going to school – for what? To pass exams,
to get good marks, to go to university, to meet new people, to find a job, to
move away? How wil I be able to live a life apart from Lochan? Wil I just see
him a few times a year, like Mum and Uncle Ryan? They grew up together,
they were once close too. But then he got married and moved to Glasgow. So
what do Mum and Uncle Ryan have in common now? Separated by so much
more than distance and lifestyle, even their memories of a shared childhood
have faded from their minds. Is that what wil happen to Lochan and me? And
even if we both stay here in London, when he finds a girlfriend, when I find a
boyfriend, how wil we bear it? How wil we be able to watch each other
leading separate lives, knowing what could have been?
I try to shock myself out of the pain by thinking about the alternative. Having
a physical relationship with one’s brother? Nobody does that, it’s disgusting,
it would be like having Kit as my boyfriend. I shudder. I love Kit, but the idea
of kissing him is beyond revolting. It would be horrendous, it would be
repulsive – even the thought of him snogging that skinny American girl he’s
always hanging around with is bad enough. I don’t want to know what he gets
up to with his so-caled girlfriend. When he’s older, I hope he meets someone
kind, I hope he fals in love, gets married, but I would never, ever want to even
think about the intimate details, the physical side of things. That’s his
business. Why, then – why is it so different with Lochan? But the answer is so
simple: because Lochan has never felt like a brother. Neither an annoying
younger one nor a bossy older one. He and I have always been equals. We’ve
been best friends since we were toddlers. We’ve shared a bond closer than
friendship al our lives. Together we’ve brought up Kit, Tiffin and Wila. We’ve
cried together and comforted each other. We’ve each seen the other at their
most vulnerable. We’ve shared a burden inexplicable to the outside world.
We’ve been there for each other – as friends, as partners. We’ve always loved
each other, and now we want to be able to love each other in a physical way
as wel.
I want to explain al this to him, but I know I can’t. I know that whatever the
reasons for our feelings, however much I try to justify them, it doesn’t change
anything: Lochan cannot be my boyfriend. Out of the milions and milions of
people that inhabit this planet, he is one of the tiny few I can never have. And
this is something I must accept – even if, like acid on metal, it is slowly
corroding me inside.
The term grinds on, grey, bleak, relentless. At home, the daily routine
continues to folow its course, over and over. Autumn gives way to winter, the
days growing noticeably shorter. Lochan behaves as if that night never
happened. We both do. What alternative do we have? We speak together
about mundane things, but our gazes rarely meet, and when they do, it is only
a moment or two before they shrink nervously away. But I wonder what he is
thinking. I suspect that, seeing it as something so wrong, he has pushed it
right out of his head. And anyway, he has enough on his mind. His English
teacher is stil on a one-woman mission to get him to speak in front of the
class and I know he dreads her lessons. Mum’s behaviour is increasingly
erratic – she spends more and more time at Dave’s and rarely comes home
sober. Now and then she goes out on a shopping spree and returns with guiltinduced presents for everyone: flimsy toys that wil get broken within days,
more computer games to keep Kit glued to his screen, sweets that wil send
Tiffin hyper. I watch it al as if from a very great distance, incapable of
engaging with anything any more. Lochan, white-faced and tense, tries to
keep some kind of order in the house but I sense he too is close to breaking
point and I am unable to help him.
Sitting across from him at the kitchen table, watching him help Wila with her
homework, I’m overcome with this terrible ache, this profound sense of loss.
Stirring my long-cold tea, I watch al his familiar traits: the way he blows the
hair out of his eyes every few minutes, chews on his lower lip whenever he
feels tense. I look at his hands, with their bitten-down nails, resting on the
tabletop, his lips, which once touched mine, now chapped and raw. The pain I
feel when looking at him is more than I can bear but I force myself to keep
watching, to soak in as much of him as I can, trying to recapture, in my mind
at least, al that I’ve lost.
‘The boy went into the c – a – v – e.’ Wila sounds the letters out. Kneeling up
on the kitchen chair, she points at each letter in turn, her fine golden hair
curtaining her face, the ends brushing the page of her book with a faint
whispery sound.
‘What word does that make?’ Lochan prompts her.
Wila studies the picture. ‘Rock?’she says optimisticaly, glancing up at
Lochan, her blue eyes wide and hopeful.
‘No. Look at the word: c – a – v – e. Put the sounds together and say them
quickly. What word does it make?’
‘Kav?’ She is restless and inattentive, desperate to go and play but pleased,
nonetheless, by the attention.
‘Nearly, but there’s an e at the end. What do we cal that e?’
‘A capital e?’
Lochan’s tongue darts out, rubbing his lip in impatience. ‘Look, this is a
capital e.’ He flicks through the book in search of one, fails, and writes one
himself on a piece of used kitchen rol.
‘Eugh. Tiffin blew his nose on that.’
‘Wila, are you looking? That’s a capital e.’
‘A snotty capital e.’ Wila begins to laugh; she catches my eye and I feel
myself smile too.
‘Wila, this is very important. It’s an easy word – I know you can read it if you
try. This is a magic e. What does a magic e do?’
She frowns hard and leans over the book again, curling her tongue above her
lip in concentration, her hair partialy obscuring the page. ‘It makes the vowel
say its name!’she shouts out suddenly, punching the air triumphantly with her
smal fist.
‘Good. So which one’s the vowel?’
‘Hm . . .’ She returns to the page with the same frown, the same curled
tongue. ‘Hm . . .’she says again, staling for time. ‘The a?’
‘Good girl. So the magic e turns the a sound into an—’
‘Ay.’
‘Yes. So try and sound out the word again.’
‘C – ay – v. Cave! The boy went into the cave! Look, Lochie, I read it!’
‘Clever girl! See, I knew you could do it!’ He smiles, but there is something
else in his eyes. A sadness that never fades.
Wila finishes reading her book and goes to join Tiffin in front of the TV. I
pretend to sip my tea, watching Lochan over the rim of the mug. Too tired to
move, he sits back, limp, bits of paper and scattered books and school letters
and Wila’s book bag spread out in front of him. A long silence stretches out
between us, as taut as a rubber band.
‘Are you OK?’ I ask him eventualy.
He gives a wry smile and appears to hesitate, gazing down at the littered
table. ‘Not realy,’ he replies at length, avoiding my gaze. ‘You?’
‘No.’ With the rim of my mug I press my lip down against my teeth in an
attempt to stop the tears.
‘I miss you,’ I whisper.
‘I miss you too.’ He is stil staring down at the cover of Wila’s reading book.
His eyes seem to catch the light. ‘Maybe—’ His voice comes out unsteady so
he tries again. ‘M-maybe you should give DiMarco another chance. Rumour
has it he’s – he’s pretty crazy about you!’ A forced laugh.
I stare at him in stunned silence. I feel like I’ve been dealt a blow to the head.
‘Is that what you want?’ I ask with carefuly controled calm.
‘No – no. That’s not what I want at al. But maybe it would . . . help?’ He
glances up at me with a look of pure desperation.
I continue pressing my teeth into my lip until I’m sure I’m not going to start
crying, swirling his outrageous proposition around in my head. ‘Help me or
help you?’
His bottom lip quivers for a moment and he immediately bites down on it,
apparently unaware that he is making a concertina out of the cover of Wila’s
reading book. ‘I don’t know. Maybe both of us,’ he says in a rush.
‘Then you should go out with Francie,’ I shoot back.
‘OK.’ He doesn’t look up.
I am momentarily speechless. ‘You – but – I thought you didn’t fancy her?’
The horror in my voice resonates across the room.
‘I don’t, but we’ve got to do something. We’ve got to go out with other
people. It’s – it’s the only way—’
‘The only way to what?’
‘To – to get over this. To survive.’
I slam my mug down on the table, sloshing tea over my hand and shirt cuff.
‘You think I’m just going to get over this?’ I shout, the blood pounding in my
face.
Ducking his head and flinching as if I am about to deal him a blow, he raises a
hand to ward me off. ‘Don’t – I can’t – please don’t make it worse.’
‘How could I?’ I gasp. ‘How could I possibly do anything to make this
worse?’
‘Al I know is that we have to do something. I can’t go on – I can’t go on like
this!’ He inhales raggedly and turns away.
‘I know.’ I lower my voice, forcing myself back into some semblance of calm.
‘Neither can I.’
‘What else can we do?’ His eyes plead with mine.
‘Fine.’ I shut down my thoughts, shut down my senses. ‘I’l tel Francie
tomorrow. She’l be over the moon. But she’s a decent person, Lochan. You
can’t just dump her after a week.’
‘I won’t.’ He looks at me, his eyes ful. ‘I’l stay with her for as long as she
likes. I’l marry her, if that’s what she wants. I mean, at the end of the day,
what the hel does it matter who I end up with if it can’t be you?’
Everything feels different today. The house is chiled and alien. Kit, Tiffin and
Wila seem like impersonators of their real selves. I can’t even look at Lochan,
the embodiment of my loss. The streets on the way to school seem to have
changed overnight. I could be in some foreign town, in some far-flung
country. The pedestrians around me don’t feel quite alive. I don’t feel alive.
I’m not sure who I am any more. The girl who existed before that night,
before the kiss, has been erased from life. I am no longer who I was; I stil
don’t know who I wil become. The nervous honks of cars jar me, as do the
sounds of feet on the pavement, buses going by, shops opening their shutters,
the highpitched chatter of children making their way to school.
The building is bigger than I remember: a stark, colourless concrete
landscape. Pupils hurrying this way and that look like extras on a film set. I
must move in order to fit into al this activity, just as an electron must obey the
current. I take the stairs very slowly, one at a time, as people shove and push
past me. When I reach my form room, I see things I have never noticed
before: the fingerprints on the wals, the speckled lino, cracked like a delicate
eggshel, disappearing rhythmicaly beneath my feet.
Far off, voices try to bump up against me, but I repel them. The sounds
bounce off me without registering: the scraping of chairs, the laughs and the
chatter, Francie’s nattering, the history teacher’s drone. Sunlight breaks
through the blanket of cloud, slanting in through the great glass windows,
across my desk, into my eyes. White spots form in the space in front of me,
dancing bubbles of colour and light that hold me captive until the bel goes.
Francie is at my side, her mouth ful of questions, her painted red lips forming
and re-forming – lips that wil soon touch Lochan’s. I have to tel her now
before it’s too late, but my voice is gone and al that comes out is empty air.
I skip second period to escape her. Walk around the empty school, my giant
prison cel, searching for answers that can never be found. My shoes tap
against the steps as I go up and down and round and round each floor,
searching for – what – some kind of absolution? The harsh winter light
strengthens, flooding through the windows and bouncing off the wals. I feel
the pressure of it against my body, burning holes into my skin. I am lost in
this maze of corridors, staircases, floors stacked one above the other like a
pile of cards. If I keep going, maybe I wil find my way back – back to the
person I used to be. I am moving more slowly now. Maybe even floating. I
swim through space. The earth has lost its gravity, everything feels liquid
around me. I reach another staircase, the treads melting down. The sole of my
shoe peels off the topmost one and I step into nothingness.
CHAPTER FIFTEEN.
Lochan.
I stare at the back of Nico DiMarco’s head. I fix on his dark, blunt-fingered
hand resting on the edge of his desk, and the thought of those fingers touching
Maya makes me feel physicaly sick. I can’t stand by and watch anyone go out
with my sister, any more than I myself can go out with Francie or any other
girl and pretend she can replace her. I need to find Maya and hope to God it’s
not too late. I need to tel her the deal is off. Perhaps, with time, she wil find
someone she can be with. And I wil be happy, if only for her. But for me there
can never be anyone else. The absolute certainty of this fact suffocates me.
Above the board, the hands of the clock are moving. Second period is almost
over. She wouldn’t have told Francie yet, surely? She must be planning to
wait until morning break. I feel spectacularly il.
Just because I can’t go ahead with this doesn’t mean she wil feel the same
way. It may have been my idea, but she proposed the exchange. Maybe she
has made up her mind to give DiMarco a second chance. Maybe the agony of
the past few weeks has made her realize what a relief a normal relationship
would be.
The bel goes and I shoot out of my seat, grabbing my bag and blazer as I go,
ignoring the teacher’s shouts about homework. There is a massive jam on
staircase five. I head for the stairs at the other end. Throngs of people have
accumulated here too. Except they are motionless. They have stopped in their
tracks, an amoeba-like cluster, turning to one another to talk in urgent, excited
tones. I push past them. Thick red tape strung across the top of the staircase
brings me to a halt. As I duck underneath, I’m puled back by a hand on my
shoulder.
‘You can’t go down that way,’ a voice says. ‘There’s been an accident.’
I take an involuntary step back. Oh, this is just great.
‘Some girl fel. They’ve only just moved her to the medical room. She was
unconscious,’someone else adds in a reverential tone.
I look at the tape, tempted just to duck underneath again.
‘Who fel?’ I hear another voice behind me ask.
‘It was a girl from my class. Maya Whitely. I saw it happen – she didn’t fal,
she jumped.’
‘Hey!’
I dive under the tape and race down the two flights of stairs, the soles of my
shoes screeching on the lino. The ground floor is crawling with pupils
heading out to break, everyone moving in slow motion. I shove my way
through the crowds, shoulders bruising shoulders, people jostling me from al
angles, angry shouts folowing me as I force my way past.
‘Hey, hey, hey—’ Someone has me by the arm. I spin round, ready to shove
them back, and find myself staring into the face of Miss Azley. ‘Lochan, you
need to wait out here – the nurse is busy—’
I wrench my arm out of her grasp and she moves to block the entrance.
‘What’s the matter?’she asks. ‘Are you feeling unwel? Sit here and let me see
if I can help you.’
I take an involuntary step backwards. ‘Let me past,’ I gasp. ‘For God’s sake, I
need to—’
‘You need to wait here. Someone’s just had an accident and Mrs Shah is
dealing with that at the moment.’
‘It’s Maya—’
‘What?’
‘My sister!’
Her face changes. ‘Oh God. Lochan, listen, she’s going to be fine. She just
fainted. She didn’t fal very far—’
‘Please let me see her!’
‘Sit down for a second and I’l ask the nurse.’
Miss Azley disappears through the door. I sit on one of the plastic chairs and
press my fist against my mouth, my lungs crying out for air.
Minutes later, Miss Azley comes out to tel me that Maya is fine, just a little
shocked and bruised.
She asks me for our mother’s phone number – I tel her that she is away and
that I wil take Maya home. She looks concerned and informs me that Maya
needs to be taken to A&E to be checked for concussion. I insist I can deal
with that too.
Finaly they let me see her. She is in the smal white anteroom, sitting on a bed,
sagging back against a cushion, a lime-green blanket puled halfway across her
lap. Her tie has been removed and her right sleeve roled up, revealing a thin
white arm with vivid pink bruising. A large plaster covers her elbow. Her
shoes have been taken off too and her bare legs hang off the side of the bed, a
white crepe bandage enveloping one knee. Her copper hair, freed from its
ponytail, hangs loose over her shoulders. Her face is drained of al colour.
Cracked, dried blood surrounds a smal cut on her cheekbone, the crimson
stain contrasting painfuly with the rest of her face. Violet shadows underline
pink-rimmed, empty eyes. She doesn’t smile when she sees me: the light is
gone from her face, a dul look of shocked resignation in its place.
As I take a step into the smal space between the door and the bed, she seems
to shrink away.
Quickly I move back again, pressing my sweaty palms against the cold wal
behind me.
‘What – what happened?’
She blinks a couple of times and studies me wearily for a moment. ‘It’s al
right. I’m al right—’
‘Just t-tel me what happened, Maya!’ There is an edge to my voice that I can’t
conceal.
‘I fainted while I was going down the stairs. I skipped breakfast and I was
dehydrated, that’s al.’
‘What did the nurse say?’
‘That I’m fine. That I shouldn’t miss meals. She wants me to go to the
hospital to be checked out for concussion but there’s no need. My head
doesn’t hurt.’
‘They think you fainted because you missed breakfast?’ My voice begins to
rise. ‘But that’s absurd! You’ve never fainted before and you hardly ever eat
breakfast.’
She closes her eyes as if my words are hurting her. ‘Lochie, I’m fine. Realy.
Could you please just persuade the nurse to let me out of here?’ She opens her
eyes again and looks troubled for a moment. ‘Or – or have you got classes
you can’t miss?’
I gape at her. ‘Don’t be ridiculous. I’m taking you home with me right now.’
She gives me a little smile and I feel as if I’m faling. ‘Thank you.’
Mrs Shah cals a cab to take us to the local hospital, but as soon as we’re
outside the gates, Maya sends the driver away. She moves away from me
along the pavement, her hand trailing the wal for balance. ‘Come on. I’m
going home.’
‘The nurse said you might have concussion! We’ve got to go to the hospital!’
‘Don’t be sily. I didn’t even bump my head.’ She continues her unsteady path
down the road, then half turns, holding out her hand. At first I just stare at it,
uncomprehending.
‘Can I lean on you a bit?’ Her eyes are apologetic. ‘My legs feel kind of
wobbly.’
I rush to her and grab her hand, wrapping her arm round my waist, putting my
arm around her.
‘Like this? Is – is this OK?’
‘That’s great, but you don’t have to squeeze me so tight . . .’
I loosen my grip fractionaly. ‘Better?’
‘Much better.’ We move off down the road, her body, leaning against mine, as
light and frail as a bird’s.
‘Hey, look at this,’she says, a hint of amusement in her voice. ‘I got us both a
whole day off school and it’s not even’ – she lifts my hand from her waist to
get a look at my watch – ‘eleven o’clock.’ With a smile, she raises her face so
that her eyes meet mine and the late morning sun washes across her colourless
face.
I force an uneven breath into my lungs. ‘Crafty,’ I manage, swalowing hard.
We walk on for a few minutes in silence. Maya is holding onto me tightly.
Now and again she slows to a halt and I ask her if she wants to sit down but
she shakes her head.
‘I’m sorry,’she says softly.
God. No. The air starts to shudder in my chest.
‘It was my idea too,’she adds.
I take a deep breath and hold it, turning my head away. If I bite my lip hard
enough and force myself to meet the stares of curious passers-by, I can keep
myself together for a bit longer, just a bit longer. But she can tel. I feel her
concern permeate my skin like a gentle warmth.
‘Lochie?’
Stop. Don’t speak. I can’t bear it, Maya. I can’t. Please understand.
She turns her face towards me. ‘Don’t beat yourself up about it, Lochie. It
wasn’t your fault,’she whispers against my shoulder.
Maya goes into the kitchen while I hang back, pretending to sort through the
post, trying to pul myself together. And then, suddenly, I’m aware of her
silhouette in the doorway. She looks battered, with her tangled hair and
crumpled clothes and bandaged knee. A burgundy stain is spreading beneath
the skin of her cheekbone: in a couple of days it wil have bloomed into a large
bruise right across her cheek.
Maya, I’m so sorry, I want to say. I never ever meant to hurt you.
‘Would you mind making me a cup of coffee?’she asks with a tentative smile.
‘Course . . .’ I glance down unseeingly at the envelopes in my hand. ‘Of ccourse . . .’
She smiles at me properly this time. ‘I think I might curl up on the couch in
front of some crappy daytime TV.’
There is a silence. I flick through some junk mail and take a moment to reply
as a pain, like a sliver of glass, slowly pierces the back of my throat.
‘Come and keep me company?’ She is hesitating now, stil waiting for my
reply.
An invisible noose tightens round my neck. I cannot answer.
‘Lochie?’
I don’t move. If I do, I lose. ‘Hey . . .’ She takes a sudden step towards me
and I immediately back up, banging my elbow against the front door.
‘Lochie, I’m al right.’ Slowly she holds up her hands. ‘Look at me, I’m fine.
You can see that, can’t you? I just slipped, that’s al. I was tired. Everything’s
al right.’
But it’s not, it’s not, because I’m slowly being torn in two. You stand there,
covered in cuts and bruises that I might as well have inflicted on you with my
own hands. And I love you, so much that it’s killing me, yet all I can do is
push you away and hurt you until eventually your love will turn to hate.
The pain wels up in my chest, my breathing starts to fragment and scalding
tears force their way into my eyes. Abruptly I crumple up the glossy ads in
my hands and lean heavily against the wal, pressing the shiny paper against
my face.
There is a moment of shocked silence before I feel Maya by my side, gently
puling at my hands.
‘Don’t, Lochie, it’s al right. Look at me. I’m fine!’
I take an uneven breath. ‘I’m sorry – I’m just so sorry!’
‘Sorry about what, Lochie? I don’t understand!’
‘The idea – last night – it was so awful, it was so stupid—’
‘It doesn’t matter about that now. It’s finished, OK? We know we can’t do it
so we’re never going to think about doing anything like that again.’ Her voice
is firm, reassuring.
I throw down the paper and bang my head back against the wal, rubbing my
arm savagely across my eyes. ‘I didn’t know what else to do! I was desperate
– I’m still desperate! I can’t stop feeling like this!’ I am shouting now, frantic.
I feel like I’m losing my mind.
‘Listen . . .’ She takes my hands and rubs them in an effort to calm me. ‘I
never wanted Nico or anyone else. Just you.’
I look at her, the sound of my breath rough and uneven in the sudden silence.
‘You can have me,’
I whisper shakily. ‘I’m here. I’l always be here.’
Her face floods with relief as her hands reach for my face. ‘We were stupid –
we thought they could stop us.’ She strokes my hair, kisses my forehead, my
cheeks, the edge of my lip. ‘They’l never stop us. Not as long as this is what
we both want. But you’ve got to stop thinking it’s wrong, Lochie. That’s just
what other people think; it’s their problem, their stupid rules, their prejudices.
They’re the ones who are wrong, narrow-minded, cruel . . .’ She kisses my
ear, my neck, my mouth.
‘They’re the ones who are wrong,’she repeats. ‘Because they don’t
understand. I don’t care if you happen biologicaly to be my brother. You’ve
never just felt like a brother to me. You’ve always been my best friend, my
soul mate, and now I’ve falen in love with you too. Why is that such a crime?
I want to be able to hold you and kiss you and – and do al the things that
people in love are alowed to do.’ She takes a deep breath. ‘I want to spend the
rest of my life with you.’
I close my eyes and press my hot face against her cheek. ‘We wil. We’l find a
way. Maya, we have to . . .’
When I push open her bedroom door with my elbow, a glass of juice in one
hand, a sandwich in the other, I find her fast asleep, sprawled out face down
on the bed, the duvet kicked back, arms circling her head on the pilow. She
looks so vulnerable, so fragile. The bright midday light iluminates the side of
her sleeping face, a strip of her crumpled, oversized school shirt, the edge of
her white knickers, the top of her thigh. Navigating the discarded skirt, socks
and shoes strewn across the carpet, I place the plate and glass beside a stack
of papers on her desk and straighten up slowly. I watch her for a long time.
After a while my legs begin to ache and I slide down into a sitting position
against the wal, arms resting on my knees. I’m afraid that if I leave, even for a
moment, something might happen to her again; I’m afraid that if I leave, the
black wal of fear wil return. But here beside her, the sight of her sleeping face
reminds me that nothing else matters, that in this I’m not alone. This is what
Maya wants, this is what I want – fighting it is no use, can only hurt us both.
The human body needs a constant flow of nourishment, air and love to
survive. Without Maya I lose al three; apart we wil slowly die.
I must have drifted off, for the sound of her voice sends a jolt through my
body and I straighten up, rubbing my neck. She blinks at me sleepily, her
cheek resting on the edge of the mattress, russet hair brushing the floor. I
don’t know what she said to wake me, but now her arm is outstretched, her
palm turned towards me. I take her hand and she smiles.
‘I made you a sandwich,’ I tel her, glancing up at the desk. ‘How are you
feeling?’
She doesn’t reply, her eyes drawing me in. The warmth of her hand seeps into
mine and her fingers tighten as she puls me gently towards her. ‘Come here,’
she says in a voice stil scratchy with sleep.
I stare back at her, feeling my pulse quicken. She releases my hand and moves
back to the far side of the bed, leaving a space for me. I pul off my shoes and
socks and stand up unsteadily as she holds out her arms.
As I lower my body onto the mattress beside her, I inhale her smel and feel
her legs entwine with mine. She kisses me gently – soft, whispery kisses that
make my face tingle and send tremors running through my body, creating
instant arousal. I am acutely aware of her bare legs caught between mine –
afraid she wil feel, afraid she wil know. I close my eyes and inhale deeply in
an effort to keep calm, but she kisses my eyelids and her hair tickles my neck
and face and I hear my breathing become shalow and rapid.
‘It’s al right,’she says with a smile in her voice. ‘I love you.’
I open my eyes and lift my head off the pilow and start kissing her back,
gently at first, but then she puts her arm round my neck and puls me closer,
and our kisses begin to quicken, growing deeper and more urgent until it’s
difficult to find time to breathe. I cradle her head with one arm, clasping her
hand with the other. Every kiss is becoming fiercer than the one before until
I’m frightened I’m hurting her. I don’t know where to go from here, I don’t
know what to do. I press my face into the hot curve of her neck with a strange
sound and find myself stroking her breasts, the cotton shirt rough beneath my
fingers. I feel her fingertips running up and down my back, beneath my shirt,
then traveling round beneath my arms to reach my chest, touching my
nipples. Smal electric shocks ricochet though my body. My mouth reaches for
hers again and I’m gasping for air and she’s making sounds that make my
heart pound harder and harder. I feel swept up in some kind of burning whirl
of madness, barraged by a milion sensations at once – the heat of her lips, the
pressure of her tongue, the taste of her mouth, the smel of her hair, the feel of
her breasts – the buttons of her shirt scratching my palm as I slide my hand
down them, the peaks of her ribs abruptly giving way to the soft inward curve
of her stomach, the shock of reaching under her shirt and feeling taut, warm
skin. Maya has one hand in my hair and the other on my stomach. My
muscles convulse in response to her touch, puling away yet desperate for her
hand to folow, and I’m acutely aware of her fingers sliding under the top of
my trousers, pressing against my stomach, hesitating at the waistband of my
boxers; I have to break away from the kiss and press my face into the pilow to
stop myself from begging her to keep going. I can’t think of anything any
more except for this blind madness; I want to stop myself but I’m unable to
hold stil. I want to pretend that it’s an accident, that I don’t know what I’m
doing, but I do. My hands claw at the sheet, twisting it into knots as I push
myself towards her, rubbing myself against her, imperceptibly at first, in the
hope she won’t notice – but soon that too is out of my control as the pace and
the pressure increase of their own accord, my crotch against her pelvic bone,
the thin, soft material of our clothing al that is left between us. I wish I could
feel her bare skin, yet even the feel of her body under her uniform is enough
to send me into a whirl of longing and desire. I can hear the sound of my
rasping breath, the friction between our two bodies. I know I should stop, I
know I must stop now, because if I keep going, if I keep going, I know what
wil happen . . . I have to stop, I must, I must . . . Then her mouth finds mine,
she kisses me deeply, and a crackling, spitting electric current shoots through
my body, sending out red sparks of exquisite elation. And suddenly I’m
shuddering hard against her, ecstasy exploding throughout my body like the
sun . . .
Maya rols onto her side to face me and strokes the hair away from my face,
looking startled, a touch of amusement on her lips. As her laughing eyes meet
mine, I take a sharp breath and feel a strong wave of embarrassment wash
over me.
‘I got – I got a bit carried away.’ I pul a face to try and disguise my acute
discomfort. Does she actualy know what happened? Is she disgusted?
She raises her eyebrows and bites back a smile. ‘No kidding!’
She does. Fucking hel.
‘Wel, that’s what happens when you – when you do stuff like that.’ My voice
comes out louder than I intended: defensive, shaky, uneven.
‘I know.’ She says quietly. ‘Wow.’
‘I couldn’t – I couldn’t stop.’ My heart is pounding. I feel frantic with
embarrassment.
She kisses my cheek. ‘Lochie, it’s OK – I didn’t want you to stop!’
Relief floods through me and I pul her closer so that her hair is in my face.
‘Realy?’
‘Realy!’
I close my eyes with relief. ‘I love you.’
‘I love you too.’
A long moment passes, then hot spasmodic breaths blow against my cheek:
silent laughter.
‘You’ve gone al sleepy!’
I force my eyes open and give an embarrassed laugh. It’s true. I’m wiped out.
My eyelids are dragged down by invisible weights and every ounce of energy
has evaporated from my body. I have just experienced the most intense few
minutes of my life and my whole body feels weak. I shift uncomfortably
against the bed and pul an embarrassed face. ‘I think I need a shower . . .’
I can’t stop thinking about it – at night, but during the daytime too. What have
we done? What have we done? Even though we never took our clothes off,
even though what we did isn’t technicaly against the law, I know we have
started on a dangerous slippery slope. Where it could eventualy land us is
both too terrifying and too fantastic to even think about. I try teling myself
that it was nothing, that I was just trying to comfort her – but even I’m not
self-deluded enough to believe my own ridiculous excuse. And now it’s like a
drug, and I cannot believe I have managed to live so long, in the daily
presence of Maya, without this new level of closeness . . .
CHAPTER SIXTEEN.
Maya.
At the end of the day, it’s al about how much you can bear, how much you
can endure. Being together, we harm nobody; being apart, we extinguish
ourselves. I wanted to be strong – wanted to show Lochan that if he could
walk away after that first night, then so could I; that if he could distract
himself by going out with a girl, then I could do the same with a guy. My
mind was set on the idea but the rest of me wouldn’t obey. Rather than go
through with our deal, my body chose to take a dangerous tumble down a
flight of stairs.
Lochan is stil Lochan, except he’s not. When I look at him, he seems different
to me now. My mind keeps flashing back to that afternoon on the bed: the
taste of his hot mouth, the brush of his fingertips against my skin. I want to be
with him al the time. I folow him from room to room, finding any excuse to
be near him, to look at him, to touch him. I want to hold him, stroke him, kiss
him, but of course, with the others always around, I can’t. Loving him like
this has become a deep physical ache. I am overcome by a kaleidoscope of
conflicting emotions: on the one hand fizzing with so much adrenaline and
excitement I find it difficult to eat, on the other, consumed with terror that
Lochan is suddenly going to say we cannot do this because it’s wrong. Or that
someone may find out and force us apart. I wil not listen to the ticking time
bomb inside my head, wil not think of the future, that gaping dark hole in
which neither of us can exist, together or apart . . . I refuse to alow my fears
for the future to ruin the present. Al that matters right now is that Lochan is
here with me, and that we love each other. I have never felt so happy in my
life.
Lochan too seems more alive. The strained look of exhaustion and false cheer
is erased from his face. He cracks up at Tiffin’s jokes, tickles Wila and swings
her round and round until I beg him to stop. He humours Kit and lets the usual
inflammatory remarks go; he has even stopped chewing his lip. And every
time his eyes meet mine, his face ignites with a smile.
On Friday morning, two whole weeks after we last held each other on the bed,
I come up behind him as he stands alone at the sink with his back to the door,
sipping his morning coffee and staring out of the window. His raven hair is
stil tousled from the night, his white shirtsleeves roled up to the elbows as
usual. The skin on his arms looks so smooth, I long to stroke them. Unable to
hold back, I slip my hand into his loose one. He turns to me with a smile of
surprise but I recognize a hint of alarm in his eyes, accompanied by another
emotion: a longing ache, a painful desperation.
‘The others wil be down in a minute,’ Lochan warns me softly.
I glance at the closed kitchen door, wishing it had a lock. Turning back, I
stroke the inside of his palm with my fingertips. ‘I miss you,’ I whisper.
He smiles slightly but his eyes are sad. ‘We just have to – to wait for the right
moment, Maya.’
‘There never is a right moment,’ I reply. ‘Between the kids and school and Kit
up half the night, we’re never alone.’
He starts on his lip again, turning to stare out of the window. I rest my head
against the top of his arm.
‘Don’t!’ he says hoarsely.
‘But I was just—’
‘Don’t you get it? It makes it even harder. It makes it even worse.’ He takes
an unsteady breath.
‘I can’t – I can’t bear it when you . . .’
‘When I what?’
He doesn’t reply.
‘Why are you tuning me out?’
‘You don’t understand.’ He turns to me almost angrily, his voice beginning to
shake. ‘Seeing you, being with you every day but not being able to do
anything – it’s like cancer, it’s like this cancer growing inside my body, inside
my mind!’
‘OK. I know. I’m sorry.’ I try to disengage my hand but his fingers tighten
round mine.
‘Don’t—’
I lean towards him and hold him tight as he wraps his arms around me. The
warmth of his body flows into mine like an electric current. His hot cheek
brushes against my face, his lips touch mine then pul away again; his breath is
moist and urgent against my neck. I want him to kiss me so much, it hurts.
The door crashes open like the sound of a gunshot. We reel apart. Tiffin
stands there, trailing his tie, his shirt untucked. His eyes are wide, flicking
from my face to Lochan’s.
‘Wow, first one to be ready!’ My voice comes out shril with false cheer.
‘Come here and I’l do your tie. What d’you fancy for breakfast?’
He stil doesn’t move. ‘What happened?’ he asks at length, his face worried.
‘Nothing!’ Lochan turns from making the coffee and gives him a reassuring
smile. ‘Everything’s fine. Now, muesli, toast or both?’
Tiffin ignores Lochan’s attempts at distraction. ‘Why were you cuddling
Maya?’ he asks instead.
‘Because – because – Maya was feeling a bit upset about this test she’s got
today,’ Lochan replies raggedly. ‘She’s feeling very nervous.’
I nod in agreement, quickly erasing my false smile.
Unconvinced, Tiffin walks slowly over to his chair, forgetting his usual
complaints as Lochan fils his bowl with muesli.
My heart is hammering. We only heard the door after it had swung open al the
way and hit the corner of the sideboard. Did Tiffin see Lochan kiss my neck –
notice my lips brush against his? Tiffin starts eating his muesli without further
comment and I know he doesn’t believe our story. I know he senses
something isn’t right. It’s almost a relief when Kit and Wila arrive, loud and
complaining, one protesting about the breakfast menu, the other about the loss
of her sticker album. I glance nervously at Tiffin but he stays unusualy silent.
Lochan is clearly shaken too. The colour is high in his cheeks and he is
gnawing at his lip. He knocks over Wila’s juice and spils cereal on the table.
He downs coffee after coffee and tries to rush everyone through breakfast,
even though it is not yet eight, and his eyes keep returning to Tiffin’s face.
After dropping the kids off at school, I turn to him and say, ‘Tiffin couldn’t
have seen anything.
There wasn’t time.’
‘He just saw you give me a hug and now he’s worried that you’re upset about
something more serious than a test. I should never have come up with that
pathetic excuse. But by this evening he’l have forgotten al about it, or if he
hasn’t, he’l realize you’re OK. Everything’s fine.’
I can stil feel the knot of fear in my stomach. But I just nod and smile
reassuringly.
In maths, Francie chews gum and props her feet up on the empty chair in
front, passing me notes about the way Salim Kumar is looking at me and
speculating about what he would like to do with me.
But al I can think is that something has got to change. Lochan and I have to
find a way of being together without fear of interruption for at least a little
while every day. I know that after what happened this morning, he isn’t going
to touch me again while the others are in the house, which is basicaly
whenever we are. And I stil don’t understand why I can’t even stand close to
him, hold his hand, rest my head against his arm while we are in an empty
room. He says it makes it worse, but how could anything be worse than not
touching him at al?
It’s my turn to pick up Tiffin and Wila today because Lochan has a late class.
On the way home, they charge ahead as usual, giving me a heart attack at
every road-crossing. When we get in, I sort out snacks and rummage through
their book bags for teachers’ notes and homework while they fight over the
remote in the front room. I put on a wash, clear away the breakfast things and
go upstairs to tidy their room. When I return to the front room they have tired
of TV, the Gameboy isn’t working properly and Tiffin’s neighbourhood
friends are al out at footbal club. They start to bicker, so I suggest a game of
Cluedo. Exhausted from the long week, they agree, and so we set up the game
on the carpet in the front room: Tiffin lying on his front with his head propped
up on his hand, his blond mane hanging in his eyes; Wila cross-legged at the
foot of the couch, an enormous new hole in her red school tights revealing
part of an even larger sticking plaster.
‘What happened to you?’ I ask, pointing.
‘I fel!’she announces, her eyes lighting up in anticipatory relish as she begins
her account of the drama. ‘It was very, very serious. My knee gashed open
and there was blood al down my leg and the nurse said we was gonna have to
go to hospital to get stitches!’ She glances at Tiffin to make sure she has a
captive audience. ‘I hardly cried much at al. Only til the end of break time.
The nurse said I was realy brave.’
‘You had stitches!’ I stare at her, appaled.
‘No, ’cos after a while the blood stopped gushing out, so the nurse said she
thought it would be OK. She kept trying to cal Mum but I told her and told
her it was the wrong number.’
‘What d’you mean, the wrong number?’
‘I kept teling her that she had to cal you or Lochie instead, but she didn’t
listen, even when I told her I knew the numbers off by heart. She just left a lot
of messages on Mum’s mobile. And she asked me if I had a granny or a
grandpa who could come and pick me up instead.’
‘Oh God, let me see. Does it stil hurt?’
‘Only a bit. No—Ow – don’t take the plaster off, Maya! The nurse said I have
to leave it on!’
‘OK, OK,’ I say quickly. ‘But next time, you tel the nurse she has to cal me or
Lochie. You say she has to, Wila, OK? She has to!’ I suddenly find myself
almost shouting.
Wila nods distractedly, intent on setting out the pieces of the game now the
account of her drama is over. But Tiffin is looking at me solemnly, his blue
eyes narrowing.
‘Why does school always have to cal you or Lochan?’ he asks quietly. ‘Are
you secretly our real parents?’
Shock runs like icy water through my veins. I am unable to draw breath for a
moment. ‘No, of course not, Tiffin. We’re just a lot older than you, that’s al.
What – what on earth made you think that?’
Tiffin continues to fix me with his penetrating stare and I find myself literaly
holding my breath, waiting for him to comment on what he witnessed this
morning.
‘’Cos Mum’s never here no more. Even hardly at weekends. She’s got a new
family now at Dave’s house. She lives there and she’s even got new kids.’
I stare at him, sadness seeping through me. ‘It’s not her new family,’ I attempt
at last in desperation. ‘They only stay over at the weekend and they’re Dave’s
children, not hers. We’re her children. She just spends lots of time there at the
moment because she works so late – it’s dangerous for her to come home in
the middle of the night on her own.’
My heart is beating too fast. I wish Lochan were here to say the right thing. I
don’t know how to explain it to them. I don’t know how to explain it to
myself.
‘Then how come she’s never even here at weekends any more?’ Tiffin asks,
his voice suddenly sharp with anger. ‘How come she never takes us to school
or picks us up at hometime like she used to on her day off?’
‘Because—’ My voice wavers. I know I’m going to have to lie here. ‘Because
she now works at weekends too and doesn’t take days off during the week any
more. It’s just so she can earn more money to buy nice things for us.’
Tiffin gives me a long hard look, and with a start I see the teenager he wil be
in a few years’ time.
‘You’re lying,’ he says in a low voice. ‘Al of you are lying.’ He gets up and
rushes off upstairs.
I sit there, paralysed with fear, guilt and horror. I know I should go up after
him, but what can I possibly say? Wila is puling at my sleeve, demanding to
be played with, the conversation thankfuly lost on her. And so I pick up the
pieces with an unsteady hand and start to play.
As time passes, the afternoon I fainted begins to feel like a dream, slowly
evaporating from the coils of my mind. I don’t try touching Lochan again. I
keep teling myself that this is only temporary – just until things calm down
with Tiffin and he starts to focus on other things and gets back to his usual
cheeky self. It doesn’t take him long, but I know the memory is stil there,
along with the doubt, and the hurt, and the confusion. And that is enough to
keep me from reaching out to Lochan.
The Christmas nightmare begins: Nativity plays, costumes to be made from
scratch, a disco for the sixth formers which Lochan is the only pupil not to
attend. Then everyone breaks up and Christmas is upon us, the house
decorated with streamers and tinsel that Lochan nicks from school. It takes
the combined efforts of al five of us to carry the tree home from the high
street, and Wila gets a pine needle in her eye, and for a few dreadful moments
we think we’l have to take her to Casualty, but Lochan finaly manages to
remove it. Tiffin and Wila adorn the tree with home- and school-made
decorations, and even though the end result is a great lopsided, glittery mess,
it cheers us al up tremendously. Even Kit deigns to join in with the
preparations, although he spends most of his time trying to prove to Wila that
Santa isn’t real. Mum gives us our Christmas money and I go shopping for
Wila while Lochan takes care of Tiffin – a system we devised one unfortunate
year when I bought Tiffin a pair of footbal gloves with a pink stripe down the
side. Kit only wants money, but Lochan and I club together to get him the pair
of ridiculously expensive designer trainers he’s been banging on about for
ages. On Christmas Eve we wait til we hear him softly snoring before placing
the wrapped box at the foot of his ladder with the words From Santa written
on it for good measure.
Mum makes an appearance late Christmas morning, when the turkey is
already in the oven. She has presents too – mostly second-hand stuff that
Dave’s children have grown tired of: Lego and toy cars for Tiffin, despite the
fact he stopped playing with such things some time ago, a second copy of
Bambi on DVD and a grubby Teletubby for Wila, which she gazes at with a
mixture of confusion and horror. Kit gets some old video games that don’t
work with his console but that he reckons he can sel at school. I get a dress
several sizes too big that looks as if it probably once belonged to Dave’s exwife, and Lochan is the proud new owner of an encyclopaedia, generously
adorned with obscene drawings. We al make the appropriate exclamations of
joy and surprise, and Mum sits back on the couch, pours herself a large glass
of cheap wine, lights up a cigarette and puls Wila and Tiffin onto her lap, her
face already flushed with alcohol.
Somehow we survive the day. Dave is spending the occasion with his family,
and Mum passes out on the couch just before six. Tiffin and Wila are cajoled
into bed early by being alowed to take their presents up with them, and Kit
disappears upstairs with his video games to start wheeling and dealing.
Lochan offers to clean up the kitchen and, to my shame, I let him do it and
colapse into bed, thankful that the day is at an end.
It is almost a relief when school starts up again. Lochan and I both have
mocks, and keeping Tiffin and Wila amused every day for two weeks has
taken its tol. We return to school, exhausted, and admire the new iPods,
mobiles, designer clothes and laptops that surround us. At lunch, Lochan
walks past my table. ‘Meet me on the stairs,’ he whispers. Francie lets out a
loud wolf-whistle as he moves away and I swing round in time to see his face
turn crimson.
Up here the wind is almost a gale, cutting right through you like slivers of ice.
I have no idea how Lochan can bear it, day after day. He is hugging himself
against the cold, his teeth chattering, his lips tinged with blue.
‘Where’s your coat?’ I reproach him.
‘I forgot it in the usual morning rush.’
‘Lochan, you’re going to catch pneumonia and die! Would you at least go
read in the library, for God’s sake?’
‘I’m OK.’ He is so cold, he can barely talk. But on a day like this, half the
school is crammed into the library.
‘What’s up? I thought you didn’t like me coming up here. Has something
happened?’
‘No, no.’ He bites his lip in an attempt to hold back a smile. ‘I’ve got
something for you.’
I frown, confused. ‘What?’
He reaches into his blazer pocket and brings out a smal silver box. ‘It’s a late
Christmas present. I wasn’t able to get it til now. And I didn’t want to give it
to you at home because, you know . . .’ His voice tails off awkwardly.
I take it from him slowly. ‘But we made a pact ages ago,’ I protest. ‘Christmas
was for the kids.
We weren’t going to waste any more money than we had to, remember?’
‘I wanted to break the pact this year.’ He looks excited, his eyes on the box,
wiling me to open it.
‘But then you should have told me. I didn’t get you anything!’
‘I didn’t want you to get me anything. I didn’t tel you because I wanted it to
be a surprise.’
‘But—’
He takes me by the shoulders and gives me a gentle shake, laughing. ‘Aargh!
Would you just open it?’
I grin. ‘OK, OK! But I stil object to this pact-breaking without my consent . .
.’ I lift the lid. ‘Oh .
. . God . . . Lochie . . .’
‘Do you like it?’ He is practicaly bouncing on his toes, grinning in delight, a
glow of triumph shining from his eyes. ‘It’s solid silver,’ he informs me
proudly. ‘It should fit you perfectly. I took the measurement from the mark on
your watch strap.’
I continue to stare into the box, aware I haven’t moved or spoken for several
moments. The silver bracelet lying there against the black velvet is the most
exquisite thing I have ever seen. Made up of intricate loops and swirls, it
sparkles as it catches the white light of the winter sun.
‘How did you pay for this?’ My voice is a shocked whisper.
‘Does it matter?’
‘Yes!’
He hesitates for a moment, the glow fades and he lowers his eyes. ‘I’ve – I’ve
been saving. I had a kind of job—’
I look up from the beautiful bracelet, incredulous. ‘A job? What? When?’
‘Wel, it wasn’t a real job.’ The light has gone from his eyes and he sounds
embarrassed now. ‘I offered to write some essays for a few people and it kind
of caught on.’
‘You did people’s homework for money?’
‘Yeah. Wel, coursework mostly.’ He looks down sheepishly.
‘Since when?’
‘Beginning of last term.’
‘You’ve been saving for this for four months?’
His shoes scuff at the ground and his eyes refuse to meet mine. ‘At first it was
just extra money for – you know – household stuff. But then I thought about
Christmas and how you hadn’t had a present for – for ever . . .’
I’m finding it hard to catch my breath. It’s a struggle to take al this in.
‘Lochan, we have to return this immediately and get your money back.’
‘We can’t.’ His voice wavers.
‘What d’you mean?’
He turns the bracelet over. On the inside are the words: Maya, love you for
ever. Lochan x I stare at the engraving, numb with shock, the silence between
us punctuated only by distant shouts from the playground.
Lochan says quietly, ‘I thought – it shouldn’t be too loose, so no one wil be
able to see the engraving. And if you’re worried, you could always just keep
it hidden at home. L-like a lucky charm or something – I mean, only – only if
you like it of course . . .’ His voice trails off into silence again.
I cannot move.
‘It was probably a sily idea.’ He’s talking very fast now, tripping over his
words. ‘It’s – it’s probably not what you’d have picked out for yourself – guys
have the worst taste in this kind of thing.
I should have waited and asked you. I should have let you choose, or got
something more useful like, um, like – like . . .’
I drag my eyes away from the bracelet again. Despite the cold, Lochan’s
cheeks look hot with embarrassment, his eyes radiating disappointment.
‘Maya, look, it realy doesn’t matter. You don’t need to wear it or anything.
You – you could just keep it hidden at home – for the engraving.’ He gives me
an unsteady smile, desperate to shrug the whole thing off.
I shake my head slowly, swalow hard and force myself to speak. ‘No, Lochie,
no. It’s – it’s the most beautiful thing I’ve ever owned. It’s the most incredible
present I’ve ever been given. And the engraving . . . I’m going to wear it al
my life. I just can’t believe you did this. Just for me. Al that work, night after
night. I thought you were going crazy about exams or something. But it was
al just to
– just to give me—’ I can’t finish the sentence and, holding tightly onto the
box, lean towards him, my face pressed against his chest.
I hear him exhale in relief. ‘Hey, you know, the polite thing to do is smile and
say thank you!’
‘Thank you,’ I whisper against him, but the words mean nothing compared to
what I feel.
He takes the box and lifts my arm from my side. I feel him reach round me
and push up the sleeve of my coat. After a few moments of fumbling, I feel
the cool silver against my skin.
‘Hey, how’s that? Take a look at it,’ he says proudly.
I take a deep breath, blinking back tears. The intricate silver round my wrist
gleams. Against my pulse point rest the words Love you for ever. Yet I
already know that he wil.
I wear the bracelet al the time. I only ever take it off in the safety of my own
room, resting it in the palm of my hand and gazing, enraptured, at the
engraving. At night I sleep with the curtains partialy opened so the moonlight
catches against the metal, making it sparkle. In the dark I feel its indentations
with my lips, as if kissing it brings me closer to Lochan.
On Saturday evening Mum surprises us by slamming into the house, her
make-up running, hair wet with rain. ‘Oh, you’re al here,’she sighs, making
no attempt to hide her disappointment, standing in the doorway of the front
room in an oversized man’s anorak, fishnet stockings and tottery heels. Tiffin
is practising head-stands on the couch, Wila is sprawled out on the carpet
gazing duly at the TV and I’m attempting to finish my history homework on
the coffee table. Kit is already out with his mates and Lochan is upstairs,
revising.
‘Mummy!’ Wila leaps up and runs over, holding up her arms for a hug. Mum
pats her on the head without looking down, and Wila settles for hugging her
legs instead.
‘Mum, Mum, look what I can do!’ Tiffin shouts triumphantly, launching
himself into an aerial somersault and knocking my pile of books to the floor.
‘How come you’re not at Dave’s?’ I ask her acerbicaly.
‘He had to go and rescue his ex-wife,’she replies, her lip curling in disgust.
‘Apparently she’s now an agoraphobic or something. More like a chronic
attention-seeker, if you ask me.’
‘Mummy, let’s go out somewhere. Please!’ Wila begs, hanging onto her leg.
‘Not now, sweetie pie. It’s raining and Mummy’s very tired.’
‘You could take them to the cinema,’ I suggest quickly. ‘Superheroes starts in
fifteen minutes. I was going to take them, but since they haven’t seen you in
over two weeks . . .’
‘Yeah, Mum! Superheroes sounds wel cool – you’l love it! Everyone in my
class has seen it.’
Tiffin’s face lights up.
‘And popcorn!’ Wila begs, jumping up and down. ‘I love popcorn! And
Coke!’
Mum manages a tight smile. ‘Kids, I’ve got a splitting headache and I’ve only
just got in.’
‘But you’ve been at Dave’s for two whole weeks!’ Tiffin suddenly shouts, his
face puce.
She flinches slightly. ‘OK, OK. Fine.’ She shoots me an angry look. ‘You do
realize I’ve been working for the past two weeks, right?’
I stare back at her coldly. ‘So have we.’
She turns on her heel, and after an argument over an umbrela, furious yels
about a missing coat and anguished wails about someone’s foot being stepped
on, the front door bangs shut. I drop my head back against the edge of the
couch and close my eyes. After a moment I open them again and smile.
They’ve gone. They’ve al gone. This is too good to be true. We finaly have
the house to ourselves.
I tiptoe upstairs, my heart-rate picking up. I’m going to surprise him. Creep
up behind him, slide onto his lap and announce our unexpected window of
freedom with a long, deep kiss. Poised outside his bedroom door, I hold my
breath and gently turn the handle.
Slowly I push the door ajar. Then I stop. He is not at his desk, head bent over
his book as I expected. Instead he’s by the window: one hand fiddling intently
with the broken mobile he stil thinks he can salvage, the other trying to pul
off a sock as he wobbles precariously on one leg. He is half turned away from
me so he hasn’t noticed me behind the door and I watch him in amusement as
he struggles to remove his other sock, eyes stil fixed on the phone’s cracked
screen. Then, with a sigh of annoyance, he chucks it onto his bed and,
grabbing his T-shirt, puls it swiftly over his head, his hair emerging comicaly
tousled. Spotting the towel slung over the back of his chair, I realize he is
about to take a shower and start to draw back, when something stops me. I’m
suddenly struck by how much his body has changed. Always on the skinny
side, he has now become more muscular. A slight curve of the biceps, his
chest smooth and hairless, not exactly a six-pack but the hint of definition in
his stomach . . .
Sneaking up behind him, I slide my arms around his waist and feel him tense.
‘She’s taken them out,’ I whisper in his ear.
He turns in my arms and suddenly we are kissing hard, franticaly – no one to
stop us, no limit on our time. But instead of making us languorous, it adds a
new element of excitement and urgency to the situation. Lochan’s hands
shake as he cups my face in them. Between kisses, he pants gently against my
cheek and the pain of longing pulses through my whole body. He kisses every
part of my face, my ears, my neck. I run my hands up and down the warmth
of his bare chest, his arms, his shoulders. I want to feel every part of his body.
I want to inhale him. I want him so much, it hurts. He is kissing me so
fiercely now he hardly gives me time to draw breath. His hands are in my
hair, against my neck, beneath my colar. His bare skin tingles beneath my
touch. But there are stil too many clothes, too many obstacles between our
two bodies. I slip my hand under the top of his jeans. ‘Wait .
. .’ I whisper.
His breath shudders against my ear and he tries to kiss my neck but I push
him gently away.
‘Wait,’ I tel him. ‘Stop for a second. I have to concentrate.’
As I lower my head, I feel his body tauten in frustration and surprise. I force
myself to focus on what I’m doing, careful not to rush. I don’t want to get this
wrong, make a mistake, make a fool of myself, hurt him . . .
Undoing the button is easy. Sliding down the zip is less so – on the first try it
sticks and I have to draw it back up before sliding it down al the way. But
suddenly Lochan is grabbing me by the wrists, wrenching back my hands.
‘What are you doing?’ He sounds incredulous, almost angry.
‘Shh . . .’ I return to his open trousers.
‘Maya, no!’ He is panting hard, a frantic edge to his voice. His hands are
between mine now, trying to zip himself up again, but his fingers are
fumbling, shaking in shock.
Puling back the waistband of his boxers, I slide my fingers inside, and feel a
rush of elation as I make contact. It feels surprisingly warm and hard. With a
smal gasp, Lochan buckles forward, sucking in his breath, tensing and staring
at me with a look of complete astonishment, as if he has forgotten who I am,
the colour flooding his cheeks, his breathing fast and shalow. Then, with a
smal cry, he grabs me by the shoulders and shoves me backwards.
‘What the hel are you doing?’
I recoil, speechless, as he grapples with his flies. He is yeling at the top of his
voice, literaly shaking with rage. ‘What the fuck’s wrong with you? What the
hel were you trying to do? You know we can never ever—’
‘I’m sorry,’ I gasp. ‘I – I only – I only wanted to touch—’
‘This whole thing’s completely out of hand!’ he screams at me, the cords
standing out in his neck.
‘You’re just sick, you know that? This whole thing’s just sick!’ He pushes
past me, his face puce, and slams into the bathroom. Moments later I hear the
shower running.
Downstairs in the front room, I pace the floor, breathing hard, anger and guilt
coursing through me in equal measures. Anger at the way he just screamed at
me. Guilt at not having stopped when he first told me to. Stil, I don’t
understand, I just don’t understand. I thought we’d decided not to bother with
what other people thought. I thought we’d decided we would be together no
matter what. I hadn’t been trying to trick him into anything. I’d just suddenly
felt the overwhelming urge to touch him everywhere, even there – especialy
there. But fear now tugs at my throat, my shoulders, my chest.
Fear that I’ve ruined what I thought we had.
The sound of his feet pounding on the stairs makes me back into the furthest
corner of the room.
But from the hal I hear only the jangle of keys, the squeak of trainers, the zip
of a jacket. And then the front door bangs.
I stand there, stunned. Appaled. I was expecting a confrontation of some sort,
the chance to offer an explanation at the very least. Instead he has just gone
off and left me. I won’t accept this, I won’t.
It’s not like I’ve done anything so terrible.
I shove my feet into my shoes and grab my school coat. Without even
bothering to stop for my keys, I run out of the house. I can just make out his
figure disappearing into the wet darkness at the end of our street. I break into
a run.
When the sound of my footsteps reaches him, he veers off across the road,
lengthening his stride stil further. Even as I draw level with him, straining for
breath, he raises his arm and knocks away my outstretched hand.
‘Just leave it, wil you? Just go back and leave me the hel alone!’
‘Why?’ I shout back, gasping in icy air as the rain lances my hair and face
with sharp, wet needles. ‘What on earth have I done that’s so awful? I crept
up to surprise you. I wanted to tel you that Mum had come back and I’d
cornered her into taking the kids to the cinema. When we started kissing, I
just wanted to touch—’
‘D’you realize how fucking stupid that was? How dangerous? You can’t just
suddenly do stuff like that!’
‘Lochie, I’m sorry. I thought we could at least touch each other. It doesn’t
mean we would have gone any further—’
‘Oh, realy? Wel, you can forget your fucking fairy tale! Welcome to the real
world!’ He turns briefly – long enough for me to make out a face mottled with
fury. ‘If I hadn’t stopped it, d’you realize what would have happened? It’s not
just disgusting, Maya, it’s fucking ilegal!’
‘Lochie, that’s crazy! Just because we can’t have sex doesn’t mean we can’t
touch each other and—’ I reach out for him but he shoves my arm away
again. Abruptly he turns down the aley towards the cemetery, only to find a
padlocked fence at the end. With nowhere to go, he stil refuses to turn back
towards me. Standing in the middle of the rain-soaked road, my hair whipping
against my face, I watch him grab the wire-mesh fence, shake it dementedly,
punch it with both hands, kick at it wildly.
‘You’re crazy, you know that?’ I scream at him, my fear suddenly replaced
with anger. ‘Why would this have been such a big deal? How would this have
been any different to what happened that time on the bed?’
He whirls round, crashing violently back into the fence. ‘Wel, maybe that was
a fucking mistake too! But at least – at least then one of us wasn’t half
undressed! And I’d have never – I’d have never let it go any further—’
‘I wasn’t planning to this time!’ I exclaim in astonishment.
He sags back against the netting suddenly, the fury dissipating into the night
like the white breath from our mouths.
‘I can’t do this any more,’ he says, his voice hoarse and broken, and abruptly
my anger is joined by a cold rush of fear. ‘It’s too painful, it’s too dangerous.
I’m terrified – I’m just terrified of what we might end up doing.’
His despair feels almost tangible, draining the frozen air around us of every
last shred of hope. I wrap my arms around myself and begin to shiver.
‘So what are you saying?’ My voice begins to rise. ‘If we can’t have sex,
you’d rather we did nothing at al?’
‘I guess so.’ He stares at me, his green eyes suddenly hard in the lamplight.
‘Let’s face it, this is al pretty sick. Maybe the rest of the world’s right. Maybe
we’re just a couple of fucked-up, emotionaly disturbed teenagers who just—’
He breaks off, pushing himself away from the fence as I slowly back away
from him, pain and horror rushing through me like liquid ice.
‘Maya, wait – I didn’t mean that.’ His expression changes abruptly and he
approaches me cautiously with his arm outstretched as if I’m a wild animal,
ready to flee. ‘I – I didn’t mean that. I –
I’m not thinking straight. I got carried away. I need to calm down. Let’s just
go somewhere and talk.
Please . . .’
I shake my head and move in a wide arc around him, suddenly breaking away
and hurling myself through a gap at the edge of the mesh.
Once inside, I turn into the bitter wind, heading up the darkened, cracked
path, littered with the usual beer bottles, cigarette stubs and syringes. The
glow of the streetlamps reaches me from a great distance, the sound of traffic
fading to a distant murmur, the outlines of abandoned, broken gravestones
nothing more than amorphous shapes in the dark. I can’t believe this is
happening. I can’t.
I trusted him. I try to make sense of what just happened, to process Lochan’s
words without completely faling apart. To somehow accept that the magic of
that one night when we first kissed and the afternoon in my room was, to him,
simply a dreadful, perverted mistake, to be filed away at the back of our
minds until we can eventualy kid ourselves it never happened. I need to try to
absorb Lochan’s true feelings about the situation – the feelings he has been
hiding from me since this first started. And I need to work out how to survive
this sudden revelation. But how can anything hurt so much? How can just
those few words make me want to curl up and die?
‘Maya, come on.’ I hear his feet thudding on the path behind me and a scream
begins to build in my throat. I have to be alone right now or I wil lose my
mind, I will.
‘You know I didn’t mean any of that stuff! I was just embarrassed that I – that
I nearly . . . you know. I was just scared of my own feelings, of what we
might have done!’ He looks frantic and wild.
‘Please, just come back to the house. The others wil be back in a minute and
they’l be worried.’
The fact that he thinks he can appeal to my sense of duty shows how little he
understands the effect of his earlier words, the violence of the emotions
coursing through me.
He tries to grab my arm.
‘Get off me!’ I scream, my voice magnified in the silence of the cemetery.
He recoils as if he’s been shot, shielding his face from the hysteria in my
voice. ‘Maya, just try to calm down,’ he begs me, his voice shaking. ‘If
anyone hears us, they’l—’
‘They’l what?’ I interrupt aggressively, whipping round to face him.
‘They’l think—’
‘Think what?’
‘They might think I’m attacking—’
‘Oh, it’s al about you!’ I scream at him, sobs threatening to explode in my
throat. ‘This whole thing – it’s always been about you! What wil people
think? How wil I look? How might I be judged?
Whatever feelings once existed between us clearly mean nothing to you
compared to your pathetic fear of other people’s narrow-minded, bigoted,
parochial prejudices that you once despised but now adopt as your own!’
‘No!’ he yels desperately, launching himself after me as I start striding off
again. ‘It’s not like that
– it’s got nothing to do with that! Maya, please listen to me. You don’t
understand! I just said those things because I feel like I’m going crazy: seeing
you every day but never being able to – to hold you, to touch you when
anyone else is around. I just want to take your hand, kiss you, hug you,
without having to hide it al the time. Al those little things every other couple
just takes for granted! I want to be free to do them without being terrified that
someone wil catch us and force us apart, cal the police, take the kids away,
destroy everything. I can’t bear it, don’t you understand? I want you to be my
girlfriend, I want us to be free—’
‘Fine!’ I scream, tears springing from my eyes. ‘If it’s al so sick and twisted,
if it’s causing you so much grief, then you’re right, we should just end it, right
here, right now! That way at least you won’t have to walk around with some
awful guilty conscience, thinking how disgusting we are for having these
feelings for each other!’ Frantic now to get away, I break into a stumbling run.
‘For chrissakes!’ he yels after me. ‘Didn’t you hear what I said? That’s the
last thing I want!’
He tries to grab me again, tries to force me to slow down, but I can’t – I’m
going to fal apart, break down in tears, and I refuse to have him or anyone
else as my witness.
Spinning round, I slam my hands against his chest and push him as hard as I
can. ‘Just get away from me!’ I scream. ‘Why can’t you just leave me alone
for five minutes? Please go home! You’re right, we should never have started
this! So get away from me! Just give me some space and time to think!’
His eyes are frantic, his expression stricken. ‘But I was wrong! Why won’t
you listen to me?
What I said was bulshit – I just lashed out in frustration, this is not what I
want!’
‘Wel, it’s what I want!’ I shriek. ‘God forbid you should stay with me out of
pity! Everything you said is true: we’re sick, we’re twisted, we’re deranged,
and we have to end this now! So what the hel are you stil doing here? Go
home to your normal, socialy acceptable life and we’l pretend nothing ever
happened!’
I’ve completely lost it. Hammers pound against my skul and red lights zigzag
in the darkness. But I’m afraid that if I don’t keep screaming at him in blind
fury, I’m going to colapse in tears. And I don’t want him to see that: the last
thing I want is for him to feel sorry for me, to feel he has to pretend to be in
love with me, to realize I can’t live without him.
With a desperate cry, he moves towards me, reaching out for me again. I take
a step back. ‘I mean it, Lochan! Go home! Don’t touch me or I’l shout for
help!’
He withdraws his outstretched arm and steps back in defeat. Tears fil his eyes.
‘Maya, what the hel d’you want me to do?’
I take an uneven breath. ‘Just go,’ I say softly.
‘But don’t you understand?’ he says in quiet despair. ‘I want to be with you,
no matter what. I love you—’
‘But not enough.’
We stare at each other. His hair is ruffled by the wind, his green eyes
luminous in the darkness, the zip of his black jacket broken, revealing his
grey T-shirt beneath. He shakes his head, his eyes scanning the dark cemetery
around us as if searching for help. He looks back at me and a harsh sob
escapes him. ‘Maya, that’s not true!’
‘You just caled our love sick and disgusting, Lochan,’ I remind him quietly.
He claws at the sides of his face. ‘But I didn’t mean it!’ His chin starts to
tremble.
A sharp pain rises through me, filing my lungs, my throat, my head – so sharp
I think I might colapse. ‘Then why would you say it? You meant it, and now
so do I. You’re right, Lochan. You’ve made me see this whole sordid mess for
what it is. Just a terrible mistake. We were both just bored, disturbed, lonely,
frustrated – whatever. We were never in love—’
‘But we were!’ His voice cracks. He screws up his eyes and presses his fist
against his mouth to muffle a sob. ‘We are!’
I look at him, numb. ‘Then how come it’s gone?’
He stares at me, aghast, tears wet on his cheeks. ‘W-what are you talking
about?’
I take a steadying breath, bracing myself against an onslaught of tears. ‘I
mean, Lochan, how come I don’t love you any more?’
CHAPTER SEVENTEEN.
Lochan.
Something inside me has broken. There are moments during the day when I
just grind to a halt and simply cannot find the energy to draw another breath. I
stand there, immobile, in front of the cooker, or in class, or listening to Wila
read, and al the air exits my lungs and I cannot muster the strength to fil them
again. If I keep breathing, then I have to keep living, and if I keep living, then
I have to keep hurting, and I can’t – not like this. I try to divide the day up
into sections, take it one hour at a time: get through first period, then second,
then break, then third, then lunch . . . At home the hours are broken down into
housework, homework supervision, dinner, bedtime, revision, bed. It’s the
only time I’ve ever been grateful for the relentless routine. It keeps me going
from one section to the next, and when I start to think too far ahead and feel
myself crumble, I manage to reel myself in by teling myself, Just one more
section, and then just one more after that. Get through today – you can fall
apart tomorrow. Get through tomorrow, you can fall apart the day after . . .
When Maya told me she no longer loved me, I had no choice but to retreat, to
retract. At first I told myself it was said in anger, a reaction to my own stupid
words – my inane declaration that it had al been a sick mistake – but now I
know differently. I play and replay that phrase in my head, wondering where
on earth it came from when I never believed it for a single moment. It must
have been the anger of the moment, my embarrassment and shame – shame at
wanting more than I could ever have – that made me blurt out the most
hurtful, hateful thing that came to mind. Instead of coping with my own
misery and frustration, I’d turned on Maya, as if by blaming her I could
absolve myself .
. .
But now, through my own stupidity and selfish cruelty, I have lost everything,
degraded everything, even our friendship. Despite the sadness in her eyes,
Maya has been very good at going back to normal, pretending everything is
fine, being friendly while keeping her distance. No awkwardness that might
alarm the others – in fact she is almost cheerful. So cheerful that at times I
even wonder whether she is not secretly relieved it’s al over, whether she
actualy does believe it was al a sick mistake, an aberration, born out of
physical need. She has stopped loving me, Maya has stopped loving me . . .
And this one thought is slowly eating away at my mind.
Concentrating at school has long become a thing of the past; now, to my
horror, teachers notice me, and for al the wrong reasons. I barely manage half
a page of trigonometry before realizing I have been sitting immobile, staring
into space, for the best part of an hour. They ask me if I’m al right, if I need to
see the nurse, what it is I don’t understand. I shake my head and avoid
meeting their eyes, but without the counterbalance of top grades my reticence
is no longer acceptable, and so they summon me to the front, demanding
answers to questions on the board, afraid that I am faling behind, that I am
going to let them down by failing to gain an A in their subject this summer.
Summoned to the whiteboard in front of the whole class, I fumble my way
through easy questions, make stupid mistakes, and watch the bewildered
horror spread across the teachers’ faces as I return to my desk amidst jeers and
laughter, al too conscious of the sniggers of satisfaction that Weirdo Whitely
has finaly lost the plot.
In English we are doing Hamlet. I’ve read it a number of times so I don’t feel
the need to even pretend to focus. Besides, Miss Azley and I have had a tacit
agreement ever since her unfortunate pep talk: she does not pick on me in
class so long as I volunteer an answer once in a while, usualy to help her out
when no one else can come up with even the most asinine response. But today
I am not playing bal: the double lesson is wel into its second hour and the
now familiar ache in my chest has morphed into a stabbing pain. I drop my
pen and stare out of the window, watching a length of broken TV cable twist
and writhe in the wind.
‘. . . according to Freud, the personal crisis undergone by Hamlet awakens in
him repressed incestuous desires.’ Miss Azley waves the book in the air and
paces to and fro in front of the class, trying to keep everyone awake. I feel her
gaze pause on the back of my head and I snap round from the window.
‘Which brings us to the Oedipus Complex, a term coined by Freud himself at
the beginning of the twentieth century.’
‘You mean when a guy wants to have sex with his mum?’someone asks,
voice sick with disgust.
Suddenly Miss Azley has their attention. The class is buzzing.
‘But that’s mental! Why would any guy want to fuck his own mum?’
‘Yeah, you hear about it on the news and stuff, though. Mums who fuck their
sons, dads who fuck their daughters and their sons. Brothers and sisters who
fuck each other—’
‘Language, please!’ Miss Azley protests.
‘That’s bulshit. Who would want to fuck – sorry, screw – their own parents?’
‘It’s caled incest, man.’
‘That’s when a guy rapes his sister, dickhead.’
There is a light flashing in my brain, like the head-lamps of a train in the dark.
‘No, it’s—’
‘OK, OK, we’re getting off topic here! Now remember, this is only one
interpretation and has been refuted by many critics.’ As she stops to perch on
the edge of her desk, Miss Azley’s eyes suddenly meet mine. ‘Lochan, nice to
have you back with us. What do you think about Freud’s assertion that the
Oedipus Complex was Hamlet’s primary motive for kiling his uncle?’
I stare at her. I’m suddenly deeply afraid. Through the instant silence, my face
is scorched by an invisible flame. Gripped by panic bordering on hysteria, I
worry, with a sickening lurch, that perhaps it is no coincidence Miss Azley
has chosen me to open this discussion. When was the last time she picked on
me to answer anything? When has the subject of incest ever come up before?
Her eyes dril into mine, burning holes straight through to my brain. She isn’t
smiling. No, this is planned –
contrived, premeditated and deliberate. She is waiting for my reaction . . . I
suddenly recal how I ran into her outside the nurse’s office after Maya’s fal.
She must have been there, helped bring her round, asked her questions. Maya
hit her head, was possibly even suffering from concussion. What reason did
she give for her faint? How much time elapsed between her fal and my
arrival? In her confused state, what might Maya have said?
The eyes of the class are upon me. Every single person has turned round in
their seat to gape.
They too appear to be in on it somehow. It is al one giant set-up.
‘Lochan?’ Miss Azley has moved away from her desk. She is walking rapidly
towards me, but for some extraordinary reason I cannot move. Time has
stopped; time is racing. My desk rattles against me as if the ground is being
shaken by an earthquake. My ears fil up with water and I focus on the
humming in my head, the electric grid of my mind snapping and flashing with
light. A strange sound fils the room. Everyone is frozen, staring, waiting to
see what wil happen next, what terrible fate awaits me. Perhaps Social
Services are already in the school. The world outside swels and presses in at
the wals, trying to reach me, trying to eat me alive. I can’t believe it. I can’t
believe it’s happening like this
. . .
‘You need to come with me, Lochan, OK?’ Miss Azley’s voice is firm but not
unkind. Perhaps she even feels some degree of pity. I am, after al, sick. Sick
as wel as evil. Maya herself told me that’s what our love was.
Miss Azley’s hands cuff my wrists. ‘Can you stand? No? OK, just sit where
you are. Reggie, would you run and fetch Mrs Shah and ask her to come
immediately? The rest of you – library, right now, in silence please.’
The requiem of scraping chairs and clattering feet drowns me. Flashes of
blinding colour and light.
Miss Azley’s face blurs and fades before me. She is summoning the nurse, the
other person involved in rescuing Maya from her fal. But something else is
happening too. Beneath my arm, my desk continues to rattle. I look around,
and everything appears to be moving, the wals of the emptying class
threatening to topple down on us like a pack of cards. My heart keeps
stopping and starting every few seconds, knocking wildly against the cage of
my chest. Each time it stops, I feel this terrifying emptiness before the
contraction returns with a flutter, then a violent thud. Oxygen is being drained
from the room: my frantic efforts to breathe and remain conscious are in vain,
darkness is slowly closing in. My shirt clings wetly to my back, rivulets of
sweat running down my body, my neck, my face.
‘Lovey, it’s al right, it’s al right! Sit stil, don’t struggle, you’re going to be
fine. Try and sit forward a bit. That’s it. Put your elbows on your knees and
lean forward and it’l help your breathing.
No, you’re fine where you are – hold stil, don’t try and get up. Wait, wait – al
I’m doing is removing your tie and undoing your colar. Leila, what are you
stil doing here?’
‘Oh, miss, is he gonna die?’ The voice is high-pitched with panic.
‘Of course not, don’t be sily! We’re just waiting for Mrs Shah to come and
check him out.
Lochan, listen to me now – are you asthmatic? Alergic to anything? Look at
me – just nod or shake your head . . . Oh Christ. Leila, quickly, go through his
bag, wil you? See if you can find an inhaler or tablets or something. Check his
coat and blazer pockets. Look in his walet – see if you can find any kind of
medical card . . .’
She is acting very strangely, Miss Azley, as if she’s stil pretending –
pretending she doesn’t know.
But I no longer have the strength to care. I just want this to stop. It’s too
painful, these electric shots being fired through my chest and into my heart, al
the muscles in my body spasming out of control, rocking the chair and
shaking the desk, my body surrendering to some greater force.
‘Miss, miss, I can’t find no inhaler or nothing! But he’s got a sister in the
lower sixth – maybe she’l know?’
Leila is making these odd, whimpering noises, like a dog being beaten. Yet
when she moves away, the sounds grow closer. It can’t be Miss Azley, so
there must be some animal, cowering in the corner .
. .
‘Lochan, hold my hand. Listen to me, love, listen. The nurse wil be here any
second, OK? Help is on its way.’
Only when the whimpers intensify do I realize they are actualy coming from
my own mouth. I am suddenly aware of the sound of my voice, scratching
against the thin air like a saw.
‘Leila, yes, his sister, good idea. See if you can find her, wil you?’
Time hiccups; it is either later or sooner, I can’t tel which. The nurse has
arrived, I’m not sure why
– I’m confused about everything now. Maybe I was wrong. Maybe they are
actualy trying to help me. Mrs Shah’s got a stethoscope in her ears and is
puling open my shirt. I immediately lash out but Miss Azley grabs my arms
and I am too weak to even push her away.
‘It’s al right, Lochan,’she says, her voice low and soothing. ‘The nurse is just
trying to help you.
She’s not going to hurt you. OK?’
The sawing noise continues. I throw back my head and screw up my eyes and
bite down to stop it. The pain in my chest is excruciating.
‘Lochan, can we get you off this chair?’ the nurse is asking. ‘Can you lie
down on the floor so I can take a proper look at you?’
I cling to the desk. No. They are not going to pin me down.
‘Should I cal an ambulance?’ Miss Azley is asking.
‘It’s just a bad panic attack – he’s had them before. He’s hyperventilating and
his pulse is wel over two hundred.’
She gives me a paper bag to breathe into. I twist and turn and try to push it
away but I haven’t the strength. I have surrendered. I’m not even trying to
struggle any more, but even so the nurse has to ask Miss Azley to hold the
bag over my nose and mouth.
I watch it inflate and then crumple in front of me. Inflate and crumple, inflate
and crumple, the crackling sound of paper filing the air. I try desperately to
push it away – it feels like they’re suffocating me: there is no more oxygen
left in the bag – but I have a dim recolection of breathing into a bag like this
before, and it helping.
‘OK, Lochan, just listen to me now. You were breathing much too fast and
taking in far too much oxygen, which is why your body is reacting like this.
Keep breathing into the bag. That’s it – you’re doing much better already. Try
to slow your breathing down. It’s just a panic attack, OK? Nothing more
serious than that. You’re going to be fine . . .’
Breathing into the bag lasts for ever, or it takes less than a minute, a second, a
milisecond; it takes so little time that it does not happen at al. I’m holding
onto the side of my desk with my head resting against my outstretched arm.
Everything is stil shaking around me, the desk vibrating beneath my cheek,
but it’s getting easier to breathe – I am concentrating on regulating my breaths
carefuly now and the paper bag lies discarded by my side. The electric shocks
seem to be less frequent, and I’m beginning to see and hear and feel things
around me more clearly: Miss Azley is sitting beside me, her hand rubbing
the back of my damp shirt. The nurse is kneeling on the floor, her finger and
thumb cold against my wrist, the stethoscope dangling from her ears. I notice
her brown hair is greying at the roots. I can make out a sheet of my own
scrawled handwriting beneath my cheek. The sawing noise has faded,
replaced by short, sharp sounds like hiccups, similar to the ones Wila makes
after a long crying jag. The pain in my chest is lifting. My heart is steadier
now – an aching, rhythmical thud.
‘What happened?’
The familiar voice startles me and I struggle to sit up, my hand grasping
feebly at the edge of the desk to stop myself from pitching forward. The
jagged breaths intensify and I start shaking again.
She’s standing right in front of me, between the nurse and the teacher, her
hands cupped over her nose and mouth, blue eyes huge with fright. Relief at
seeing her floods through me and I reach out for her franticaly, afraid she wil
suddenly walk away.
‘Hey, Lochie, it’s al right, it’s al right, it’s al right.’ She takes my hand in hers,
gripping it tightly.
‘What on earth happened?’she asks the nurse again, panic threading her
voice.
‘Nothing to worry about, love, just a panic attack. You can help by keeping
nice and calm yourself. Why don’t you sit with him for a bit?’ Mrs Shah snaps
her medical bag shut and moves out of sight, folowed by Miss Azley.
Nurse and teacher fade to the other side of the classroom, talking softly and
rapidly between themselves. Maya puls up a chair and sits down opposite me,
her knees touching mine. She is pale with shock, her eyes, sharp and
questioning, boring into mine.
Elbows on thighs, I look up at her and manage an unsteady smile. I want to
make some kind of joke but it’s too much effort to breathe and talk
simultaneously. I try to stop shaking for Maya’s sake and press my right fist to
my mouth to muffle the hiccupping sounds. My left hand grips hers with al
my strength, afraid to let go.
Stroking my clammy cheek and taking my right hand in hers, she draws it
gently away from my mouth.
‘Listen, you,’she says, her voice ful of concern. ‘What brought al this on?’
I think back to Hamlet and my whole conspiracy theory and realize with a jolt
how ridiculous I was being.
‘N-nothing.’ Breath. ‘Being stupid.’ I have to concentrate hard to get each
word out between gasps, one cluster at a time. I feel my throat constrict so I
shake my head with a wry smile. ‘So stupid.
I’m sorry—’ I bite down hard on my lip.
‘Stop being sorry, you idiot.’ She gives me a reassuring smile and strokes the
inside of my hand. I find myself involuntarily clutching at her sleeve, afraid
she is a mirage and wil suddenly evaporate before my eyes.
The bel sounds, startling us both.
I feel my pulse start to race again. ‘Maya, d-don’t go! Don’t go just yet—’
‘Lochie, I’ve no intention of going anywhere.’
It’s the closest we’ve been al week, the first time she’s touched me since that
terrible night in the cemetery. I swalow hard and gnaw at my lip, aware of the
other two in the room, terrified I’m going to break down.
Maya notices. ‘Loch, it’s al right. This has happened before. When you first
started at Belmont, just after Dad left, remember? You’re going to be fine . . .’
But I don’t want to be fine, not if it means she’s going to let go of my hand;
not if it means we’re going to go back to being polite strangers.
After a while we go down to the nurse’s room. Mrs Shah checks my pulse and
blood pressure, hands me a leaflet on panic attacks and mental health issues.
Yet again there is talk of seeing the school counselor, mention of exam
pressure, the danger of overwork, the importance of getting enough sleep . . .
Somehow I make al the right noises, nod and smile as convincingly as I can,
al the while holding myself tight like a coiled spring.
We walk home in silence. Maya offers me her hand but I decline – my legs
are steadier now. She asks me if there was some trigger, but when I shake my
head she takes the hint and backs off.
At home I sit at the end of the couch. Right now, alone and uninterrupted,
would be the perfect time for that conversation – the one where I apologize to
her for what I said that night, explain again the reason for my crazy outburst,
try to find out if she is stil angry with me, while somehow making it clear that
this is in no way an attempt to coerce her back into any kind of abnormal
relationship. But I can’t find the words, and I don’t trust myself to utter a
single thing. The aftershocks of the panic attack coupled with Maya’s gentle
concern have thrown me, and I feel as if I’m teetering on the edge of a
precipice.
Being brought juice and a peeled apple cut into quarters like for Tiffin or Wila
threatens to tip me over. Maya watches me from the doorway as I switch on
and mute the TV, pick at my shirt cuff, pul at a loose button. I can tel how
anxious she is from the way she fiddles with her earlobe, a characteristic sign
of worry she shares with Wila.
‘How are you feeling?’
I attempt a bright, cheerful smile and the ache in my throat intensifies. ‘Fine!
It was just a stupid panic attack.’
I want to make some kind of joke, but instead I feel a sudden tremor in my
chin. I pul a face to disguise it.
Her smile fades. ‘Perhaps I should leave you in peace for a little while—’
‘No!’ The word comes out louder than I intended. Heat rushing to my face, I
force a desperate smile. ‘I just mean, now that we’ve got some time off,
perhaps we should – you know – hang out together, l-like old times. Unless of
course you’ve got homework to do or something . . .’
A hint of amusement touches her lips. ‘Yeah, right. I’m not about to waste an
afternoon off school on homework, Lochan James Whitely!’
Closing the door behind her, she curls up in the armchair. ‘So, what are we
watching?’
I grab the remote and fumble with the buttons. ‘Uh – wel – surely there’s
something other than CBeebies . . . How about this?’ I stop channel-flicking
when I reach an old episode of Friends and look at Maya for approval.
She gives me another of her sad smiles. ‘Great.’
Canned laughter fils the room but neither of us seem able to join in. The
episode drags on and on.
I am painfuly aware that the two of us, alone together, have absolutely
nothing to say to each other.
Has our friendship been shattered too?
I want to ask her, beg her, to tel me what’s going on inside her head. I want to
try and explain what was going on in my head that night, why I reacted like
such a bastard. But I can’t even turn to look at her. I feel her eyes, ful of
concern, on my face. And I’m sinking in a quicksand of despair.
‘D’you want to talk about it?’ Her voice, soft with concern, makes me start.
Suddenly I’m aware of the pain from biting my lip, the weight of the tears
that have slowly been accumulating in my eyes.
With a panicked breath I quickly shake my head, raising a hand to my face. I
press my fingers briefly against my eyes and shake my head dismissively.
‘I’m just feeling a bit weird from before.’
Straining to keep my voice steady, I can stil hear its jagged edge. Turning, I
force myself to meet her stricken gaze with a desperate smile. ‘But I’m fine
now. It’s nothing. Realy.’
After a moment’s hesitation she gets up and comes over to sit on the opposite
end of the couch, one foot tucked beneath her, auburn wisps framing her pale
face.
‘Come on, sily, it’s not nothing if it’s making you cry.’ The words hang in the
air, her concern sweling the silence.
‘I’m not – it’s not—!’ I reply hotly, cheeks ablaze. ‘It’s just – I’m just—’ I
take a deep breath, frantic to deflect her worry, to pul myself together. The
last thing I want is for her to know how devastated I am at having lost her, for
her to feel any pressure to resume a relationship that, in her mind, is
fundamentaly wrong.
She hasn’t moved. ‘You’re just what?’she asks gently.
I clear my throat and raise my eyes to the ceiling, forcing a short, painful
laugh. I run my sleeve rapidly across my eyes as, to my horror, a tear glances
off my cheek.
‘Do you want to try to go to sleep for a bit?’
The concern in her voice is kiling me. ‘No. I don’t know. I think – I think . . .
Oh, for fuck sake—!’ Another tear fals down my cheek and I swipe at it
furiously. ‘Shit! What is this?’
‘Lochie, tel me. What happened? What happened at school?’ Sounding
aghast, she leans towards me, reaching out to touch me.
I immediately raise my arm to deflect her. ‘Just give me a minute!’ I can’t halt
this – there’s nothing I can do. My chest shudders with repressed sobs. I cup
my hands over my face and try holding my breath.
‘Lochie, it’s going to be al right. Please don’t . . .’ Her voice is softly
imploring.
The air bursts from my lungs. ‘Goddamnit, I’m trying, OK? I can’t – I j-just
can’t seem able to—’
I’m out of control now and it terrifies me. I don’t want Maya to witness this.
But neither do I want her to go. I need to get off this couch, out of this house,
but my legs won’t obey me. I’m trapped. I can feel the blind panic descending
again.
‘Hey, hey, hey.’ Maya firmly takes my hand in one of hers and cups my cheek
with her other.
‘Shh. It’s OK, it’s OK. Just a build-up of stress, Lochie, that’s al. Look at me.
Look at me. Was it the argument? Was it? Can we talk about that a little bit?’
I’m too tired to fight any more. I feel my torso crumple, slowly tilting towards
her until the side of my head rests against hers, my hand covering my face.
She strokes my hair and, reaching for my other hand, starts kissing my
fingers.
‘In – in the cemetery,’ I choke, closing my eyes. ‘Please just tel me the truth.
W-what you said, was it – was it true?’ I breathe deeply, hot tears escaping
from beneath my lashes.
‘God, Lochie, no,’she gasps. ‘Of course it wasn’t! I was just angry and
upset!’
Relief floods through me, so strong it almost hurts. ‘Maya, Jesus, I thought it
was al over. I thought I’d ruined everything.’ I straighten up, breathing hard,
rubbing my face fiercely. ‘I’m so sorry!
Al that horrible stuff I said. I just totaly freaked out. I thought you wanted to –
I thought you were going to—’
‘I just wanted to touch you,’she says quietly. ‘I know we can never go al the
way. I know it’s ilegal. I know the kids could be taken away if anyone found
out. But I thought we could stil touch each other, stil love each other in other
ways.’
I take a frantic breath. ‘I know. Me too. Me too! But we have to be so careful.
We can’t get carried away. We can’t – we can’t risk . . . The kids . . .’
I see the sadness in her eyes. It makes me want to scream. It’s so unfair, so
horribly unfair.
‘Maybe one day, hey?’ Maya says softly with a smile. ‘One day, when they’ve
grown up, we can run away. Start anew. As a real couple. No longer brother
and sister. Free from these awful ties.’
I nod, desperately trying to share in some of her hope for the future. ‘Maybe.
Yes.’
She gives a tired smile and wraps her arms around my neck, resting her cheek
against my shoulder.
‘And until then we can stil be together. We can hold each other and touch
each other and kiss each other and be with each other in every other way.’
I nod and smile through the tears, suddenly realizing how much we do have.
‘As wel as the most important thing of al,’ I whisper.
The corner of her mouth twitches. ‘What’s that then?’
Stil smiling, I blink rapidly. ‘We can love each other.’ I swalow hard to ease
the constriction in my throat. ‘There are no laws, no boundaries on feelings.
We can love each other as much and as deeply as we want. No one, Maya, no
one can ever take that away from us.’
CHAPTER EIGHTEEN.
Maya.
‘How come it’s you today?’
‘Because Lochan’s not feeling very wel.’
‘Did he throw up?’ Wila flicks her long fair hair back behind her shoulders
and the tiny gold studs in her ears sparkle in the fading afternoon sun.
Remnants of custard dapple the front of her pinafore and she is without her
cardigan again.
‘No, no. Nothing serious like that.’
‘Throwing up isn’t serious. Mummy does it al the time.’
Ignoring this last comment, I turn my attention to her clothes. ‘Wila, wil you
do up your coat? It’s freezing!’
‘Can’t. The buttons are gone.’
‘Al of them? You should have told me!’
‘I did. Miss Pierce says I’m not alowed selotape on my book bag too. She
says I have to get a new one.’ She takes my hand and we cross the playground
to the footbal area, where Tiffin is tearing around half undressed with a dozen
other boys. ‘And we’re not alowed holes in our tights. I got told off in front of
the whole of assembly.’
‘Tiff! Time to go!’ I yel as soon as he shoots past us. The game pauses briefly
for a free kick and I yel again.
He glances over angrily. ‘Five more minutes!’
‘No. We’re going now. It’s freezing, and you can play footbal at home with
Jamie.’
‘But we’re in the middle of a match!’
The game resumes and I try to get closer, nervously skirting the running,
darting, yeling boys, their cheeks ablaze, eyes fixed on the bal, shouts echoing
across the darkening playground. As he races past, I make a valiant grab for
Tiffin, missing by miles. Behind me, Wila stands pressed up against the fence,
coat flapping open, shivering hard.
‘Tiffin Whitely! Home, now!’ I shout at the top of my voice, hoping to
embarrass him into submission. Instead, he dives into a tackle, wrong-footing
his opponent and dribbling the bal towards the other side of the pitch at
lightning speed. He pauses for a moment as a boy twice his size comes
hurtling straight for him. Then he draws back his leg and shoots, the bal
skimming the inside edge of the goalpost.
‘Goal!’ His hands punch the air. Whoops and yels join his own as his teammates rush up to slap him on the back. I give him a moment before diving in
and dragging him out by the arm.
‘I’m not going!’ he screams at me as the game resumes behind us. ‘My team
was winning! I scored the first goal!’
‘I saw that and it was a great goal but it’s getting dark. Wila is freezing and
you’ve both got homework to do.’
‘But we always have to go straight home! How come the others are alowed to
play? I’m sick of stupid homework! I’m sick of always being at home!’
‘Tiffin, for God’s sake act your age and stop making a scene—’
‘It’s not fair!’ The tip of his shoe suddenly makes violent contact with my
shin. ‘I never get to do anything fun. I hate you!’
By the time we locate Tiffin’s missing school bag and I get them both out of
the playground, it’s almost dark and Wila is so cold her lips are purple. Tiffin
stalks on ahead, his face puce, blond hair wild, deliberately trailing his coat
on the ground to annoy me, kicking at the tyres of parked cars in rage.
My leg throbs painfuly. Four bloody hours till bedtime, I think ruefuly.
Another hour before they are actually asleep. Five. My God, almost the length
of a new school day. Al I want is to reach that moment when the house goes
quiet, when Kit finaly turns down the rap and Tiffin and Wila stop
bombarding me with requests. That moment when rushed, half-finished
homework is pushed aside and Lochan is there, his smile tentative, his eyes
bright, and anything, almost anything seems possible .
. .
‘. . . so I don’t think she wants to be my friend any more,’ Wila finishes
mournfuly, her icy hand buried in mine.
‘Mm, never mind, I’m sure Lucy wil change her mind tomorrow – she always
does.’
The smal hand is suddenly wrenched from my own. ‘Maya, you’re not
listening!’
‘I am, I am!’ I protest quickly. ‘You said that – uh – Lucy didn’t want to be
your friend because—’
‘Not Lucy – Georgia!’ Wila cries woefuly. ‘I told you yesterday that Lucy and
me broke up because she stole my favourite purple pen, the one with the blue
hearts on it, and she wouldn’t give it back even though Georgia saw her take
it!’
‘Oh, that’s right,’ I fumble, franticaly trying to recal the conversation. ‘Your
pen.’
‘You always forget everything these days, just like Mum did when she used to
live at home,’she mutters.
We walk on for a few minutes in silence. Guilt coils itself around me, cold
and unforgiving as a snake. I try in vain to recal the saga of the missing pen,
and fail.
‘Bet you don’t even know who’s my best friend now,’ Wila says, throwing
down the gauntlet.
‘Course I do,’ I answer quickly. ‘It’s – it’s Georgia.’
Wila shakes her head at the pavement in a gesture of defeat. ‘Nope.’
‘Wel, then, it’s Lucy realy, because I’m sure once she gives you back your
pen, the two of you wil—’
‘It’s no one!’ Wila shouts suddenly, her voice cutting through the sharp air. ‘I
don’t even have a best friend!’
I stop and stare at her in astonishment. Wila has never shouted at me with
such fury before.
I try to put my arm around her. ‘Wila, come on, you’ve just had a bad day—’
She puls away. ‘No I haven’t! Miss Pierce gave me three gold stars and I got
al my spelings right. I told you about it but al you said was Mm. You never
listen to me any more!’
Wrenching herself away from me, she breaks into a run. I catch up with her
just as she rounds the corner into our street. Forcing her round to face me, I
squat down and try to hold her stil. She sobs quietly, rubbing her face angrily
with the palms of her hands.
‘Wila, I’m sorry – I’m sorry, my darling, I’m so sorry. You’re right. I haven’t
been listening properly and that was realy mean of me. It’s not that I’m not
interested, it’s not that I don’t care. It’s just that I’ve been so busy revising for
my exams and I’ve got so much work and I’ve been so tired—
’
‘That’s not true!’ She gives a muffled sob and tears spil over her fingers,
running down between the cracks. ‘You don’t . . . listen . . . or play with me . .
. as much . . . as you did . . . before . . .’
I clutch at a nearby railing for support. ‘Wila, no – It’s not that – I d . . .’ But
even fumbling for excuses, I’m forced to confront the truth behind her words.
‘Come here,’ I say at last, wrapping my arms tightly around her. ‘You’re my
favourite girl in the whole world and I love you so, so much. You’re right. I
haven’t been listening to you properly because Lochie and I are always trying
to sort out al the household things. But that’s al boring stuff.
From now on I’m going to start having fun with you again. OK?’
She nods and sniffs and wipes her hair away from her face. I pick her up and
she wraps her arms and legs around me like a baby monkey. But through the
warmth of her arms round my neck, the heat of her cheek against mine, I
sense my words have left her unconvinced.
Despite the loud slap of shoes against the concrete steps, he does not lower
his book. I stop halfway up the flight of steps and lean against the rail,
waiting, the sounds of the playground rising up from below me. Stil he
refuses to look up, no doubt hoping whoever it is wil ignore him and continue
on their way. When it becomes clear that this is not going to happen, he
glances briefly over the top of the paperback before almost dropping it in
surprise. His face lights up with a slow smile. ‘Hey!’
‘Hey yourself!’
He closes his book and looks at me expectantly. I stand there watching him,
fighting back a grin.
He clears his throat, suddenly shy, a flush creeping into his cheeks.
‘What – um – what are you doing here?’
‘I came to say hi.’
He reaches for my hand and begins to get up, ready to move further up the
staircase, out of sight of the pupils in the playground below.
‘It’s al right, I’m not staying,’ I inform him quickly.
He stops and the smile fades. Registering the school bag on my back, the PE
kit slung over my shoulder, he looks concerned. ‘Where are you going?’
‘I’m taking the afternoon off.’
His eyes sharpen and his expression sobers. ‘Maya—’
‘It’s just one afternoon. I’ve only got art and crap.’
He gives a worried sigh, looking bothered. ‘Yeah, but if you get caught, you
know there could be trouble. We can’t risk drawing any more attention to
ourselves now that Mum’s never around.’
‘We won’t. Not if you come with me and use your Upper Sixth pass.’
He eyes me with a mixture of uncertainty and surprise. ‘You want me to come
too?’
‘Yes please.’
‘I could just give you my pass,’ he points out.
‘But then I wouldn’t have the pleasure of your company.’
The flush rises again, but the corner of his mouth puls upwards. ‘Mum said
something about popping home today to pick up some clothes—’
‘I wasn’t thinking of going home.’
‘You want to walk the streets til three thirty? I haven’t got any money on me.’
‘No. I want to take you somewhere.’
‘Where?’
‘It’s a surprise. Not far.’
I can see his curiosity is roused. ‘O-OK—’
‘Great. Go get your stuff. I’l meet you by the main entrance.’
I disappear back down into the playground before he has time to start
worrying again and change his mind.
Lochan takes an age. By the time he arrives, break is almost over and I fear
he’l be questioned for leaving the building just before the bel. But the security
guard barely glances at his pass as I slip unnoticed ahead of him through the
glass doors.
Out on the street, Lochan turns up his jacket colar against the cold and asks,
‘Now are you going to tel me what al this is about?’
I smile and shrug. ‘It’s about having an afternoon off.’
‘We should have planned this. I’ve only got fifty pence on me.’
‘I’m not asking you to take me to the Ritz! We’re just going to the park.’
‘The park?’ He looks at me as if I’m crazy.
Ashmoore on a weekday in the middle of winter is predictably empty. The
trees are mostly bare, their long spiked branches silhouetted against the pale
sky, the large expanses of grass splashed with silver patches of ice. We folow
the wide central path towards the wooded area on the far side, the hum of the
city gradualy fading behind us. A few damp benches dot the empty landscape,
abandoned and redundant. In the distance, an old man is throwing sticks for
his dog, the animal’s sharp yaps breaking the stil air. The park feels vast and
desolate: a cold, forgotten island in the middle of a big city. Curled sandpaper
leaves skim across the path, carried by a whisper of wind. A scatter of pigeons
dart excitedly around some crumbs, their heads bobbing up and down,
pecking feverishly at the ground.
As we approach the trees, squirrels dash out boldly in front of us, turning their
heads this way and that to eye us with shiny big black beads, hoping for signs
of food. High above us in an anaemic sky, the white orb of the sun, like a
giant spotlight, fixes the park with its hard wintry rays. We abandon the path
and enter the smal wood, dried foliage and twigs crackling and crunching
against the frozen earth beneath our feet. The uneven ground slopes gently
downwards.
Lochan folows me silently. Neither of us have spoken since entering the park
gates and abandoning the world behind us, as if we are trying to leave our
daily selves behind in the noisy hubbub of dirty streets and jostling traffic. As
the trees begin to thicken around us, I duck beneath a falen log and then stop
and smile. ‘This is it.’
We are standing in a smal holow. The shalow dip in the ground is carpeted
with leaves and surrounded by a few remaining green ferns and winter shrubs,
enclosed in a circle of bare trees. The ground beneath us is a tapestry of russet
and gold. Even in the depths of winter, my little piece of paradise is stil
beautiful.
Lochan looks around in bewilderment. ‘Are we here to bury a body or dig one
up?’
I give him a long-suffering look, but just then a sudden gust of wind causes
the branches overhead to sway, scattering the sun’s icy rays like shards of
glass into my corral, making it feel magical, mysterious.
‘This is where I come when things get too much at home. When I want to be
alone for a while,’ I tel him.
He looks at me in astonishment. ‘You come here by yourself?’ He blinks in
bewilderment, hands dug deep into his jacket pockets, stil gazing around.
‘Why?’
‘Because when Mum starts drinking at ten o’clock in the morning, when
Tiffin and Wila are tearing around the house screaming, when Kit is trying to
pick a row with everyone who crosses his path, when I wish I didn’t have a
family to look after, this place gives me peace. It gives me hope. In summer
it’s lovely here. It silences the roar that’s constantly in my head . . .
‘Maybe, from time to time, this could be your place too,’ I suggest quietly.
‘Everyone needs time off, Lochan. Even you.’
He nods again, stil looking around, as if trying to imagine me here by myself.
Then he turns back to me, the colar of his black jacket flapping against his
untucked white shirt, tie loosened, the bottoms of his grey trousers muddied
by the soft earth. His cheeks are pink from the long cold walk, hair tousled by
the wind. However, we are sheltered here, the sun warm on our faces. A
sudden flurry of birds alight on the topmost branch of a tree, and as he raises
his head, the light is reflected in his eyes, turning them translucent, the colour
of green glass.
His gaze meets mine. ‘Thanks,’ he says.
We sit down in my grassy enclave and huddle together for warmth. Lochan
wraps his arm around me and puls me towards him, kissing the top of my
head.
‘I love you, Maya Whitely,’ he says softly.
I smile and tilt my face to look up at him. ‘How much?’
He doesn’t answer, but I hear his breathing quicken: he lowers his mouth over
mine and a strange hum fils the air.
We kiss for a long time, sliding our hands in between layers of clothing and
absorbing each other’s heat until I am warm, hot even, my heart thumping
hard, a sparkling, tingling feeling rushing through my veins. Birds continue to
peck at the earth around us, somewhere in the distance a child’s whoop breaks
the air. Here, we are truly alone. Truly free. If anyone happened to walk by, al
they would see is a girl and her boyfriend kissing. I feel the pressure of
Lochan’s lips strengthen as if he too realizes how priceless this little moment
of freedom is. His hand slides beneath my school shirt and I press my hand up
against his thigh.
Then, abruptly, he is puling back, turning away, breathing hard. I look round
in surprise, but only the trees surround us like silent witnesses, unchanged and
unmoved and undisturbed. Beside me, Lochan sits with arms circling his
drawn-up knees, face turned away. ‘Sorry . . .’ He gives a smal, embarrassed
laugh.
‘About what?’
His breathing is fast and shalow. ‘I needed to stop.’
Something tightens in my throat. ‘But that’s fine, Lochie. You don’t have to
apologize.’
He doesn’t respond. There is something about his stilness that disturbs me.
I move over so that I’m pressed close to him and give him a gentle nudge.
‘Shal we go for a wander?’
He tilts away from me slightly. Raises a shoulder without turning. Doesn’t
reply.
‘You OK?’ I ask lightly.
He gives a brief nod.
A flutter of worry rises in my chest. I stroke the back of his head. ‘You sure?’
No reply.
‘Perhaps we should set up camp here, away from the rest of the world,’ I
tease, but he doesn’t respond. ‘I just thought it would be nice to have some
time alone, just the two of us,’ I say softly.
‘Was it – was coming here a mistake?’
‘No!’
I cover his hand with mine and stroke the back of it with my thumb. ‘What
then?’
‘Just—’ His voice quavers. ‘I’m afraid that al this wil one day be nothing
more than a distant memory.’
I swalow hard. ‘Don’t say that, Lochie. It doesn’t have to be.’
‘But us – this – it won’t last. It won’t, Maya, we both know that. At some
point we’l have to stop—’ He breaks off suddenly and holds his breath,
shaking his head wordlessly.
‘Lochie, of course it’s going to last!’ I exclaim, aghast. ‘They can’t stop us. I
won’t let anyone stop us . . .’
He takes my hand in his, starts to kiss it, his lips soft and warm. ‘But it’s the
whole world,’ he says, his voice an anguished whisper. ‘How – how can we
make it against the whole world?’
I want Lochan to say he’l find a way. I need him to say we’l both find a way.
Together we’l manage it. Together we’re so strong. Together we brought up a
whole family.
‘People can’t separate us!’ I begin angrily. ‘They can’t, they can’t! Can they . .
. ?’ And suddenly I realize I’ve no idea. However careful we are, there is
always the chance we could get caught. Just as, however much we cover up
for Mum, the threat of someone finding out and alerting the authorities gets
stronger every day. We have to be so careful; everything has to be hidden,
kept secret. One slip-up and the whole family could colapse like a house of
cards. One slip-up and we could al be torn apart . . . Lochan’s defeatist
attitude terrifies me. It’s as if he knows something I don’t. ‘Lochie, tel me we
can stay together!’
He reaches out for me and I crumple against him with a sob. Wrapping his
arms around me, he holds me tight. ‘I’l do everything,’ he whispers into my
hair. ‘I give you my word. I’l do everything I can, Maya. We’l find a way to
stay together. I’l figure it out, I wil. OK?’
I look up at him and he blinks back tears, giving me a bright, reassuring,
hopeful smile.
I nod, smiling in return. ‘Together we’re strong,’ I reply, my voice bolder than
I feel.
He closes his eyes for a moment, as if in pain, then opens them again and lifts
my face from his chest, kissing me gently. We hold each other tightly for a
long, long time, warming each other, until the sun gradualy begins to dip in
the sky.
CHAPTER NINETEEN.
Lochan.
In the mornings I shower with the speed of lightning, throw on my clothes,
and as soon as I’ve got Tiffin and Wila settled at the breakfast table I run back
upstairs with the excuse of a forgotten blazer or watch or book to join Maya,
who has the unenviable task of trying to get Kit out of bed in the mornings.
She’s usualy tying back her hair or buttoning her shirt cuffs or stuffing books
into her bag, her bedroom door ajar, and pops out sporadicaly to shout up at
Kit to hurry; but she stops when she sees me and, with a look of nervous
excitement, takes my outstretched hand. My heart pounding in anticipation,
we shut ourselves in my bedroom. With only a few precious minutes to spare,
my foot pressed firmly against the bottom corner of the door, one hand
gripping the handle, I pul her gently towards me. Her eyes light up with a
smile, hands either reaching for my face, my hair, or sometimes even pressing
up against my chest, fingertips scraping against the thin fabric of my shirt. We
kiss shyly at first, half afraid. I can taste whether she has used Colgate or just
grabbed the pink kiddie stuff while supervising brushing to save time.
It always gives me a jolt, that moment when our lips first meet, and I have to
remind myself to breathe. Her lips are soft and warm and smooth; mine feel
harsh and rough against them. At the sound of Kit’s slow, dragging footsteps
just the other side of the thin wal, Maya tries to pul back. However, as soon as
the bathroom door slams, she gives in and slides round so her back is pushed
up against the door. I dig my nails into the wood on either side of her head in
an attempt to keep my hands under control as our kisses grow increasingly
frantic; the longing inside me quels any fear of being caught as I feel the last
precious seconds of ecstasy run through my fingers like sand. A shout from
downstairs, the sound of Kit re-emerging from the bathroom, feet pounding
up the stairs – al signals that our time is up – and Maya pushes me firmly
back, her cheeks aglow, mouth stained red with the flush of unfinished kisses.
We stare at each other, our hot panting filing the air, but as I press in towards
her again, my eyes begging for just one more second, she closes her eyes with
a look of pain and turns her head away. She is usualy the first to leave the
bedroom, striding into the vacated bathroom to splash water on her face while
I cross over to my bedroom window and throw it open, clutching at the edge
of the sil and sucking in great lungfuls of cold air.
I don’t understand, I don’t understand. Surely this has happened before.
Surely other brothers and sisters have falen in love. Surely they have been
alowed to express their love, physicaly as wel as emotionaly, without being
vilified, ostracized, thrown into prison even. But incest is ilegal. By loving
each other physicaly as wel as emotionaly, we are committing a crime. And
I’m terrified. It is one thing hiding from the world, another to be hiding from
the law. So I keep repeating to myself – As long as we don’t go all the way, it
will be all right. As long as we don’t actually have sex, we’re not technicaly
having an incestuous relationship. As long as we don’t cross that final line,
our family will be safe, the kids won’t be taken away, Maya and I won’t be
forced apart. All we have to do is be patient, enjoy what we have, until
perhaps one day, when the others are grown up, we can move away and forge
new identities and love each other freely.
I have to force myself to stop thinking about it or I can’t get anything done –
schoolwork, revision, making dinner, the weekly shop, fetching Tiffin and
Wila from school, helping them with homework, making sure they have clean
clothes for the folowing day, playing with them when they are bored. Keeping
an eye on Kit – checking he does his schoolwork and makes the money he’s
given last the week, cajoling him into having dinner with us instead of
disappearing with his mates to McDonald’s, making sure he doesn’t skip
school and comes home at night. And of course, arguing with Mum over
money, always money, as less and less comes our way and more and more
gets spent on alcohol and new outfits to impress Dave. Meanwhile Tiffin’s
clothes get smaler, Wila’s uniform gets more ragged, Kit complains bitterly
about the new gadgets his friends al have, and the bils keep flooding in . . .
Whenever I’m apart from Maya, I feel incomplete . . . less than incomplete. I
feel like I’m nothing, like I don’t exist at al. I have no identity. I don’t speak, I
don’t even look at people. Being around others is just as unbearable as ever –
I am afraid that if they see me properly, they might guess my secret. I’m
afraid that even if I do manage to speak or interact with people, I might give
something away. At break times I watch Maya over the top of my book from
my post on the staircase, wiling her to come over to sit with me, to talk to me,
to make me feel alive and real and loved, but even just talking is too risky. So
she sits on the wal at the far end of the playground, chatting to Francie,
careful not to glance up at me, as aware as I am of the danger of our situation.
In the evenings I seek her out as soon as Tiffin and Wila have been tucked in,
too early for it to be safe. She turns from her desk, her hair skimming the page
of her textbook, and points meaningfuly at the door behind me to indicate that
the little ones are not yet asleep. But by the time they are, Kit is roaming the
house, looking for food or watching TV, and by the time he finaly goes to bed
Maya is passed out in hers.
Half-term brings little respite. It rains al week and, cooped up inside with no
money for outings or even the cinema, Tiffin and Wila bicker constantly
while Kit sleeps al day and then disappears with his friends until the smal
hours of the morning. Late one night, restless and burning with relentless
agitation, I pul on my running shoes and leave the sleeping house, jogging al
the way to Ashmoore Park, climbing the railings under the light of the stars,
running across the moonlit grass. Stumbling through the darkened woods, I
eventualy find Maya’s oasis of peace, but it brings me none. I fal to my knees
before the trunk of a huge oak tree and, making a fist, grate my knuckles up
and down its harsh, jagged, unforgiving bark until they are bloody and raw.
‘Lochie needs a plaster,’ Wila announces the folowing evening to Maya, the
family’s first-aider, as she comes through the door looking spent. ‘A big one.’
Maya drops her bag and blazer to the floor and gives a tired smile.
‘Rough day?’ I enquire.
‘Three tests.’ She rols her eyes. ‘And PE in the hailstorm.’
‘I’m helping Lochie make dinner,’ Wila says proudly, kneeling on a kitchen
stool and arranging frozen chips into patterns on the oven tray. ‘Wanna help,
Maya?’
‘I think we’re doing pretty good just the two of us,’ I point out quickly as
Maya flops into a chair, her tie askew, and pushes the straggly wisps of hair
back from her face, blowing me a discreet kiss.
‘Maya, look! I made my name in capital chips!’ Wila pipes up, noting our
exchanged looks, anxious to be included.
‘Very clever.’ Maya gets up and lifts Wila onto her lap before settling down
with her and leaning over the tray to try and create her own name. I watch
them for a moment. Maya’s long arms encircle Wila’s shorter ones. Wila is ful
of chatter about her day while Maya is the attentive listener, asking al the
right questions. Heads bent close, their long straight hair mingles: Maya’s
auburn against Wila’s gold. They both have the same delicate, pale skin, the
same clear blue gaze, the same smile. On her lap, Wila is solid and alive, ful
of bubble and laughter. Maya somehow looks more delicate, more fragile,
more ethereal. There is a sadness in her eyes, a weariness that never realy
leaves. For Maya, childhood ended years ago. As she sits with Wila on her
lap, I think: Sister and sister. Mother and child.
‘You can do the M like this,’ Wila declares importantly.
‘You’re good at this, Wila,’ Maya tels her. ‘Now, what were you saying about
Lochan needing a plaster?’
I realize I have been chopping up the same bunch of spring onions ever since
Maya first came in. I have a board ful of green and white confetti.
‘Lochie hurt his hand,’ Wila states matter-of-factly, her eyes stil narrowed on
the chips.
‘With a knife?’ Maya looks up at me sharply, her eyes registering alarm.
‘No, it’s just a graze,’ I reassure her with a dismissive shake of the head and
an indulgent smile towards Wila.
Wila turns to look at Maya. ‘He’s lying,’she stage-whispers conspiratorialy.
‘Can I see?’ Maya asks.
I flash her the back of my hand.
She flinches at the sight and instantly moves to get up, but then, anchored to
her seat by Wila, is forced to sit down again. She reaches out. ‘Come here.’
‘I don’t want to see it!’ Wila lowers her head towards the tray. ‘It’s al bleeding
and sticky. Eek, yuck, gross!’
I let Maya take my hand in hers, just for the pleasure of touching her. ‘It’s
nothing.’
She strokes the inside of my hand with her fingers. ‘Jesus, what happened?
Surely not a fight—?’
‘Of course not. I just tripped and scraped it against the wal of the
playground.’
She gives me a long disbelieving look. ‘We need to clean it properly,’she
insists.
‘I have.’
Ignoring my last comment, she gently slides Wila off her lap. ‘I’m going
upstairs to sort Lochie’s hand out,’she says. ‘I’l be back in a minute.’
In the smal confines of the bathroom, I rummage around in the medicine
cupboard for the antiseptic. ‘I appreciate the concern, but don’t you think you
girls are being a bit paranoid?’
Ignoring me, Maya perches on the edge of the bath and reaches out towards
me. ‘It’s only because we love you so much. Come here.’
I oblige, leaning in and closing my eyes for a brief moment, savouring the
touch, the taste of her soft lips against mine. Gently she puls me closer and I
turn away, waving the antiseptic bottle aloft. ‘I thought you wanted to play
nurse!’
She looks at me with a mixture of uncertainty and surprise, as if trying to
gauge whether I’m teasing.
‘Much as I love dabbing up blood, it doesn’t quite match up to grabbing a rare
moment to kiss the guy I love.’
I force a laugh. ‘Are you saying you’d rather let me bleed to death?’
She pretends to consider this for a moment. ‘Ah, wel, that’s a tough one.’
I start uncapping the bottle. ‘Come on. Let’s get this over and done with.’
Cuffing my wrist gently with her fingers, she draws my hand towards her,
inspecting the raw, bloody knuckles, the skin grated back from the wound: a
jagged white rectangle surrounding the wet, crimson lacerations. She winces.
‘Christ, Lochan. You did this faling against a wal? It looks like you took a
grater to the back of your hand!’
She gently dabs at my savaged knuckles. I take a deep breath and watch her
face: her eyes are narrowed in concentration, her touch very gentle. I swalow
painfuly.
After bandaging it with gauze and putting everything away, she returns to the
side of the bath and kisses me again, and as I pul back, rubs my arm with an
uncertain smile.
‘Is it realy hurting?’
‘No, of course not!’ I exclaim truthfuly. ‘I don’t know why you girls get into
such a panic at the merest drop of blood. Anyway, thank you, Miss
Nightingale.’ I give her a quick kiss on the head, stand up and reach for the
door.
‘Hey!’ She reaches out a hand to stop me, a sparkle of mischief in her eyes.
‘Don’t you think I deserve a bit more than that for my efforts?’
I pul a face and motion awkwardly towards the door. ‘Wila . . .’
‘She’l be spaced out in front of the TV now!’
I take a reluctant step forward. ‘OK . . .’
But she stops me before I have time to reach her, hand on my chest, gently
holding me at arm’s length. Her expression is quizzical. ‘What’s up with you
today?’
I shake my head with a wry smile. ‘I dunno. I think I’m just a bit tired.’
She gives me a long look, rubbing the tip of her tongue against her upper lip.
‘Loch, is everything OK?’
‘Of course!’ I smile brightly. ‘Now, shal we get out of here? This is not
exactly the most romantic place!’
I can feel her bewilderment as strongly as if it were my own. Throughout
dinner, I keep catching her watching me, her eyes rapidly flicking away as
soon as they meet mine. She is distracted, that much is obvious, failing to
notice Wila eating with her hands, or Kit openly winding up the little ones by
ignoring his meal and eating the Jaffa Cakes meant for dessert. I sense it is
better to let them just do what the hel they want rather than object – for fear
that if I start, I won’t be able to stop and the cracks wil begin to show. I just
panicked in the bathroom. I was afraid, too afraid that if I let her get that close
she would sense it, realize there was something wrong.
But at night I can’t sleep, my mind plagued with fears. With constant
coursework and the day-today hassle of living to contend with, added to the
fact that we can never, ever show any display of affection in public or even
within our own family, the familiar suffocating shackles are tightening stil
further. Wil we ever be free to exist like a normal couple? I wonder. To live
together, hold hands in public, kiss on a street corner? Or wil we be for ever
condemned to lead closet lives, hidden away behind locked doors and drawn
curtains? Or worse stil, once our siblings are old enough, wil we have no
choice but to run away and leave them behind?
I keep teling myself to take one day at a time, but how is this realy possible? I
am about to leave school, start university, and therefore, by default, am forced
to contemplate my future. What I’d realy like to do is write – for a newspaper
or magazine perhaps – but I know that is nothing more than a ridiculous flight
of fancy. What matters is money: it’s imperative I aim for a job with a decent
starting salary and good earning potential.
For I have little faith that once I’m earning, our mother wil continue to
support us. By the time I leave uni, Wila wil be eight, stil requiring a whole
decade of financial and practical support. Tiffin wil need another seven, Kit
another two . . . The years and numbers and calculations blow my mind. I
know that Maya wil insist on helping too, but I don’t want to have to depend
on her, never want her to feel trapped. If she wanted to go on to further study,
if she suddenly fancied picking up her childhood dream of being an actress, I
could never let the family stand in her way. I could never deny her that right –
the right of any human being to choose the life they want to lead.
For my part, the choice has already been made. Having the children taken into
care is something I have been trying to guard against since the age of twelve.
No sacrifice is too great to keep my family together, yet the long path ahead
looks so rocky and steep that I regularly wake up at night fearing I wil fal.
Only the thought of Maya at my side makes the ascent seem possible at al.
But lately the sacrifices just seem to be getting bigger.
Our mother has been desperate to marry Dave from the moment she set eyes
on him, yet Dave, even with his divorce now finalized, has not proposed,
clearly not prepared to take on the extra baggage of another large family. Our
mother has already made her choice – but now I’m about to turn eighteen and
legaly become an adult I fear she may cut us off completely in a final bid to
get that ring on her finger. Every time I force her to part with some money for
the basics – food, bils, new clothes, school things – she starts yeling about
how she left school and started work at sixteen, moved out and asked her
parents for nothing. Reminding her that she didn’t have three younger siblings
to care for is her cue to go on about how she never wanted children in the first
place, how she only had us to please our father, how he’d wanted another and
another until, tiring of us al, he’d run off to start anew with someone else. I
point out that our father’s desertion does not somehow magicaly give her the
right to desert us too. But this only provokes her further, prompting the cheapshot reminder that she would never have married our father had she not
accidentaly got pregnant with me. I know she says this out of drunken fury,
but I also know it’s true: this is why she has continued resenting me, far more
than the others, al my life. This then leads to the usual tirade about how she
works fourteen-hour days just to keep a roof over our heads, that al she asks
of me is that I look after my siblings for a few hours after school each day. If I
try reminding her that although this was the initial set-up when our father left,
the reality now is very different, she starts screaming about her right to a life
too. Finaly I find myself reduced to blackmail: only the threat of us al turning
up at Dave’s, suitcases in hand, wil force her to part with the cash. In many
ways I am thankful she has finaly gone from our lives, even if it means that
thoughts about the future, our future, weigh heavily upon me.
Sleep evades me once more, so in the early hours of the morning I go down to
the kitchen to tackle the pile of letters addressed to Mum that have been
accumulating on the sideboard for weeks now. By the time I finish opening
them al, the kitchen table is completely covered with bils, credit card
statements, payment demands . . . Maya touches the back of my neck, making
me jump.
‘Didn’t mean to startle you.’ She takes the chair beside me, resting her bare
feet on the edge of mine, circling her knees with her arms. In her nightdress,
her hair hanging loose and smooth, the colour of autumn leaves, she looks up
at me with eyes as wide and innocent as Wila’s. Her beauty makes me ache.
‘You look just like Tiffin when he’s lost a match and is trying to put on a
brave face,’she comments, laughter in her eyes.
I manage a smal laugh. Sometimes, being unable to hide my emotions from
her is frustrating.
The laughter leaves an unsettling silence.
Maya tugs gently at my hand. ‘Tel me.’
I take a sharp, shalow breath and shake my head at the floor. ‘Just, you know,
the future and stuff.’
Although she keeps smiling, I see her eyes change and sense she has been
thinking about this too.
‘That’s a big topic for three o’clock in the morning. Any part of it in
particular?’
I force my eyes to meet hers. ‘Roughly from here up until the part where Wila
goes off to university or starts work.’
‘I think you’re jumping the gun a bit!’ Maya exclaims, clearly determined to
snap me out of my mood. ‘Wila is destined for greater things. The other day I
had to take her to Belmont with me to pick up some homework I’d forgotten
and everyone turned to mush! My art teacher said we should get her signed up
with a children’s modeling agency. So I reckon we just invest in her, and by
the time she’s eighteen she’l be on the catwalk and supporting us! Then
there’s Tiffin. Rumour has it, Coach Simmons has never seen so much talent
in one so young! And you know what they pay footbalers!’
She laughs, frantic in her efforts to cheer me up.
‘Good point. Exactly . . .’ I try to imagine Wila on a catwalk in the hope it wil
prompt a genuine smile. ‘That’s a great idea! You can be her, um, stylist and I
can be her manager.’
But the silence descends again. It’s clear from her expression that Maya is
aware her tactics haven’t worked. She skims her nails over the palm of my
hand, her expression sobering. ‘Listen, you.
First of al, we don’t know what’s going to happen with Mum and the whole
financial situation. Even if she does marry Dave and tries to cut us off
financialy, we could just threaten to take her to court and sue her for neglect –
she’s too stupid to realize we’d never go through with it because of Social
Services. And by our mere existence, we’l always have the potential to mess
up her relationship – the threats about turning up at Dave’s in order to get her
to pay the bils have worked so far, haven’t they?
Thirdly, by the time you finish uni, a lot wil almost have changed. Wila wil be
nearly nine, Tiffin wil almost be a teenager. They’l be going to school by
themselves, wil be responsible for their own homework. Kit may have grown
a conscience by then, but even if he hasn’t, we’l insist he either goes out and
gets a job or takes over his fair share of the chores – even if we have to resort
to blackmail.’
She smiles, raising my hand to her mouth to kiss it. ‘The toughest part is
happening right now, Lochie
– with Mum suddenly out of the picture and Tiffin and Wila stil so young. But
it’s only going to get easier: things wil get better for al of us, and you and I
wil have more and more time together. Trust me, my love. I’ve been thinking
about it too and I’m not just saying al this to try and cheer you up.’
I raise my eyes to meet hers and feel some of the weight lift from my chest. ‘I
hadn’t thought of it like that . . .’
‘That’s because you’re always busy thinking of the worst-case scenario! And
because you always do your worrying alone.’ She gives me a teasing smile
and shakes her head. ‘Also you always forget about the most important
thing!’
I manage to match her smile. ‘What’s that then?’
‘Me,’she declares with a flourish, flinging out her arm and knocking over the
milk carton in the process. Fortunately it is almost empty.
‘You and your ability to send things flying.’
‘Wel, exactly,’she concurs. ‘And the very important fact that I’m here to
worry with you and go through all of this – every little bit of it by your side:
even your worst-case scenario, should it somehow come to that. You wouldn’t
be doing any of it alone.’ Her voice drops and she looks down at our hands,
fingers entwined, resting on her lap. ‘Whatever happens, there wil always be
us.’
I nod, suddenly unable to speak. I want to tel her that I can’t pul her down. I
want to tel her that she has to let go of my hand in order to swim. I want to tel
her that she must live her own life. But I sense she already knows these
options are open to her. And that she too has made her choice.
CHAPTER TWENTY.
Maya.
‘Fifteen minutes,’ Francie begs. ‘Oh, come on, then – ten. Lochan knows you
had a late class so surely an extra ten minutes isn’t going to make much
difference!’
I look at my friend’s pleading, hopeful face and a moment of temptation
flickers through me. An ice-cold Coke and maybe a muffin at Smileys with
Francie while she tries to get herself noticed by the new young waiter she has
discovered there – postponing the hectic evening routine of homework,
dinner, baths and bed – suddenly feels like an absurd luxury . . .
‘Just give Lochan a cal now,’ Francie persists as we cross the playground,
bags slung over our shoulders, heads foggy and bodies restless after the long,
stale school day. ‘Why on earth would he mind?’
He wouldn’t, that’s the whole point. In fact he would urge me to go, and that
knowledge weighs me down with guilt. Leaving him to make dinner and
supervise homework and deal with Kit when his school day has been nearly
as long as mine and undoubtedly more painful. But more to the point, I ache
to see him even if it entails spending another evening struggling against the
painful urge to hold him, touch him, kiss him. I miss him after a whole day
apart – I literaly miss him. And even if it means diving straight from a deathly
history lesson into the manic home fray, I can’t wait to do it just to see his
eyes light up at the sight of me, the smile of delight that greets me whenever I
step through the front door – even when he is juggling saucepans in the
kitchen, trying to persuade Tiffin to lay the table and stop Wila stuffing
herself with cereal.
‘I just can’t. I’m sorry,’ I tel Francie. ‘There’s just so much stuff to do.’
But for once she displays no sympathy. Instead she sucks on her lower lip,
leaning her shoulder against the outer wal of the school playground, the place
at which we normaly part. ‘I thought I was your best friend,’she says
suddenly, hurt and disappointment resonating in her voice.
I flinch in surprise. ‘You are – you know you are – it’s got nothing to do with
—’
‘I know what’s going on, Maya,’she interrupts, her words slicing the air
between us.
My pulse begins to quicken. ‘What on earth are you talking about?’
‘You’ve met someone, haven’t you.’ She phrases it as a statement, folding her
arms across her chest and turning to press her back against the wal, looking
away from me, her jaw set.
I am momentarily lost for words. ‘No!’ The word is no more than an
astonished little gasp. ‘I haven’t. I promise. Why did you . . . ? What made
you think . . . ?’
‘I don’t believe you.’ She shakes her head, stil staring angrily into the
distance. ‘I know you, Maya, and you’ve changed. When you talk, you
always seem to be thinking about something else. It’s like you’re
daydreaming or something. And you seem weirdly happy these days. And
you’re always rushing off at the last bel. I know you’ve got al that shit to deal
with at home but it’s as if you’re looking forward to it now, as if you can’t
wait to get away—’
‘Francie, I realy haven’t got some secret boyfriend!’ I protest desperately.
‘You know you’d be the first to know if I had!’ The words sound so sincere as
they leave my lips that I feel slightly ashamed. But he’s not just a boyfriend, I
tel myself. He’s so much more.
Francie scrutinizes my face as she continues to quiz me, but after a few
moments she begins to calm down, appearing to believe me. I have to make
up some crush on a boy in the Upper Sixth to explain the daydreaming, but
fortunately I have the presence of mind to choose one who already has a
steady girlfriend so Francie won’t try to matchmake. But the conversation
leaves me shaken. I’m going to have to be more careful, I realize. I’m even
going to have to watch the way I behave when I’m away from him. Just the
tiniest slip could give us away . . .
I arrive home to find Kit and Tiffin in the front room watching TV, which
surprises me. Not so much the fact that they are watching television, but that
they are doing it simultaneously and that Tiffin is the one with the remote
control. Kit is slouched down at one end of the couch, his muddy school
shoes half untied, head propped up on his hand, gazing duly at the screen.
Tiffin has traces of ketchup down his shirt and is kneeling up at the other end
of the couch, transfixed by some violent cartoon, his eyes wide, mouth
hovering open like a fish. Neither one turns as I enter.
‘Helo!’ I exclaim.
Tiffin holds up a packet of Coco Pops and shakes it vaguely in my direction,
his gaze stil fixed straight ahead. ‘We’re alowed,’ he announces.
‘Before dinner?’ I query suspiciously, tossing my blazer onto the sofa and
colapsing on top of it.
‘Tiffin, I don’t think that’s a very good—’
‘This is dinner,’ he informs me, taking another large handful from the box and
cramming it in his mouth, scattering the area around him. ‘Lochie said we
could eat whatever we liked.’
‘What?’
‘They’ve gone to the hospital.’ Kit rols his head round to look at me with a
long-suffering air.
‘And I have to stay down here with Tiffin and live off cereal for the
foreseeable future.’
I sit up slowly. ‘Lochie and Wila have gone to hospital?’ I ask, disbelief
resonating in my voice.
‘Yeah,’ comes Kit’s reply.
‘What the hel happened?’ My voice rises and I jump up and start rummaging
in my bag for my keys. Startled by my shout, both boys finaly tear their eyes
away from the screen.
‘I bet it’s nothing,’ Kit says bitterly. ‘I bet they’re going to spend al night
waiting in Casualty, Wila wil fal asleep and by the time she wakes up, she’l be
saying it doesn’t even hurt any more.’
‘What are you talking about?’ Tiffin turns to him, his blue eyes wide and
accusing. ‘Maybe she’l have to get an operation. Maybe they’l amputate her
—’
‘What happened?’ I yel, frantic now.
‘I dunno! She hurt her arm, I wasn’t even down here!’ Kit says defensively.
‘I was,’ Tiffin announces importantly, shoving his whole arm into the cereal
box. ‘She slipped off the counter and fel onto the floor and started screaming.
When Lochie picked her up she screamed even more so he carried her out
into the street to get a taxi and she was still screaming—’
‘Where have they gone?’ I grab Kit by the arm and shake him. ‘St Joseph’s?’
‘Ow, get off! Yes, that’s what he said.’
‘Neither of you move!’ I shout from the doorway. ‘Tiffin, you’re not to go
outside, do you hear me? Kit, can you promise you’l stay with Tiffin until I
get back? And answer the phone as soon as it rings?’
Kit rols his eyes dramaticaly. ‘Lochan’s already been through al this—’
‘Do you promise?’
‘Yes!’
‘And don’t open the door to anyone, and if there’s any problem cal my
mobile!’
‘OK, OK!’
I run the whole way. It’s a good two miles but the rush-hour traffic is such
that taking a bus would be slower if not more torturous. Running helps
activate the safety valve in my brain, forcing out visions of an injured,
screaming Wila. If anything terrible has happened to that child, I wil die, I
know it. My love for her is like a violent pain in my chest and the blood
throbs in my head, a pounding hammer of guilt, once again forcing me to
acknowledge that since my relationship with Lochan began – despite my
recent efforts – I have stil not been paying my little sister as much attention as
before. I’ve rushed her through baths and bedtimes and stories, I’ve snapped
at her at times when Tiffin was the culprit, I’ve declined request after request
to play with her, citing housework or homework as an excuse, too wrapped up
in keeping everything in order to give her a mere ten minutes of my time. Kit
commands attention constantly with his volatility, Tiffin with his
hyperactivity, leaving Wila by the wayside, drowned out by her brothers
during dinner-table conversations. As her only sister, I used to play dols and
tea-parties with her, dress her up, play with her hair. But these days I have
been so preoccupied with other things I even failed to register that she’d falen
out with her best friend, failed to recognize that she needed me: to listen to
her stories, ask her about her day, and praise her for her almost impeccable
behaviour which, by its very nature, did not draw attention. The gash on her
leg for example: not only was Wila stuck at school in pain al afternoon with
no one to fetch her and comfort her, but – worse and more teling stil – she
didn’t even think of saying anything to me about the incident until I happened
to notice the huge plaster beneath the hole in her tights.
I am close to tears by the time I reach the hospital, and once inside, trying to
get directions almost sends me over the edge. Eventualy I locate Children’s
Outpatients, am told that Wila is fine but
‘resting’ and that I wil be able to see her as soon as she wakes. I am shown to
a smal room off a long corridor and informed that Wila’s ward is just round
the corner and that a doctor wil come and speak to me shortly. As soon as the
nurse disappears, I burst back out again.
Rounding a corner, I recognize, down at the far end of another blindingly
white corridor, a familiar figure in front of the brightly painted doors of the
children’s ward. Head lowered, he is leaning forward on his hands, gripping
the edge of a windowsil.
‘Lochie!’
He whirls round as if struck, straightens up slowly, then approaches me
rapidly, raising his hands as if in surrender.
‘She’s fine, she’s fine, she’s absolutely fine – they gave her a sedative and gas
and air for the pain and were able to push the bone straight back in. I’ve just
seen her and she’s fast asleep but she looks completely fine. After they Xrayed her the second time, the doctors said they were certain there’d be no
long-term damage – she won’t even need a plaster cast and her shoulder wil
be back to normal in a week or possibly even less! They said dislocated
shoulders happen to children al the time, that it’s realy quite common, they
see it al the time, it’s nothing to worry about!’ He is speaking insanely fast,
his eyes radiating a kind of frenzied optimism, looking at me with a frantic,
almost pleading look as if expecting me to start jumping up and down in
relief.
I stop dead, panting hard, brushing the stray wisps of hair back from my face,
and stare at him.
‘She dislocated her shoulder?’ I gasp.
He flinches, as if stung by the words. ‘Yeah, but that’s al! Nothing else!
They’ve X-rayed her and everything and—’
‘What happened?’
‘She just fel off the kitchen counter!’ He tries to touch me but I move out of
the way. ‘Look, she’s fine, Maya, I’m telling you! There’s nothing broken: the
bone just popped out of the shoulder socket. I know it sounds dramatic, but al
they had to do was push it back in. They gave her gas and air so it wasn’t too
– too painful, and – and now she’s just resting.’
His manic demeanour and rapid-fire speech is faintly horrifying. His hair is
on end, as if he has been running his fingers through it and tugging it
repeatedly, his face white, his school shirt hanging loose over his trousers,
clinging to his skin in damp patches.
‘I want to see her—’
‘No!’ He catches me as I try to push past. ‘They want her to sleep off the
sedative – they won’t let you in until she wakes up—’
‘I don’t give a shit! She’s my sister and she’s hurt and so I’m going in to see
her and no one can stop me!’ I begin to shout.
But Lochan is forcibly restraining me and, to my astonishment, I suddenly
find myself grappling with him in this long, bright, empty hospital corridor.
For a moment I am almost tempted to kick him, but then I hear him gasp,
‘Don’t make a scene, you mustn’t make a scene. It’l just make it worse.’
I fal back, breathing hard. ‘Make what worse? What are you talking about?’
He approaches me, his hands reaching for my shoulders, but I back away,
refusing to be pacified by any more meaningless words of comfort. Lochan
lets his arms fal with a hopeless, desperate look.
‘They want to see Mum. I told them that she was abroad on business, but they
insisted on a number.
So I gave them her mobile but it just went straight to voicemail—’
I pul my phone out. ‘I’l cal her at Dave’s. And I’l try the pub and Dave’s
mobile too—’
‘No.’ Lochan holds his hand up in a gesture of defeat. ‘She’s – she’s not there
. . .’
I stare at him.
Lowering his arm, he swalows and walks slowly back towards the window. I
notice that he’s limping. ‘She’s – she’s gone away with him. Just for a
holiday, apparently. Somewhere in Devon, but Dave’s son doesn’t seem to
know where. He just said he thought – he thought they’d be back on Sunday.’
I gape at him, horror coursing through my veins. ‘She’s gone for the whole
week?’
‘Apparently. Luke didn’t seem to know – or care. And her phone’s been off
for days. Either she forgot her charger or she’s switched it off deliberately.’
Lochan goes back to lean against the windowsil, as if the weight of his body
is too great for his legs to bear. ‘I’ve been trying to cal her about the bils.
Yesterday after school I went round, and that’s when Luke told me. He’s
staying in his dad’s flat with his girlfriend. I didn’t want to worry you—’
‘You had no right not to tel me!’
‘I know, I’m sorry, but I figured there was nothing we could do . . .’
‘So what now?’ I am no longer speaking in measured tones. A head pops out
from a door further down and I try to reel myself in. ‘She has to stay in
hospital until Mum comes to fetch her?’ I hiss.
‘No, no . . .’ He puts out a reassuring hand and again I dodge it. I’m furious at
him for trying to shush me, for keeping this from me, for treating me like one
of the children and just repeating that everything is going to be al right.
Before I have the chance to quiz him any more, a short, balding doctor comes
out through the double doors, introduces himself to me as Dr Maguire and
shows us back into the smal room. We each take a seat on a spongy, lowslung chair and, holding up large X-rays, the doctor shows us the before and
after pictures, explains the procedure that took place and what to expect next.
He is cheerful and reassuring, echoes most of what Lochan has told me
already and assures me that although Wila’s shoulder wil be sore for a few
days and she wil have to wear a sling, it should be back to normal in a week.
He also informs us that she is now awake and eating dinner and that we can
take her home as soon as she is ready.
We can take her home. I feel myself go limp. We al stand up and Lochan
thanks Dr Maguire, who smiles broadly, reiterates that we can take Wila home
as soon as she’s ready, and then asks if it would be al right to send Mrs Leigh
in now. Lochan puts his hand against the wal as if to steady himself and nods
rapidly, chewing on his thumbnail as the doctor leaves.
‘Mrs Leigh?’ I turn to Lochan with a questioning frown.
He swings round and looks at me, breathing hard. ‘Don’t say anything. OK?
Just don’t say anything.’ His voice is low and urgent. ‘Let me do the talking –
we can’t risk contradicting each other.
If she asks you anything, just go along with the usual business-trip story and
tel her the truth – you had a late class and didn’t come home til after it had
happened.’
I gaze at Lochan across the smal room in bewilderment. ‘I thought you said
they were fine about Mum.’
‘They are. It’s – it’s just procedure . . . for this type of injury, they say.
Apparently they have to file some kind of report—’ Before he can get any
further, a knock sounds and a large woman with a head of frizzy ginger hair
enters.
‘Helo there. The doctor told you I’d be coming in to have a word? I’m Alison
– from the Child Protection Agency.’ She extends her hand towards Lochan.
A smal sound escapes me. I turn it into a cough.
‘Lochan Whitely. N-nice to meet you.’
He knew!
I’m aware I’m being addressed. I take her podgy hand in mine. For a moment
I literaly cannot speak. My mind has gone blank and I’ve forgotten my own
name. Then I force a smile, introduce myself and take a seat in the smal
triangle.
Alison is rummaging about in a large bag, puling out a folder and pen and
various forms, chatting as she does so. She asks Lochan to confirm the
situation with Mum, which he does in a surprisingly steady voice. She
appears satisfied, scribbles a few things down, and then looks up from her
notes with a broad, artificial smile.
‘Wel, I’ve already had a word with Wila about what happened. She’s a
delightful little girl, isn’t she? She explained she was in the kitchen with you,
Lochan, when she fel. And that, Maya, you were stil at school, but your two
brothers were at home.’
I look across at Lochan, wiling him to make eye-contact with me. But he
seems to have deliberately turned away. ‘Yes.’
Another of those fake smiles. ‘OK, so in your own time, explain to me how
the accident occurred.’
I don’t understand. This isn’t even about Mum. And surely Lochan gave the
details of the fal to the doctor in charge when he brought Wila in.
‘R-right. OK.’ Lochan leans forwards, elbows on knees, as if desperate to tel
this woman every detail. ‘I – I came into the kitchen and Wila was up on the
counter where she’s not alowed to be because it’s – it’s realy quite high, and –
and she was on tiptoe trying to reach a box of b-biscuits on the top shelf—’
He is speaking in that manic, staccato way again, almost tripping over his
words in his hurry to get them out. I can see the muscles in his arms vibrating,
and he is scraping at the sore beneath his mouth so hard that it’s starting to
bleed.
Alison just nods, scribbles some more, looks up again expectantly.
‘I t-told her to get down. She refused, saying her brothers had each eaten
some and had then d-deliberately put the biscuits up there out of her reach.’
He is panting, staring at the form as if trying to read what’s being recorded.
‘Go on . . .’
‘So I – I repeated what I’d just said—’
‘What exactly did you say?’ The woman’s voice is sharper now.
‘J-just – wel, basicaly just: Willa, get down now.’
‘Was that spoken or shouted?’
He seems to be having trouble breathing, the air making a scraping noise at
the back of his throat.
‘Um – wel – wel – the first time I was speaking quite loudly b-because I was
worried to see her up there again, and – and the second time, after she
refused, I – I suppose, y-yes, I sort of shouted.’ He glances up at her, chewing
the corner of his lip, the rise and fal of his chest rapid.
I can’t believe this woman! Making Lochan feel guilty about shouting at his
sister when she was doing something dangerous?
‘And then?’ The woman’s eyes are very sharp. She seems particularly
attentive now.
‘Wila – she, wel, she i-ignored me.’
‘And so what did you do?’
There is a terrible silence. What did you do? I repeat to myself, desperate to
butt in but trapped by my promise to let Lochan do the talking, on top of the
fact that I wasn’t actualy there. Does this Child Protection person ask the
parent of every injured child brought into hospital what it was the parent had
done? Guilty until proven innocent? This is ridiculous! Children fal and hurt
themselves al the time!
But Lochan isn’t answering. I feel my heart start to pound. Don’t start getting
stage-fright now, I beg with him in my head. Don’t make it look as if you
have something to hide!
Lochan is frowning and sighing and chewing his lip as if trying to remember,
and with a shock I realize he is close to tears.
I press myself back into the chair and bite down hard to stop myself from
intervening.
‘I p-puled her down.’ His chin quivers briefly. He doesn’t look up.
‘Could you explain exactly how you did that?’
‘I went – I went over and g-grabbed her by the arm and then – and then I
puled her off the counter.’ His voice cracks and he raises his fist to his face,
pressing his knuckles hard against his mouth.
Lochan, what the hell are you talking about? You would never deliberately
hurt Willa – you know that as well as I do.
‘You grabbed her arm and puled her to the floor?’ The woman arches her
eyebrows.
Silence stretches out across the room. I can hear my own heartbeat. Finaly
Lochan lowers his fist from his mouth and takes a ragged breath. ‘I puled her
arm and – and—’ He looks up at the corner of the ceiling, tears amalgamating
in his eyes like translucent marbles. ‘I know I shouldn’t have – I wasn’t
thinking—’
‘Just tel me what happened.’
‘I p-puled her arm and she slipped. She – she was wearing tights and her feet
just slid off the counter’s surface. I – I kept hold of her arm as she fel to try
and stop her from hurting herself and that’s when I felt this – this snap!’ He
squeezes his eyes shut for a moment, as if in terrible pain.
‘So you were holding onto her arm when she hit the floor and the weight of
her body puled the bone out of the socket?’
‘It was counter-intuitive to let go of her as she fel. I – I thought I’d c-caught
her, not – not wrenched her arm out of its socket. Jesus!’ A tear glances off his
cheek. He swipes at it rapidly. ‘I didn’t think—’
‘Lochie!’
His eyes meet mine this time. ‘It – it was an accident, Maya.’
‘I know!’ I exclaim in soft outrage.
The damn woman is scribbling again. ‘Are you often left in charge of your
siblings, Lochan?’she asks.
I recoil back into the chair. Lochan presses his fingers against his eyes and
takes some steady breaths, trying to pul himself together. He shakes his head
vehemently. ‘Only when our mother has to go away on business.’
‘And how often does that happen?’
‘It – it depends . . . Every couple of months or so . . .’
‘And when she’s away, I presume you have to fetch them from school, cook
for them, help them with homework, entertain them, put them to bed—’
‘We do it together,’ I say quickly.
The woman turns towards us both now. ‘That must be exhausting after a long
school day—’
‘They’re good at entertaining themselves.’
‘But when they misbehave, you must have to discipline them.’
‘Not realy,’ I say firmly. ‘They’re pretty wel-behaved.’
‘Have you ever hurt one of your siblings before?’ the woman asks, turning
towards Lochan.
He takes a breath. The fight with Kit flashes through my mind. ‘No!’ I
exclaim in outrage. ‘Never!
’
In the cab on the way home we are al three silent, spent, exhausted. Wila is
curled up on Lochan’s lap, her arm strapped up across her chest, the thumb of
her other hand in her mouth. Her head rests against Lochan’s neck, spots of
light from passing cars float over her golden hair. Lochan holds her tightly
against him, staring blankly out of the window, face pale and stunned, his
eyes glazed, refusing to meet mine.
We arrive home to a tornado-hit kitchen, the front room’s carpet embedded
with crisp, biscuit and cereal crumbs. To our amazement, however, Tiffin is
actualy in bed and Kit is stil in the house, up in the attic, music pounding
down through the ceiling. While Lochan gives a groggy Wila a drink and
some Calpol and puts her to bed, I climb up the ladder to let Kit know we’re
back.
‘So has she broken her arm, or what?’ Despite the nonchalant tone of his
voice, I recognize a spark of worry in his eyes as he glances up at me from his
Gameboy. I push his legs to one side to make room on his mattress and sit
down beside his sprawled-out figure.
‘She hasn’t actualy broken anything.’ I explain about the dislocated shoulder.
‘Yeah. Tiff said Loch lost his temper and puled Wila off the kitchen counter.’
His face darkens suddenly.
I pul my knees to my chest and take a deep breath. ‘Kit, you know it was an
accident. You know Lochan would never hurt Wila intentionaly, don’t you?’
My voice is questioning, serious. I know the answer, I know he does too, but I
need him to be honest with me for a moment and actualy admit it.
Kit takes a breath, ready for a sarcastic retort, but then seems to hesitate as his
gaze locks into mine. ‘Yeah,’ he confesses after a moment, a hint of defeat in
his voice.
‘I know you’re angry,’ I say quietly, ‘about how things turned out with Mum
and Dad, about Lochan and me always being the ones in charge – and Kit,
you have every right to be . . . but you know what the alternative is.’
His eyes have slid away, back to his Gameboy, uncomfortable about the
sudden change in conversation.
‘If Social Services found out that Mum was no longer living at home, that we
were on our own—’
‘Yeah, yeah, I know,’ he interrupts gruffly, pounding the buttons of his games
console viciously with his thumbs. ‘We’d be taken into care and split up and
al that shit.’ His voice sounds fed up and angry, but I can sense the fear behind
it.
‘It’s not going to happen, Kit,’ I reassure him quickly. ‘Lochan and I wil make
sure of that, I promise. But it does mean we have to be careful, really careful,
about what we say to other people.
Even if it’s just some mate at school. Al it would take would be for him to
mention it to his parents, or to another friend . . . al it would take is one call to
Social Services—’
‘Maya, I get it.’ His thumbs stop moving against the buttons and he looks up
at me sombrely, suddenly appearing much older than his thirteen years. ‘I
won’t tel anybody about Wila’s arm – or anything else that could get us into
trouble, OK? I promise.’
CHAPTER TWENTY-ONE.
Lochan.
We keep Wila off school for the rest of the week in order to avoid awkward
questions, and I cal in sick and stay at home with her. But by Monday she is
bored, has lost the sling and is eager to return to her friends. Mum returns
from Devon, and when I finaly track her down at Dave’s for money, she
shows scant interest in Wila’s injury.
I am having trouble sleeping again. Whenever I ask Wila about her shoulder,
she gives me this worried look and assures me that it’s ‘al mended now’. I
know she reads the guilt on my face, but this only makes me feel worse.
The green glow of my digital alarm reads 02:43 when I get up and creep out
of my room and down the corridor. Released from the warmth of the duvet, I
quickly start to shiver in my holey T-shirt and boxers. The creak of the
bedroom door makes Maya stir and I wince, anxious not to wake her.
Closing it softly behind me, I pad over to the wal opposite her bed, sliding
down against it, my bare arms turning silver in the light of the moon. She
continues to shift sleepily, nuzzling her face against the pilow, then abruptly
raises herself on one elbow, pushing back her long curtain of hair.
‘Lochie, is that you?’ A startled, frightened whisper.
‘Yeah – shh – sorry – go back to sleep!’
She struggles to sit up, rubbing sleep from her eyes. Finaly her eyes focus on
me and she shivers, puling the duvet around her. ‘Are you trying to give me a
heart attack? What on earth are you doing?’
‘I’m sorry – I realy didn’t mean to wake you—’
‘Wel, you have now!’ She gives me a sleepy smile and holds up the edge of
the duvet.
I quickly shake my head. ‘No . . . I just – can I watch you sleep? I know that
sounds weird but –
but I can’t sleep at the moment and it’s doing my head in!’ I give a sharp,
painful laugh. ‘Watching you sleep makes me feel—’ I inhale deeply. ‘I dunno
. . . at peace . . . D’you remember, I used to do it when we were young.’
She smiles in faint recolection. ‘Wel, you’re unlikely to get to sleep sitting
there on the floor.’ She holds out a portion of duvet again.
‘No, no, it’s fine. I’l just stay here for a while and then go back to bed.’
With a sigh of mock-irritation, she gets out of bed, pads over and puls me up
by the wrist.
‘Come on, get in. God, you’re shaking.’
‘I’m just cold!’ I snap, my voice coming out harsher than I intended.
‘Wel, come here then!’
The warmth of her duvet envelops me. She slides onto my lap and the touch
of her warm skin, her arms and legs wrapped around me, forces me to begin
to relax. Hugging me tight, she buries her face in my neck. ‘My God, you’re
an icicle.’
I let out a strained laugh. ‘Sorry.’
For a few moments we are both quiet. Her damp breath tickles my cheek. We
lie down and I feel my body gently thaw against hers as she strokes the back
of my head, running her fingers across my neck . . . God, how I wish we
could stay like this for ever. Suddenly, for no reason, I feel close to tears.
‘Tel me.’
It’s as if she can feel the pain through my skin. ‘Nothing. Just, you know, the
usual crap.’
I can tel she doesn’t believe me. ‘Listen,’she says. ‘Remember what Wila
said the other day?
We’re the grown-ups. We’ve always shared the responsibilities. You don’t
have to start trying to shield me from reality now.’
I press my mouth against her shoulder and close my eyes. I’m afraid of
worrying her, afraid of teling her how torn up I feel inside.
‘You think you can do the worrying for the both of us,’she whispers. ‘But it
doesn’t work like that, Loch. Not in an equal relationship. And that’s what
ours is. That’s what we’ve always had. Our relationship may be changing in
some ways, but we can’t possibly lose what we had before.’
I exhale slowly. Everything she says makes sense. In every way imaginable
she is so much wiser than me.
Blowing into my ear, she tickles me. ‘Hey, have you falen asleep?’
I smile slightly. ‘No, I’m thinking.’
‘Of what, my love?’
A smal aftershock runs through me. My love. She has never caled me that
before. Yet that’s who we’ve become. Two people in love.
‘What happened with Wila . . .’ I begin unsteadily. ‘That must have given you
a fright.’
‘I think it gave us both a fright.’
Unspoken words hover in the air between us.
‘Maya, you know, I – I realy did pul her arm quite hard. It’s – it’s no wonder
she fel,’ I manage in a frantic rush.
She lifts her head from my chest and props it up on one hand, her face turning
white in the moonlight. ‘Lochie, did you mean to pul her off the counter?’
‘No.’
‘Did you mean to hurt her?’
‘Course not.’
‘Did you mean to dislocate her shoulder?’
‘No!’
‘OK,’she says gently, stroking my face. ‘Then that train of thought leads
nowhere. It was a complete accident. Don’t let that stupid woman at the
hospital make you doubt that for one tiny second!’
Tears of relief threaten to overwhelm me. I didn’t think she blamed me, but I
couldn’t be sure. I take a deep breath. ‘But now Social Services have got us
on their radar – Jesus!’
‘Then we’l just have to keep beneath it, same as always.’ Maya puls herself
up onto her elbow, looking down at me. Her hair partly obscures her face and
I cannot read her expression. ‘Lochie, you’l be eighteen next month. We’ve
got this far. We can keep going! We can keep this family together, you and I.
We’re a good team, we’re a great team. Together we’re strong!’
I nod slowly against the pilow and reach up to stroke her cheek. Maya circles
my wrist with her hand and gently kisses each finger. My hand slides down
her neck, her chest, comes to rest against her breast . . . Suddenly I can feel
my heart.
Maya is watching me intently, her eyes very bright in the shadows. I can hear
my breath, hot and heavy, suddenly acutely aware that al that separates our
two bodies is a cotton nightie, a thin T-shirt and underwear. I run my hand
down her ribs, across her stomach, towards her bare thigh. Maya leans
forward. Taking the bottom of my T-shirt in her hands, she begins to raise it,
slowly puling it up and over my head. She then reaches down and puls off her
nightie. I emit a ragged gasp. Her body is perfectly white, in sharp contrast to
her hair, almost fiery in the moonlight. Her lips are a dark pink, her cheeks
lightly flushed, and her eyes bluer than the sea – watchful, uncertain. The
colours and contrasts overwhelm me. My gaze travels down over her, taking
in the upward curve of her breasts, the taut skin of her stomach, the long
slender legs. I could stare at her for ever. I can make out the ridge of her
colarbone, the peaks of her hips. Her skin looks so smooth I long to kiss it. I
want to feel every part of her but my hands tighten against the sheet.
‘We can touch each other,’ Maya whispers. ‘Just touch each other. There’s no
law against that.’
Reaching out, she gently runs her finger up my stomach, across my chest and
into the curve of my neck; cupping my cheek in her hand, she leans forward
to kiss me. I close my eyes, and with trembling hands, stroke her neck, her
shoulders, her breasts. Circling her with my arms, I pul her gently back down
against the pilows and slowly, tentatively, as if afraid of hurting her, begin to
trace my fingers down her body . . .
I awake with a start to find myself alone in Maya’s bed, but the house around
me is silent. A scrap of paper bearing my name is left beside me on the floor.
After reading it, I fal back against the pilows, staring up at the cracked
ceiling. Last night feels like a dream. I can’t believe we spent it together,
naked, our hands stroking each other’s bodies; can’t believe I actualy felt her
naked form press against mine. At first I was scared we might get carried
away – might cross that final, forbidden barrier, but just touching each other
was so incredible, so powerful, so thriling, it took my breath away. I wanted
more, of course I wanted more, but I knew that, for now, this would have to
be enough.
I am jolted out of my reverie by the slam of the front door, the sound of a
school bag being dropped to the floor, folowed by softly creaking footsteps on
the stairs. The bedroom door inches open, and I pul myself up against the
headboard as Maya’s face breaks into a smile. ‘You’re awake!’
She bounds over to the window and throws open the curtains, and I rub my
eyes against the bright morning light. I yawn and stretch, waving the note she
left me.
‘Maya, what were you thinking? We can’t just skip school.’ The reproach in
my voice fades as she jumps onto the bed beside me and gives me a cold kiss.
‘Eek, you’re freezing.’
She colapses beside me, the back of her head hitting the wal with a thud,
squashing my legs with hers. ‘You didn’t have anything important on today,
did you?’
‘I don’t think so . . .’
‘Good, wel, me neither.’
I take in her flushed face, the wisps of hair framing her face, her school
uniform. ‘You pretended to the others you were going to school and then just
came home again?’
‘Yes – as soon as I saw Kit go through the gates, I turned back! You didn’t
think I was gonna give you the day off alone, did you?’ She gives me a
wicked grin. ‘Come on, you awake yet?’
Shaking my head, I raise my hand to my mouth and yawn again. ‘I don’t think
so. How come I didn’t hear the alarm?’
‘I turned it off.’
‘Why?’
‘You were sleeping so deeply, Loch. You’ve been looking so knackered. I just
couldn’t bear to wake you—’
I start to smile, blinking at her sleepily. ‘I’m not complaining.’
‘Realy?’ I watch her face light up. ‘We have the whole day to ourselves!’ She
gazes up at the ceiling in delight. ‘I’m going to get changed, and then I
thought we could make pancakes and then we could go for a walk and then
—’
‘Wait, wait, wait. Come here first.’ I reach for her arm just as she is about to
rol off the bed.
‘What?’
‘Come here!’ Stil squinting slightly against the light, I tug at her wrist. ‘Kiss
me.’
Maya laughs and obliges, sliding back down beside me. Slowly I unbutton her
shirt and she wriggles out of her skirt. Ducking beneath the warmth of the
duvet, I start tracing a line of kisses down her body . . .
She is standing naked in front of the open door of her wardrobe when I return
from the shower and it takes her a moment to notice me hovering in the
doorway, watching her. She turns, meets my gaze, and blushes. She reaches
out for the crumpled sheet at the end of her bed and wraps it round beneath
her arms. The white material swirls around her feet, making me smile. I pul
on my underwear and join her by the window, kissing her cheek. ‘I do.’
She looks at me questioningly and then down at the sheet before breaking into
giggles.
‘In sickness and in health?’she asks. ‘Til death us do part?’
I shake my head. ‘Way beyond that,’ I say. ‘For ever.’
She takes my hands and leans in for a kiss. It hurts. Suddenly everything hurts
and I don’t know why.
‘Look at the sky,’she says, resting her head in the crook of my neck. ‘It’s so
blue.’
And suddenly I do know: it’s because everything is so beautiful, so
wonderful, so utterly glorious –
yet it cannot possibly last, and I want to preserve this moment for the rest of
my life.
I wrap my arms around her and press my cheek against the top of her head,
then notice the bracelet against her white wrist, the silver glinting in the
morning sun. I reach down and touch it.
‘Promise me you’l always keep it,’ I say, my voice unsteady suddenly.
‘Of course,’she replies instantly. ‘Why wouldn’t I? I love it. It’s the most
beautiful thing I own.’
‘Promise me,’ I say again, running my fingers over the smooth metal. ‘Even if
– even if things don’t work out . . . You don’t have to wear it. Just keep it
hidden somewhere.’
‘Hey.’ She tilts her head so that I am forced to meet her eyes. ‘I promise. But
things are going to work out. Look at us – they already have. You’re about to
be eighteen, and then next month I’l be seventeen. We’re nearly adults,
Lochie, and once we are, no one wil be able to stop us from doing what we
want.’
I lift my head, nod and force a smal smile. ‘Right.’
I see her expression shift. She leans her forehead against my cheek and closes
her eyes as if in pain. ‘You have to believe it, Lochie,’she whispers. ‘We both
have to believe it with al our might if we want to make it happen.’
I swalow hard and grasp the tops of her arms. ‘I believe it!’
She opens her eyes and smiles. ‘So do I!’
This is the definition of happiness: a whole day stretching out ahead of me,
beautiful in its emptiness and simplicity. No crowded classrooms, no packed
corridors, no lonely breaks, no cafeteria lunch, no droning teachers, no
relentless ticking clock, no counting down the minutes to the end of yet
another dreary day . . . Instead we spend it in a kind of joyous delirium, trying
to savour every moment, enjoy to the ful our bubble of happiness before it
bursts. We make pancakes and mess about with the strangest combinations of
filings: Maya wins Most Disgusting with her combination of Marmite,
cornflakes and ketchup, which has me gagging over the bin. I win Most
Artistic with frozen peas, red grapes and Smarties on a bed of mayonnaise.
We close the curtains in the front room and cuddle up on the sofa. Sometime
in the early afternoon Maya fals asleep in my arms. I watch her in slumber,
tracing my finger across the contours of her face, down her neck, over the
smooth white shoulder, down the length of her arm, along each of her fingers.
The sun pours in through the hastily drawn curtains, the clock on the
mantelpiece ticks its relentless countdown, the thin needle making its way
mercilessly round and round the face. I close my eyes and bury my face in
Maya’s hair, trying to shut out the sound, desperate to stop the precious time
we have together from running through my fingers like sand.
When she wakes, it is just gone three. In half an hour she wil have to pick up
Tiffin and Wila, while I clean up the mess in the kitchen and carefuly remove
any remaining items of clothing from her bedroom floor. I cup her flushed,
sleepy face in my hands and start kissing her with a fervour bordering on
hysteria. I feel angry and desperate.
‘Lochie, listen to me,’she tries to say between kisses. ‘Listen, my love –
listen. We’l just start skipping school every couple of weeks!’
‘I can’t wait another whole fortnight—’
‘What if we don’t have to?’she says suddenly, eyes igniting. ‘We could spend
every night together, like yesterday. Once we’re sure Tiff and Wila are asleep,
you can come and get into my bed—’
‘Every night? What if one of them walks in? We can’t do that!’ But she has
my attention.
‘There’s that rusty bolt at the bottom of my door, remember? We can just lock
it! Kit always fals asleep plugged into his headphones. And the other two
hardly ever wake up in the night any more.’
I chew on my thumbnail, thinking hard about the risks, desperately torn. I
look up into Maya’s bright eyes and remember last night, feeling her smooth
naked body beneath my hands for the first time. ‘OK!’ I whisper with a smile.
‘Lochie? Are you better, Lochie? Are you taking us to school tomorrow,
Lochie?’ Wila is al concern, climbing onto my lap as I sit sprawled out in
front of the TV.
Tiffin’s concern is more casual, but present nonetheless. ‘You got flu or
what?’ he asks me in his growing East End accent, blowing the long fair hair
out of his eyes. ‘Are you il? You don’t look il.
How long are you gonna be il for, anyway?’
With a jolt, I realize that my taking a day off school has thrown them.
Previously I’ve gone in with flu and even bronchitis, just because the kids had
to be taken in, Kit had to be watched, Social Services had to be kept off our
backs, so taking a day off wasn’t usualy an option. I realize too that they
associate any kind of ‘serious’ ilness with Mum: Mum colapsing drunk on the
doorstep, Mum retching over the toilet bowl, Mum lying passed out on the
kitchen floor. They aren’t worried about my supposed headache, they are
worried I wil disappear.
‘I’ve never felt better,’ I reassure them truthfuly. ‘My headache’s al gone.
Why don’t we al go and play outside together for a bit?’
It is amazing the difference a day off school can make. Usualy, by this time, I
am dragged down with exhaustion, snappy and on edge, desperate to get the
kids into bed so I can get a moment alone with Maya and a start on homework
before I find myself faling asleep at my desk. Today, as the four of us set up a
game of British Buldog, I feel almost weightless, as if the Earth’s gravity has
dramaticaly decreased. So, as the sun begins to set on the mild March day, I
find myself standing in the middle of the empty street, hands on knees,
waiting for the three of them to come tearing towards me, hoping to make it
to the opposite side without getting caught. Tiffin looks al ready for takeoff,
one sneakered foot pressed back against the wal, his arms bent, hands
clenched into fists, a look of fierce determination in his eyes. I know that on
the first round, I have to give him a run for his money without actualy
catching him. Wila is receiving last-minute instructions from Maya who, by
the looks of things, is planning diversionary tactics to alow her to run straight
across the road without getting caught.
‘Come on!’ Tiffin yels impatiently.
Maya straightens up, Wila hops up and down in excitement and I count down,
‘Three, two, one, go!’
Nobody moves. I galop sideways so that I’m directly facing Wila and she
squeals in delighted terror, pressing herself back against the wal like a
starfish, as if trying to push herself right through.
Then Tiffin is off like a bulet, heading away from me at a sharp angle.
Anticipating his move, I race towards him, blocking his trajectory. He
hesitates, torn between the humiliation of running back to the safety of the
wal and the risk of making a run for it. Boldly, he chooses the latter. I give
chase immediately, but he’s surprisingly fast for his size. He makes it to the
other side by the skin of his teeth, face glowing pink with exertion, eyes
triumphant.
Maya has used this diversion to send Wila on her way. She runs wildly
towards Tiffin, so intent on reaching safety she almost launches herself
straight into my arms. I take a step back and growl in an attempt to send her
off in a different direction. She freezes, a rabbit caught in headlights, her blue
eyes huge with the thril of fear. From either side of the street, the other two
scream out instructions.
‘Go back, go back!’ Tiffin screeches.
‘Go around him, dodge him!’ Maya yels, confident in the knowledge that I’l
only pretend to try and catch her.
Wila makes a move to my right. I lunge for her, my fingers brushing the hood
of her coat, and with a squeal she hurls herself towards the wal, head-butting
Tiffin in the stomach, who promptly doubles over with a dramatic yel.
Maya is now the only one left, dancing about on the other side of the street,
making Tiffin and Wila laugh.
‘Run, just run for it, Maya!’ Tiffin screams helpfuly.
‘Go this way – no this way!’ Wila squeals, pointing wildly in al directions.
I flash Maya an evil grin to signal that I have every intention of catching her,
and she bites back a smile, a hint of mischief in her eyes. Hands in pockets, I
start sauntering towards her.
She goes for it. Catching me off guard, she sets off at an acute angle. I match
her pace for pace and start laughing in anticipated triumph as we approach the
boundary. Then, out of nowhere, she wrong-foots me and goes tearing back
the opposite way. I hurl myself after her but it’s no use. She makes it to the
other wal, yelping in triumph.
In the next round I catch Tiffin, whose disappointment soon turns to glee as
he finds himself in the role of predator. Ruthlessly, he goes straight for Wila
and catches her within seconds of her leaving the safety of the wal, sending
her flying. Bravely she picks herself up, briefly examines her scraped palms,
and then dances about excitedly in the middle of the road, stretching her arms
out as if hoping to block our path. As we surge towards her, Maya and I both
try so hard to alow her to catch us that we end up coliding and she grabs us
both, provoking much hysteria. Maya has just begun her turn when, in the
distance, I make out a lone figure trailing down the road towards us, and
recognize Kit, dragging himself home dejectedly after an hour spent in
detention for swearing at a teacher.
‘Kit, Kit, we’re playing British Buldog!’ Tiffin yels excitedly. ‘Come and join
in! Please! Lochie and the girls are al rubbish. I’m ruling this game!’
Kit stops at the gate. ‘You al look like a bunch of retards,’ he announces
coldly.
‘Wel, come and liven up the game then,’ I suggest. ‘You know, I could do
with some competition.
This game is piss easy for a runner like me.’
Kit lowers his bag and I see him hesitate, torn between expressing the usual
contempt for his family and the desire just to be a kid again.
‘Unless you’re worried I’l outrun you,’ I say, throwing down the gauntlet.
‘Yeah, right, in your dreams,’ Kit sneers. He turns towards the front door but
at the last minute puls back. Abruptly, he takes off his blazer.
‘Yay!’ Tiffin screams.
‘You can be on our team!’ Wila screams.
‘We don’t have teams, you dumbhead!’ Tiffin yels back.
Soon we are embroiled in yet another round. I am back in the middle and
determined to chase Kit into the ground – without actualy catching him,
obviously. Typicaly, he is the last to peel himself off the wal after al the others
have made it safely to the other side. He waits for what feels like an eternity,
clearly trying to test my patience. I start wandering off, turning my back on
him, even bending down to tie my shoelace, but he is wise to al my tricks.
Only when I am a couple of metres away from him does he finaly move,
deliberately making it as difficult for himself as possible. He wrong-foots me,
legs it sharp right, hesitates as I block him, then begins to back away. He
gives me his cocky, mocking smile, but I can see the sharp determination in
his eyes. I lunge for him. He dodges me by milimetres and sets off at a
blinding sprint. I charge after him, intent on making up the short gap between
us. I grab him by his shirt colar just as his hands slap the wal. When he turns
to face me, his face is aglow with a delight I haven’t seen in him for years.
We play on, wel into the dark. Wila eventualy colapses in exhaustion and goes
to sit in the warmth of the halway, watching us and yeling instructions
through the open door. Maya is next to join her. I am left with Tiffin and Kit,
and suddenly we’re al playing for real. Tiffin’s footbal skils come in handy,
making him impossibly slippery to catch. Kit uses every trick in the book to
distract me, and soon the two of them are ganging up on me, using each other
as foils, locking me into the role of chaser. Finaly, in exhaustion, I go for Kit
like a demented bul. I catch him inches away from safety but he refuses to
surrender, reaching out desperately for the wal and half dragging me along
with him.
We fal to the ground and I’m tearing at his shirt to stop him sliding out of my
grasp while Tiffin is trying to use himself as a human chain between Kit and
the wal.
‘I won, I won!’ Kit yels.
‘No way! You have to touch the wal, you big cheat!’
‘I touched it!’
‘You didn’t!’
‘I touched Tiff’s hand and he’s touching the wal!’
‘That doesn’t count!’
I have Kit pinned to the ground and he screams to Tiffin for help. Tiffin
bravely leaves the safety of the wal but immediately gets puled down on top
of us. ‘Got you both!’ I cry.
‘Cheater, cheater!’ They deafen me with their yels.
Soon we can’t move for laughter and exhaustion, Tiffin straddling my back
and Kit, shaking with mirth, reaching out for a nearby twig and using that to
touch the wal. We finaly peel ourselves off the road, filthy and battered. Kit’s
face is streaked with dirt and Tiffin’s shirt colar torn as we limp inside, long
after dinner time, long after the homework hour. Once the boys have been
persuaded to wash their hands, we colapse around the kitchen table with
Maya and Wila, feasting on snacks and Nutela straight from the jar.
Kit tries to trip me as I get up to put the kettle on. ‘We should have a
rematch,’ he informs me.
‘You need the practice.’
And then he smiles.
CHAPTER TWENTY-TWO.
Maya.
Over the last few weeks a momentous change seems to have occurred.
Suddenly everyone seems so much happier, so much more at ease. Kit starts
behaving like a civilized human being. Lochan turns eighteen – we al go out
to Burger King to celebrate and Wila and I make a delicious, albeit lopsided
cake. Mum neglects even to phone. Taking the odd day off school alows
Lochan and me time for us, time to tackle the mountain of things that needed
doing long ago: trips to the doctor’s, the dentist’s, the hairdresser’s. Lochan
helps Kit fix his bike and finaly gets enough cash from Mum to buy new
uniforms and pay some of the overdue bils. Together, we clean the house from
top to bottom, devise a fresh set of house rules to encourage the kids to take
on a few responsibilities of their own, but, most important of al, we make
time to do things as a family – to play in the park or sit around the kitchen
table with a board game. Now that Lochan and I spend our nights together
and skip school whenever things start to get too stressful again, time on our
own is no longer so limited, and having fun with the children becomes as
important as looking after them.
Mum ‘checks in on us’ from time to time, rarely staying more than a night or
two, reluctantly handing us the cash that’s supposed to get us through the
week, resentfuly puling out her chequebook to pay the bils that Lochan thrusts
at her. A lot of her anger stems from the fact that Lochan and I refuse to leave
school and get jobs, but there is a deeper reason there too. She is stil forced to
support a family she is no longer a part of – has chosen to no longer be a part
of. But apart from the financial side of things, none of us expect anything
from her any more, so no one is disappointed.
Tiffin and Wila cease rushing to greet her, no longer beg for a few minutes of
her time. Lochan is already starting to look for a job after his A-levels. At
university, he insists, he wil be able to work part-time and we won’t have to
keep begging Mum for money. As a family, we are now complete.
But I live for the night. Stroking Lochan, feeling every part of him, arousing
him with just the touch of my hand, makes me long for more.
‘D’you ever wonder what it would be like?’ I ask him. ‘To actualy—?’
‘Al the time.’
There is a long silence. He kisses me, his lashes tickling my cheek.
‘Me too,’ I whisper.
‘One day,’ he pants softly as I graze my fingers up his thigh.
‘Yes . . .’
Yet some nights we come so close. I feel the longing ache in my body and
sense Lochan’s frustration as keenly as my own. When he kisses me so hard it
almost hurts and his body thrums against mine, desperate to go further, I
begin to worry that by sharing a bed every night we are tormenting each other.
But whenever we talk about it, we always agree we would far, far rather be
together like this than go back to our separate rooms and not touch each other
at al.
At school, as I gaze up at Lochan sitting alone on the steps at break time and
he looks back down at me, the gulf between us seems enormous. We
discreetly raise a hand in greeting and I count down the hours until I’l get to
see him properly at home. Sitting on the low wal with Francie at my side, I
often lose track of the conversation and sit there daydreaming about him, until
one day, to my astonishment, I see that he is not alone.
‘Oh my God, who’s he talking to?’ I cut Francie off mid-sentence.
Her eyes folow my gaze. ‘Looks like Declan, that new guy in the Upper
Sixth. His family just moved here from Ireland, I think. Apparently he’s super
smart, applying for al these universities . . .
You must have seen him around!’
I haven’t, but unlike Francie I don’t spend most of my time ogling every male
pupil in the Sixth Form.
‘Jesus!’ I exclaim, astonishment sounding in my voice. ‘Why d’you think
they’re talking?’
‘They were having lunch together yesterday,’ Francie informs me.
I turn to stare at her. ‘Seriously?’
‘Yeah. And when I passed Lochan in the corridor the other day, we kind of
had a conversation.’
She opens her mouth wide.
‘What?’
‘Yeah! Instead of walking straight past me, pretending he hadn’t seen me, he
actualy stopped and asked me how I was.’
I feel an incredulous smile light up my face.
‘So, you see, he can talk to people.’ Francie lets out a wistful sigh. ‘Maybe I
can finaly get him to go out with me.’
I look back up at the steps again with a smile of delight. ‘Oh my God . . .’
Declan is stil there. He seems to be showing Lochan something on his mobile
phone. I watch Lochan make a funny gesture in the air and Declan laughs.
Stil reeling with shock, I decide to take the plunge and ask Francie the
question I’d been wanting to put to her for some time now.
‘Hey, I’ve been wondering about something . . . Do you – do you think that
any two people, if they realy and truly love each other, should be alowed to be
together no matter who they are?’ I ask.
Francie shoots me a look of amusement, sees that I’m serious, and narrows
her eyes in thought.
‘Sure, why not?’
‘What if their religion forbade it? If their parents were devastated or
threatened to disown them or something – should they stil go ahead anyway?’
‘Sure,’ Francie answers with a shrug. ‘It’s their lives, so they should be
alowed to pick who they like. If the parents are crazy enough to try and stop
them from seeing each other, they could run away, elope.’
‘What if it was something even more difficult?’ I ask, thinking hard. ‘What if
it was – I dunno – a teacher and a pupil?’
Francie’s eyes widen and she suddenly grabs my arm. ‘No way! Who the hel
is it? Mr Eliot?
That guy in the IT department? The one with the tattoo?’
Laughing, I shake my head. ‘Not me, sily! I was just thinking hypotheticaly.
Like we were talking about in history, about society having changed so much
over the last half-century . . .’
‘Oh.’ Francie’s face fals in disappointment.
I look at her with a snort. ‘Mr Eliot? Are you kidding me? He’s about sixty!’
‘I think he’s kind of sexy!’
I rol my eyes. ‘That’s because you’re crazy. But seriously though.
Hypotheticaly . . .’
Francie lets out a laboured sigh. ‘Wel, they should probably wait until the
pupil was over the legal age limit for starters—’
‘But what if she was? What if she was sixteen and the guy was in his forties?
Should they run away together? Would that be right?’
‘Wel, the guy would lose his job and the girl’s parents would be worried sick,
so they’d probably be better off keeping it secret for a few years. Then, by the
time the girl was nineteen or so, it wouldn’t even be a big deal any more!’ She
shrugs. ‘I think it would be kinda cool to go out with a teacher. Just imagine,
sitting in class, you could . . .’
I tune her out and inhale deeply, frustrated. There is nothing, I suddenly
realize, nothing that can compare to our situation.
‘So nothing is taboo any more?’ I interrupt. ‘You’re saying there are no two
people who, if they love each other enough, should be forced apart?’
Francie thinks for a moment and then shrugs. ‘I guess not. Not here, anyway,
thank God. We’re lucky enough to live in a country which is pretty openminded. As long as one person isn’t forcing the other one, then I guess any
love is alowed.’
Any love. Francie isn’t stupid. Yet the one kind of love that wil never be
alowed hasn’t even crossed her mind. The one love so disgusting and taboo, it
isn’t even included in a conversation about ilicit relationships.
The conversation haunts me over the folowing weeks. Although I have no
intention of ever confiding our secret to anyone, I can’t help wondering what
Francie’s reaction would be if she somehow found out. She is an inteligent,
broad-minded person with a rebelious streak in her. Despite her bold
declaration that no love is wrong, I strongly suspect that she would be as
horrified as the next person if she knew of my relationship with Lochan. But
he’s your brother! I can hear her exclaim. How could you ever do it with your
brother? That’s so gross! Oh God, Maya, you’re sick, you’re really sick. You
need help. And the strangest thing is that a part of me agrees. Part of me
thinks: Yes, if Kit was older and it was with him, then it would be totally
gross. The very idea is unthinkable, I don’t even want to imagine it. It actually
makes me feel physically sick. But how to get across to the outside world that
Lochan and I are siblings only through a biological mishap?
That we were never brother and sister in the real sense, but always partners,
having to bring up a real family as we grew up ourselves. How to explain that
Lochan has never felt like a brother but like something far, far closer than that
– a soul mate, a best friend, part of the very fibre of my being?
How to explain that this situation, the love we feel for one another –
everything that to others may seem sick and twisted and disgusting – to us
feels completely natural and wonderful and oh – so, so right?
At night, after kissing and cuddling and touching each other, we lie there and
talk, late into the night. We talk about anything and everything: how the kids
are doing, funny anecdotes from school, how we feel about each other. And
ever since I spotted him on the steps having a conversation, we talk about
Lochan’s new-found voice. Although he is keen to play it down, he does
confess to having made a sort of friend in Declan, who initialy approached
Lochan because they both had offers from UCL. Speaking to anyone else is
stil something he avoids, but I’m overjoyed. The fact that he has made a
connection with one person outside the family means that he can, that there
wil be others, and that once he goes to university he wil finaly meet people he
has something in common with. And the night Lochan tels me he actualy
managed to stand up in front of the whole of his English class and read out
one of his essays, I let out a squeal that has to be silenced by a pilow.
‘Why?’ I ask, gasping in delight. ‘How come? What happened? What
changed?’
‘I’d been thinking about – about what you said, that I should take one step at a
time and that, wel, mainly that you thought I could do it.’
‘What was it like?’ I ask, struggling to keep my voice a whisper, looking into
eyes that, even in the half-light, sparkle with a gentle triumph.
‘Horrible.’
‘Oh, Loch!’
‘My hands were trembling and my voice was shaking and the words on the
page suddenly turned into this mass of hieroglyphics, but somehow I got
through it. And when I finished there were some people – and not just the
girls – who actualy clapped.’ He lets out a short exclamation of surprise.
‘Wel, of course they did! Your essays are completely amazing!’ I reply.
‘There was also this guy – a guy caled Tyrese who’s OK – and he came up to
me after the bel and said something about the essay. I don’t know what
exactly, because I was stil deafened by terror’ – he laughs – ‘but it must have
been vaguely complimentary because he slapped me on the back.’
‘See?’ I crow softly. ‘They were inspired by your essay! No wonder your
teacher was so keen for you to read one out. Did you say anything back to
Tyrese?’
‘I think I said something along the lines of oh-umyeah-uh-cheers.’ Lochan
lets out a derisive snort.
I laugh. ‘That’s great! And next time you’l actualy say something a little more
coherent!’
Lochan smiles and turns on his side, propping his head up on his hand. ‘You
know, recently, even when we’re apart, I sometimes think that maybe I’m
going to beat this thing, that one day I might be normal.’
I kiss his nose. ‘You are normal, sily.’
He doesn’t respond but begins pensively rubbing a strand of my hair between
his fingers.
‘Sometimes I wonder . . .’ He tails off abruptly, suddenly examining my hair
in great detail.
‘Sometimes you wonder . . . ?’ I tilt my head and kiss the corner of his mouth.
‘What – what I’d do without you,’ he finishes in a whisper, gaze studiously
avoiding mine.
‘Go to sleep at a reasonable time, in a bed where you can actualy rol over
without faling out . . .’
He laughs softly into the night. ‘Oh yeah, an easier life in so many ways.
Mum should never have got pregnant again so quickly after me . . .’
His joke tails off uncomfortably and the laughter is sucked up into the
darkness as the truth behind his words sinks in.
After a long silence Lochan suddenly says, ‘She certainly wasn’t meant to
have children, but, wel, not that I realy believe in fate or anything – but what
if we were meant to have each other?’
I don’t respond immediately, not quite sure what he’s getting at.
‘I guess what I’m trying to say is that maybe what seemed like a shitty
situation for a bunch of abandoned kids actualy, because of the way it
happened, led to something realy special.’
I think about this for a moment. ‘Do you think, if we’d had conventional
parents, or just parents, you and I would have falen in love?’
Silence from him now. Moonlight iluminates the side of his face, a silverywhite glow washing across one half, leaving the other in shadow. He has that
distant look in his eyes which either means that his mind is on something else,
or that he’s giving my tentative question some very serious consideration.
‘I’ve often wondered . . .’ he begins quietly. I wait for him to continue. ‘Many
people claim that the abused often go on to abuse, so for most psychologists,
our mother’s neglect – which is considered a form of abuse – would be linked
directly to our “abnormal” behaviour, which they would interpret as abuse
too.’
‘Abuse?’ I exclaim in astonishment. ‘But who would be abusing who? In
abuse, there’s an attacker and a victim. How could we be seen as both abusers
and abusees?’
The blue-white glow of the moon casts just enough light for me to notice
Lochan’s expression turn from pensive to troubled.
‘Maya, come on, think about it. I’d be automaticaly seen as the abuser and
you the victim.’
‘Why?’
‘How many cases of younger sisters sexualy abusing older brothers have you
read about? Come to think of it, how many female rapists and female
paedophiles are there?’
‘But that’s crazy!’ I exclaim. ‘I could have been the one to force you into a
sexual relationship!
Not physicaly, but by – I dunno – bribes, blackmail, threats, whatever! Are
you saying that even if I’d abused you, people would stil assume I was the
victim just because I’m a girl and one year younger?’
Lochan nods slowly, his shaggy hair dark against the pilow. ‘Unless there was
some realy strong evidence to the contrary – an admission of guilt on your
part, witnesses or something – then, yes.’
‘But that’s so sexist, so unfair!’
‘I agree, but people rely heavily on generalizations, and although it must
sometimes happen the other way round, it’s gotta be pretty rare. For a start,
there’s the physical aspect . . . So it’s not realy al that surprising that in
situations like this, guys are automaticaly assumed to be the abusers,
especialy if they’re older.’
I curl my legs up against Lochan’s stomach and ruminate on this for a while.
It al seems so wrong.
But at the same time I’m aware that I’m guilty of the same prejudices – if I
hear there’s been a rape, or a child’s been abducted, I immediately think male
rapist, male paedophile.
‘But what about if no one’s being abused?’ I ask suddenly. ‘What if it’s one
hundred percent consensual, like us?’
He exhales slowly. ‘I don’t know. It would stil be against the law. It’s stil
incest. But there’s not much info on it, because apparently it’s something that
very, very rarely happens . . .’
We both stop talking for a while. So long, in fact, that I begin to think Lochie
has falen asleep. But when I turn my head on the pilow to check, I see his
eyes are wide open, staring up at the ceiling, bright and intense.
‘Lochie . . .’ I rol onto my side and run my fingers down his bare arm. ‘When
you said there’s not much info on it, what did you mean? How do you know?’
He is chewing his lip again. Beside me, his body feels tense. He hesitates for
a moment, then rols back over to face me. ‘I – I did a bit of research on the
Internet . . . I just – I just . . .’ He takes a deep breath before trying again. ‘I
just wanted to know where we stood.’
‘With what?’
‘With – with the law.’
‘To figure out a way of changing our names? Of living together?’
He rubs his lip, refusing to meet my gaze, looking increasingly agitated and
uncomfortable.
‘What?’ I demand loudly, frightened now. ‘To see what would happen if we
got caught.’
‘Caught living together?’ I ask incredulously.
‘Caught – caught having a relationship—’
‘Having sex?’
‘Yes.’
‘By who?’
‘The police.’
I am finding it difficult to breathe suddenly, as if my windpipe is constricting.
I sit up abruptly, hair faling down around my face.
‘Look, Maya. It’s not – I just wanted to check . . .’ Lochan is puling himself
up against the headboard, struggling to find words to reassure me.
‘Does that mean we can never—?’
‘No, no, not necessarily,’ he says quickly. ‘It just means that we can’t until the
kids are grown up and safe, and even then we have to be very, very careful.’
‘I knew it was officially ilegal,’ I tel him desperately. ‘But pot’s ilegal, so is
speeding, so is peeing in a public place. Anyway, how would the police even
notice and why would they even care –
it’s not like we’re hurting anyone or even ourselves!’ I feel like I’m running
out of breath but I’m determined to make my point. ‘And anyway, if we did
somehow get caught, what the hel would the police do? Fine us?’ I let out a
harsh laugh. Why is Lochan trying to freak me out like this? Why is he acting
so serious, as if we would be committing a real crime?
Half propped up against the headboard, Lochan stares at me. If it weren’t for
the stricken expression in his eyes, he would look quite comical, his hair al on
end. His face radiates a mixture of fear and despair. ‘Maya . . .’
‘Lochie, what? What’s the matter?’
He breathes: ‘If we were found out, we’d be sent to prison.’
CHAPTER TWENTY-THREE.
Lochan.
Thankfuly we were too exhausted to talk about it much more that night.
Before sleep overcame us, however, Maya wanted to know further details:
what kind of sentence we could face, whether the law was different in other
countries – but I could only repeat the little I had gleaned from my closet
scouring of the Internet. There is actualy precious little information to be
found on consensual incest, though there is plenty on the non-consensual
kind, which seems to be the only type most people think exists. I have
thoroughly searched for online testimonies but found only two that had
actualy made it into the public domain – neither of them in the UK and both
between siblings who met again as adults after being separated at birth.
The topic only resurfaces briefly the folowing day before being dropped
completely. Despite her initial reaction, Maya’s shock and outrage seem to
have been assuaged by my assurances that the only legal information I have
found has been hypothetical – technicaly, yes, a couple accused of incest
could face a jail sentence, but that would rarely happen in the case of two
consenting adults. I am now legaly an adult and Maya is close behind me, so
we won’t have to wait much longer. Police hardly go out searching for this
kind of thing. And in the very unlikely event that some random person did
find out – why on earth would they try and have us arrested or taken to court?
Because they hated us?
Wanted some kind of revenge? And unless we had biological children of our
own – which would be insane – how on earth could that person ever get
enough proof to stand up in court? They would have to actualy catch us in the
act, and even then it would be their word against ours.
My main concern for the future is how to protect Kit, Tiffin and Wila from
being ostracized in the event of rumours about Maya and I living together and
never having partners of our own. But by then they would have their own
lives, Maya and I would have hopefuly moved away and, if necessary,
changed our names by Deed Pol. Yes, we could simply change our names and
live as openly and freely as any unmarried couple. No more hiding, no more
locked doors. Freedom. And the right to love each other without persecution.
For the time being though, Maya and I have to cram for exams. We are
astonished when, out of the blue one day, Kit offers to take Tiffin and Wila to
the cinema to give us time to revise. On another occasion he takes them to the
park to play footbal. Roughly since that first game of British Buldog out in
the street, he has stopped goading me, stopped slamming around the house,
stopped winding up the kids and stopped trying to undermine me al the time.
He hasn’t exactly become an angel overnight but he no longer seems to feel
threatened by my role in the family. It’s almost as if he’s accepted Maya and
me as surrogate parents. I have no idea where it’s al come from. Perhaps he
has joined a nicer group of boys at school. Perhaps he is just growing up. But
whatever the reason, I dare to believe Kit has truly begun to turn the corner.
He runs down to dinner one evening, triumphantly waving a piece of paper.
‘I’m going on a school trip when we break up! Nya-na, nya-nya-na!’ He puls
a taunting face at the other two.
‘Where?’ Wila shrieks excitedly as if she were also included.
‘Whoa! So not fair!’ Tiffin exclaims, his face faling. ‘Here, quick, quick,
you’ve gotta sign it now!’
Kit waves the sheet above my plate and thrusts a pen in my hand.
‘I didn’t realize your teacher was waiting for this on the doorstep!’
Kit puls a face at me. ‘Very funny. Just sign it, wil you?’
I scan the letter and balk at the price, quickly trying to work out where on
earth we’l get the money from. Cancel the cheque for the phone bil which I
only posted yesterday, eat baked beans for the next fortnight, pretend to Mum
that we have no running water and need money for a plumber . . .
I forge our mother’s signature. It saddens me a little to see how delirious with
excitement Kit is about the trip – it’s only an activity week on the Isle of
Wight, but he has never been further afield than Surrey.
‘It’s abroad!’ he crows at Tiffin. ‘We have to take a boat! We’re going to an
island in the middle of the sea!’
I open my mouth, about to readjust Kit’s vision of a desert island surrounded
by palm trees in order to avoid terrible disappointment, when Maya catches
my eye and subtly shakes her head. She’s right. Kit won’t be disappointed.
Even rainy and cold, the muddy Isle of Wight wil seem like Paradise to him –
and a milion miles away from home.
‘What are you going to do there?’ Tiffin asks, slouching down in his chair and
prodding dejectedly at his chicken with his fork.
Kit throws himself down and kicks back, reading from the newly-signed
letter. ‘Canoeing, horse-riding, abseiling, orienteering’ – his voice rises with
mounting delight – ‘camping ?’ He returns the front legs of his chair to the
floor with an astonished thud. ‘I didn’t see that one. Yes! I’ve always wanted
to go camping!’
‘Me too!’ Tiffin cries. ‘Why can’t I go? Are you alowed to bring brothers?’
‘Horse-riding!’ Wila’s eyes are huge with disbelief.
‘How come St Luke’s never takes us on trips?’ Tiffin’s lower lip quivers.
‘Life is so unfair.’
I don’t remember ever seeing Kit so excited. The only problem, though, is his
fear of heights. It is something he has never admitted to, but there was that
time – for ever etched into my memory – when he fainted on the edge of the
top diving board and dropped unconscious into the water. Then, only last
year, he started feeling dizzy and fel while attempting to folow his friends
across a high wal. He has never been abseiling before and, knowing he would
rather die than sit out and watch his classmates, I go to speak to Coach
Wilson, the teacher in charge of the expedition, careful to ask for Kit not to be
excluded, but for an adult to keep an eye on him. Stil, I find myself worrying.
Things with Kit are going so wel, almost too wel. I worry that the trip won’t
live up to his expectations; I worry even more that, with his dare-devil nature,
he may have an accident. Then I remember what Maya said to me about
always thinking about the worst-case scenario and force myself to purge the
worry from my mind.
By the end of term Maya and I are exhausted, clawing our way towards the
Easter holidays. I can’t believe that school wil soon be a thing of the past.
Apart from a few revision classes after the holidays, al I have left are the
actual exams. Naturaly, they scare me a little as my university place hangs in
the balance, but beyond them lies the promise of a new life.
Time alone with Maya has been scant and I ache to have her to myself, even
just for a day. But as soon as Kit leaves for his trip, the Easter holidays wil be
upon us, with last-minute revision to cram in around two weeks of childcare. I
feel as if we wil never get the chance to be properly alone together. After
being at school al day, entertaining children al evening, rushing through
household chores and then poring over textbooks for hours, there is rarely
time for more than a few kisses before faling asleep in each other’s arms. I
miss those hours we once had at the end of each day; I miss stroking every
part of her body, feeling her hands against mine, talking until we fal asleep.
And I bitterly, bitterly resent that, just because our relationship is considered
wrong, al those hours of happiness we could have together are being stolen
from us, and we are forced instead to sneak about, in constant fear of being
caught.
I find myself desperate for even the little things – being able to hold her hand
on the way to school, kissing her goodbye in the corridor before heading for
our separate classes, having lunch together, spending break times snuggled up
together on a bench or kissing passionately behind one of the buildings,
running over and hugging when we meet at the gates after the final bel. Al
things that the other couples at Belmont take for granted. Their liaisons are
looked upon with a mixture of awe and envy by the pupils who are stil single,
despite the fact that they rarely last for more than a few weeks before
crumbling over some stupid fight or because a new, better-looking prospect
comes along. I don’t view these people with horror or disgust for being so
shalow and fickle. So many superficial liaisons surround me, so many guys
just looking for sex, for another conquest to add to their brag-list before
swiftly moving on. One might struggle to understand why anyone would
embark on relationships that lack any real, meaningful emotion, yet nobody
judges them for it. They are ‘young’,
‘just having a good time’, and sure, if that’s what they want, why shouldn’t
they? But then why is it so terrible for me to be with the girl I love? Everyone
else is permitted to have what they want, express their love as they please,
without fear of harassment, ostracism, persecution or even the law. Even
emotionaly abusive, adulterous relationships are often tolerated, despite the
harm they cause others.
In our progressive, permissive society, al these harmful, unhealthy types of
‘love’ are alowed – but not ours. I can think of no other kind of love that is so
totaly rejected, even though ours is so deep, passionate, caring and strong that
forcing us apart would cause us unimaginable pain. We are being punished by
the world for just one simple reason: for having been produced by the same
woman.
The anger and frustration chips away at me, even though I try to keep it at
bay, even though I keep focusing on the day Maya and I wil finaly be free to
live together openly, free to love each other like any other couple. Sometimes,
worse than watching her at school from a distance is seeing her at home, too
close to touch, together but apart, so near and yet so far. Having to yank back
my hand as I instinctively reach for hers at the dinner table, trying to brush
against her accidentaly just for the smal tingle of pleasure caused by the touch
of her skin. Gazing at her face as she reads to Wila on the couch, yearning to
feel her hair, her cheek, her mouth. Even though I can’t wait for the holidays
to begin so I can spend every minute of the day with her, I know that this tiny
but impenetrable distance between us wil be torture.
And then, just days before the end of term, a miracle occurs. Maya gets off
the phone one evening and returns to the dinner table to announce that
Freddie and his little sister have invited both Tiffin and Wila for a sleepover
that weekend. The timing could not be better – that same day Kit wil be
leaving for the Isle of Wight. Two days – two whole days of uninterrupted
time together. Two days of freedom . . . Surreptitiously, Maya shoots me a
look of pure delight, and elation fils me like helium in a baloon. While Tiffin
pretends to fal off his chair in enthusiasm and Wila drums her shoes against
the underside of the table, I am ready to bounce off the wals and start dancing.
‘Wow. So by Saturday al three of us wil be gone,’ Kit comments almost
pensively, looking first at Maya, then at me. ‘It’l just be you and Maya stuck
at home.’
I nod and shrug, struggling to keep the rush of joy from showing on my face.
We don’t have a chance to celebrate until Maya finishes putting Tiffin and
Wila to bed, but as soon as she does, she comes hurrying down to where I am
squatting, Brilo pad in hand, scrubbing out the fridge.
‘We have so earned this!’she whispers in near-hysteria, grabbing me by the
shoulders and giving me an excited shake. Straightening up, I laugh at the
sight of her face, her eyes shining in excitement. I drop the Brilo pad and
wipe my hands on my jeans as she slides her arms around my neck and puls
me gently towards her. Closing my eyes, I kiss her long and hard, stroking the
hair away from her eyes. She reaches up to stroke my face and then puls back
sharply.
‘What?’ I ask in surprise. ‘They’re al upstairs . . .’
‘I heard something.’ She is staring at the kitchen door, carelessly left ajar.
For a brief moment Maya and I look at each other in alarm. Then we
recognize the distant beat of Kit’s music and the sound of Tiffin and Wila
arguing in their room above us. We begin to laugh.
‘Christ, we’re jumpy!’ I exclaim softly.
‘It’l be so great not to have to be like this for a bit,’ Maya breathes. ‘Even if
it’s just for a couple of days. The constant paranoia – worried about even
touching hands!’
‘Two days of freedom,’ I whisper with a smile, puling her close.
As the big day approaches, I find myself counting down the hours. Kit wil set
off for school at the usual time, we’re taking Tiffin and Wila to their friends’
house shortly after. Come ten o’clock Saturday morning, we wil shed our
meaningless labels of brother and sister and be free, finaly free from the ties
that force us apart.
Friday evening, Kit is packed and ready, bags lined up carefuly in the hal.
Everyone is in a hyper mood and I realize we have forgotten to do the weekly
shop and the kitchen is devoid of al food. To my astonishment, Kit volunteers
to go down to the local supermarket and pick up something for dinner.
However, my surprise soon turns to annoyance when he returns with a bag
crammed ful of crisps, biscuits, chocolate bars, sweets and ice cream. But
Maya just laughs. ‘It’s the end of term, we may as wel have a bit of a
celebration!’
Reluctantly I agree and the evening soon turns into mayhem as we picnic on
the carpet in front of the television. Tiffin’s sugar levels go through the roof
and he starts doing somersaults off the couch while Kit tries to provoke a
crash-landing by getting in the way. Wila wants to join in too and I am sure
someone is going to break their neck, but they are laughing so wholeheartedly
at Kit’s karate moves that I refrain from trying to calm them down. Then Kit
has the bright idea of fetching his speakers down from the attic and setting up
a makeshift karaoke machine. Soon we are al squished up on the couch
together, desperately trying to keep a straight face as Wila delivers a
performance of
‘Mamma Mia’, getting al the words mixed up yet singing with such gusto I’m
sure the neighbours are going to come knocking. Kit’s rendition of ‘I Can Be’
is actualy quite impressive despite the foul language, and Tiffin leaps about
the room, bouncing off the wals like a rubber bal.
By ten o’clock an exhausted Wila has passed out fuly-clothed on the couch. I
carry her up to bed while Maya manhandles a sugar-high Tiffin into the
bathroom. I cross Kit in the corridor and stop.
‘Al ready for tomorrow? Got everything you need?’
‘Yep!’ he replies with a note of satisfaction, his eyes bright.
‘Kit, thank you for this evening,’ I say. ‘You were – you were a good sport,
you know.’
For a moment he appears unsure how to respond to such praise. He looks
embarrassed and then smiles. ‘Yeah, wel, watch out. Entertainers usualy
charge for their services, you know.’
I give him a friendly shove and, as he disappears up the ladder, a giant
speaker under each arm, I realize that the five-year age gap between us
doesn’t feel like quite such a chasm any more.
CHAPTER TWENTY-FOUR.
Maya.
Never before have I seen Kit quite so eager to go to school. If only it were
like this every day, I think ruefuly. After devouring his toast in three bites,
downing his juice in two gulps, he grabs his packed lunch from Lochan and
dashes out into the halway to gather up the rest of his things. When he returns
with his bags, I look at him in his new khaki jacket, bought especialy for the
occasion, at odds with the holey jeans he refuses to part with and the torn
sweatshirt several sizes too big, and feel a pang.
His sandy hair is uncombed and he looks pale from too many late nights –
skinny, vulnerable, almost fragile.
‘Did you remember to pack your mobile charger?’ I ask him.
‘Yeah, yeah.’
‘Remember to cal us when you arrive, al right?’ Lochan adds. ‘And, you
know, maybe again at some point during the week, just to let us know how
you’re getting on.’
‘Yeah, yeah. OK.’ He slings the strap of one bag across his chest, the other
onto his shoulder.
‘Have you got the money I gave you?’ Lochan asks.
‘No, I spent it.’
Lochan’s eyes widen.
Kit snorts with laughter. ‘You’re al so gulible!’
‘Very funny. Just don’t spend it on cigarettes or you know you’l get sent
straight home.’
‘Only if I’m caught! Right, I’m off!’ he yels before Lochan can respond,
banging his way down the hal.
‘Bye-bye!’ Wila cals after him. ‘I’l miss you!’
‘Bring me back a present!’ Tiffin yels optimisticaly.
‘Have fun and be good!’ Lochan shouts.
‘And careful!’ I add.
The door slams, shaking the wals. I look at the kitchen clock, catch Lochan’s
eye and laugh. Half past eight: has to be some kind of record. One down, I
think with growing anticipation, two to go.
After a forced breakfast, Tiffin starts bouncing around, saying it doesn’t
matter if we’re early, Freddie won’t mind, we have to go! Wila takes refuge
on my lap, picks at the dried cereal in her bowl and debates whether spending
the whole night at someone else’s house is actualy such a good idea after al.
Especialy given that she doesn’t like the dark, that she sometimes has
nightmares, that Susie might not share her toys, that four blocks away is
actualy quite far if you decide you need to come home in the middle of the
night. Lochan turns from the sink to look at us with an expression of such
horror that I can’t help but laugh.
It doesn’t take me long to remind Wila of the benefits of spending the night
with a friend from school who not only has a garden and a Wendy house, but
also, apparently, a new puppy. Wila perks up and suddenly decides her new
plastic tea-set wil almost certainly come in useful and runs upstairs to add it
to her bag of toys. As soon as she leaves the room, Lochan turns from the
sink, up to his elbows in foam.
‘What if she changes her mind?’ he asks, stricken. ‘She’s never been for a
sleepover before. She could throw a wobbly in the middle of the night or
decide she wants to go home as soon as it gets dark. We’d have to go and pick
her up—’
I laugh. ‘Don’t look so worried, my love! She won’t. Tiffin wil be there, she
adores Susie and there’s a puppy, for chrissakes.’
He shakes his head with a slow smile. ‘You’d better be right. If the phone
rings, I’m unplugging it, I swear to God—’
‘You’d do that to your five-year-old sister?’ I gasp in mock outrage.
‘For one whole night alone? Jesus, Maya, I’d sel her to the gypsies!’
Laughing, I go out to fetch something from the hal table. ‘Guess what I’ve
got.’ Gleefuly I hold out my closed fist.
Lochan gently takes my hand in his. Uncurls my fingers. ‘A key?’
‘Mum’s key. I slipped it off her key-ring when she dropped by last weekend
to pick up some clothes.’
His face lights up. ‘Whoa, smart move!’
‘I know! She’s hardly likely to turn up, but now we know that even if she did,
she wouldn’t be able to get into the house!’
‘Pity we can’t lock her out for ever!’
After dropping the kids off at Freddie’s, I run like I used to when I was a child
– wild and fast and free. My shoes splash through muddy puddles, spattering
my bare legs with dirty spray, and old ladies, hunched under umbrelas, move
hastily aside to let me pass, stopping to turn and stare as I go tearing by. The
bland white sky unleashes hard, thick cords of rain, a freezing wind lashing
the hard spikes against my face, making my skin sting. I am completely
drenched, my coat flapping open, my shirt almost transparent, my hair
dripping down my back. I continue running faster and faster. I feel as if I’m
about to be caught by the wind, lifted up into the air like a kite, and sent
dipping and swirling high above the treetops towards the distant horizon. I
have never felt so alive, so brimming with freedom and joy.
Slamming into the kitchen, I raise my arms in the air. ‘Wow.’ I stare at him,
happiness threatening to burst from me like a stream of effervescent bubbles.
‘I can’t believe it. I literaly can’t believe it. I thought this moment would
never come.’
Lochan starts to laugh.
‘What?’
‘You look like a drowned rat.’
‘Thanks!’
‘Come here!’ He darts towards me around the kitchen table and grabs me by
the wrist. ‘Kiss me!
’
I laugh and tilt my head up as he raises his warm hands to my face.
‘Ugh, you’re freezing.’ He kisses me softly, and then a little harder. I’m aware
of my hair, dripping al over him.
‘Let me get changed then!’
I turn and run upstairs to my room. As I retrieve my towel from beneath the
pile of clothes, Lochan comes in and leaps onto my bed, then turns round to
sit with his knees drawn up, his back to the wal. I rub my hair and dry my
face, then peel off my soaked skirt, grappling with the top button with one
hand, bending over to rummage for a pair of jeans with the other. Unable to
find them, I realize that my button is stuck. With a sigh of annoyance, I stop
and pick at it with my nails.
I’m aware of Lochan getting up from the bed and coming over. ‘Jeez, you’re
even more useless than Tiffin!’
‘It’s because it’s wet! I think this stupid shirt shrank in the rain or something.’
‘Hold on, hold on . . .’ His warm hands brush against mine, tugging gently at
the sodden material.
Shivering, I drop my arms by my sides and feel his fringe tickle my forehead
as he leans towards me, head lowered, breath warm against my neck. His eyes
are narrowed in concentration as, beneath his insistent fingers, the button
finaly starts to loosen. He continues to fiddle with it, his head stil bent, and I
can feel his breath quickening, heat radiating from his cheeks. The top button
comes undone, and without looking up, he starts unfastening the next.
I am standing very stil, acutely aware that neither of us have spoken for
several minutes. A strange hum seems to fil the air like an unspoken thought
hanging between us. Lochan is intent on undoing my shirt but seems to be
having trouble, his hands unsteady. I watch his face carefuly, wondering if we
are sharing the same thought. When he gets to the third button, my shirt flaps
open, revealing the top of my bra. I hear Lochan’s breath quicken as he
continues to work his way downwards in silence, concentrating on his task.
The edge of his hand brushes against the top of my breast; he is undoing the
last button now and I’m aware of the rapid rise and fal of my own chest, the
touch of his fingers through the thin, wet fabric raising gooseflesh al over my
skin. My shirt fals open and he slides it off my shoulders, letting it fal to the
carpet. Reaching for my bra, he suddenly stops, one hand hovering above my
breasts, and from that one moment of hesitation I know.
‘It’s OK,’ I whisper, my voice suddenly weak. ‘I want to.’
His eyes dart nervously to mine, the blood hot in his cheeks, his expression a
mixture of fear and longing. ‘Realy?’
‘Yes!’
Tears and laughter swirl together inside me. I stroke my cheek against his
gently, so gently that his skin feels like the wings of a butterfly. I close my
eyes and move my lips lightly across his face, barely touching, so that my
whole mouth begins to tingle. He closes his eyes too, takes a long deep breath
and lets it out very slowly. My lips folow a path down his neck, into the
holow beneath his colarbone. His fingers tighten around mine and he lets out
a smal gasp. Raising my head, I softly kiss the corner of his mouth before
moving away across his face. His mouth folows mine and I tease him,
refusing to alow our lips to meet, until his breathing quickens and he releases
my hand to cup my cheek and coax my mouth towards his. We finaly start to
kiss – soft, gentle, fluttery kisses. Shivers of pleasure run through my whole
body and his hand trembles against my cheek. His breathing deepens, he
wants to kiss me harder, but I resist, trying to draw this out for as long as I
can. He touches my face, runs his fingers over my cheek, and we continue our
smal, feathery kisses, skin against skin, so warm, so familiar, so gentle, until
he reaches up behind my back and unhooks my bra.
He strokes my breasts with quivering fingers, circling my nipples, sending
nervous shivers of excitement through me. Eyes fixed, brow narrowed in
concentration, he seems to be holding his breath. Then, suddenly he emits a
smal sound, the air exiting his lungs in a rush. Tentatively I reach for the
bottom of his T-shirt. When he doesn’t protest, I pul it gently up and over his
head. As he reappears, hair ruffled, he brushes his fingertips across my skin,
kissing my breasts. I un-button his jeans and he inhales sharply, his body
immediately contracting beneath my touch. His breath is hot, fast and damp
against my cheek and he reaches for my mouth, kissing me harder stil. As he
draws me towards him, a strong tremor runs through his body and into mine.
His arms tightly encircle me, and the warmth of his chest pressed against me
makes me gasp. He is kissing my neck, my shoulders, my nipples, breaking
off to take in smal gulps of air, his hands on my breasts, my stomach, inside
my knickers, pushing them down my legs. I slide them off and step out of
them, then reach for his boxers and pul them down. He kicks them from
around his ankles and then we are standing together, naked together for the
first time in the bright light of day.
How amazing to be together like this with the door open, the window open,
the curtains fluttering in the breeze! The rain clouds have passed and the sun
has come out and everything in my room seems white and bright. Lochan
reaches instinctively for the door handle, and then stops himself, laughing.
And suddenly it’s as if al the laughter and happiness in the world is right here,
right here between us in this room. Our love, our first taste of freedom – even
the sun seems to be beaming down its approval – and I finaly feel that
everything between us is going to be al right. We won’t have to hide for ever:
people wil accept, people wil have to accept. When they see how much we
love each other, when they realize we were always destined to be together,
when they understand how happy we are – how could they possibly reject us?
Al our struggles were so we could reach this point, this exquisite moment –
finaly holding each other, touching each other, kissing each other without fear
of being caught, without guilt or shame – sharing our bodies, our beings,
every part of our souls.
He folows me onto the bed, lying down beside me and continuing to kiss me,
stroking my nipples with his fingertips, licking my neck. I touch his penis but
he puls my hand away, breathing hard.
‘Wait—’ He stares at me, his taut body thrumming against me like a live wire.
‘Maya, are – are you sure?’
I nod slowly, a touch of fear creeping into me. ‘Wil it hurt?’
‘If it hurts, we’l – we’l just stop. Al you have to do is say stop. I’l be realy
careful, I wil, I promise . . .’
I smile at the fervour in his voice. ‘It’s al right. I trust you, Lochie.’
‘But only if you’re sure . . .’ His hands are like vices round my wrists, stil
trying to prevent me from touching him.
I take a deep breath, as if preparing to launch myself into a void. ‘I’m sure.’
Our eyes lock together, sealing a silent agreement with our gaze, and in his
face I see reflected my own fear and longing.
‘Did you remember to get some—?’
‘Yes.’ He raises himself quickly off the bed and disappears from the room.
Moments later, he returns with it in his hand. A panicky flutter rises in my
chest. Without a word, Lochan sits down with his back to me and starts
fiddling with the shiny purple wrapper. Lying against the pilows, I pul the
duvet over me. My heart is slamming against my ribs. I can’t believe we’re
actualy going to do this. I watch the smooth, white curve of his spine, the
sharp angles of his shoulder blades, his ribcage rapidly expanding and
contracting, the muscles in his arms tightening as his hands fumble between
his legs. I notice that he is trembling.
Finaly he turns back towards me, his breathing shalow and rapid. I lean in for
a kiss and we lie back down on the bed, his mouth fierce and urgent against
mine. This time he is on top of me, propped up on his elbows, rubbing his
face against my cheek. I run my hands up and down his stomach and feel him
shudder. Tentatively I move my legs apart and draw up my knees. I feel it
prod my thigh.
‘Further up,’ I whisper.
He has stopped kissing me now, his face inches above mine, concentration
etched between his brows as he shifts slightly, trying to find the right place.
After several near misses, he leans over to one side and reaches down to try
and guide it in. His hand knocks against my leg. ‘Help me,’ he whispers.
I reach down and, after what seems an eternity, get it to the right place. I
withdraw my hand and immediately feel myself tense. Lochan presses against
me; I wince in anticipation: this is never going to fit. For a moment nothing
happens. Then I feel him begin to push his way inside me.
I inhale sharply. Lochan’s face hovers above mine, staring down at me, his
breath rapid and laboured. His eyes are wide, green irises flecked with blue. I
can make out each individual eyelash, the cracks in his lips, the sweat beading
on his forehead. And I can feel him inside me, his body trembling with the
desire to go further.
‘Are you al right?’ he asks shakily.
I nod.
‘Can – can I keep going?’
Another nod. It hurts, but that’s not important right now. I want him, want to
hold him, want to feel him inside me. He begins to push further. A sharp stab
makes me flinch, but then suddenly he is al the way in. We are as close as two
people can be. Two bodies, blended into one . . .
Lochan is stil staring down at me, an urgent look in his eyes, emitting ragged
little gasps. He begins to move slowly back and forth, his elbows sunk into
the mattress, clutching at the sheet on either side of my head.
‘Kiss me,’ I breathe.
He lowers his face towards mine, lips brushing my cheek, my nose, then
slowly making their way towards my mouth. He kisses me gently, very gently,
breathing hard now. The pain between my legs starts to fade as he continues
to move inside me, and I feel another sensation, one that makes my whole
body quiver. I run the backs of my hands gently down his chest and stomach,
into the depressions between his hips and then up the sides, urging him with
my hands to move a little faster.
He does, pressing his lips together and holding his breath, the flush on his
face deepening, spreading down to his neck and across his chest. Sweat
glistens on his forehead and cheeks, a smal drop running down his face, then
faling onto mine. As he moves, his fringe brushes against my forehead. I hear
the sound of my own breath, smal puffs of air escaping my mouth, mingling
with his. I never want this to stop: this fear mixed with ecstasy, my whole
being humming with longing, the press of his body against mine. The feel of
him inside me, moving against me, making me shiver with excitement. I tilt
my head up for another kiss and his lips descend over mine, harder this time.
Scrunching up his eyes, he breaks away and holds his breath for a few
seconds, then lets it out in a rush. Suddenly he opens his eyes again, his look
desperate and urgent.
‘It’s OK,’ I reassure him quickly.
‘I can’t—’ The words catch in his throat and I feel him tremble against me.
‘That’s OK!’
With a smal gasp, his movements begin to quicken. ‘Sorry!’
I feel him twitch inside me, his pelvic bone digging into mine. Suddenly he
seems locked in his own world. He closes his eyes and his jagged gasps tear
at the air, his body growing tighter and tighter, his hands tearing at the sheets.
Then, with a deep, sharp inhalation, he presses himself hard into me, again
and again, shuddering violently with a series of smal, wild sounds.
Once he is stil, the ful weight of his body presses down on me and he colapses
against my neck.
He is holding me very tightly, his arms pressing against mine, his fingers
digging into my shoulders, his body stil twitching. Exhaling slowly into the
cool air of the room, I run my hand over his damp hair, across his neck and
down his back, feeling his heart pound violently against my own. I kiss his
shoulder, the only part of him I can reach, and stare up in astonishment at the
familiar faded blue ceiling.
Reality has been altered, or at least my perception of it has dramaticaly
changed. Everything feels different, looks different . . . For a few moments I
am not even sure who I am any more. This boy, this man, lying in my arms
has become a part of me. We have a new identity together: two parts of a
whole. In the last few minutes, everything between us changed for ever. I saw
Lochie as no one had ever seen him, felt him inside me, sensed him at his
most vulnerable, opened myself up to him in turn.
In those few minutes I took him inside me, became a part of him, as close as
two separate beings could ever be.
He slowly raises his head from my shoulder and looks down at me with a
worried gaze. ‘Are you OK?’ he pants softly.
I nod, smiling. ‘Yes.’
He heaves a sigh of relief and presses his mouth against my neck, the sweat
running between us.
He kisses me between ragged breaths, and when I catch sight of the wild,
flushed look on his face, I begin to laugh. Gazing down at me, he starts
laughing too, and his whole being seems to radiate joy.
And al at once I think – This whole time, my whole life, that harsh, stony path
was leading up to this one point. I followed it blindly, stumbling along the
way, scraped and weary, without any idea of where it was leading, without
ever realizing that with every step I was approaching the light at the end of a
very long, dark tunnel. And now that I’ve reached it, now that I’m here, I
want to catch it in my hand, hold onto it for ever to look back on – the point at
which my new life really began. Everything I ever wanted, right here, right
now, all captured in this one moment. The laughter, the joy, the enormity of
the love between us. This is the dawn of happiness. It all begins now.
Then, from the doorway, comes a shattering scream.
CHAPTER TWENTY-FIVE.
Lochan.
Never in my life have I heard such a terrible sound. A scream of pure horror,
of undiluted hatred and fury and rage. And it keeps coming, rising louder and
louder, closer and closer, blocking out the sun, sucking out everything: the
love, the warmth, the music, the joy. Tearing at the briliant light al around us,
slashing against our naked bodies, ripping the smile from our faces, the breath
from our lungs.
Maya grabs hold of me in horror, arms wrapped around me, gripping me tight,
face pressed against my chest, as if imploring her body to merge into mine.
For a moment I cannot react, simply clutching her to me, intent only on
protecting her, shielding her body with my own. Then I hear the sobs – the
shrieking, hysterical sobs, the screeching accusations, the demented wails. I
force my head up and see, framed in the open door, our mother.
As soon as her horrified eyes make contact with mine, she launches herself at
us, grabbing me by the hair and yanking back my head with astonishing force.
Her fists pound against me, her long nails cutting into my arms, my shoulders,
my back. I don’t even try to push her off. My arms circle Maya’s head, my
body presses down over hers, acting as a human shield between her and this
madwoman, desperately trying to protect her from the attack.
Maya cries out in terror beneath me, trying to bury herself in the mattress,
puling me down against her with al her might. But then the shrieks begin to
coalesce into words, perforating my frozen brain, and I hear: ‘Get off her! Get
off her! You monster! You evil, twisted monster! Get off my baby! Get off!
Get off! Get off!’
I wil not move, wil not let go of Maya even as I continue to be yanked by the
hair and half dragged from the bed. Maya, suddenly realizing that the intruder
is our mother, starts struggling to free herself from my grasp.
‘No! Mum! Leave him! Leave him! He didn’t do anything! What are you
doing? You’re hurting him! Don’t hurt him! Don’t hurt him! Don’t hurt him!’
She is screaming at her now, sobbing in terror, puling herself out from
beneath me, trying to reach over and fight Mum off, but I won’t let them
touch, won’t let the monster reach her. When I see a clawed hand descend
towards Maya’s face, I swing my arm wildly, making contact with Mum’s
shoulder. She staggers back and there is a thud, the sound of books tumbling
from shelves, and she is gone, her wails echoing al the way down to the floor
below.
I leap from the bed, hurl myself at the bedroom door and slam it shut,
shooting the bolt across.
‘Quick!’ I yel at Maya, grabbing knickers and T-shirt from her clothes pile
and tossing them over.
‘Put them on. She’l come back with Dave or someone. The lock’s not strong
enough—’
Maya is sitting in the middle of the bed, sheet clutched to her chest, hair wild
and tangled, face white with shock and wet with tears.
‘She can’t do anything to us,’she says desperately, her voice rising. ‘She can’t
do anything, she can’t do anything!’
‘It’s al right, Maya. It’s al right, it’s al right. Just please put these on. She’s
going to be back!’
I can only find my underwear – the rest of my stuff must be buried beneath
the heap of falen books.
Maya puls on her clothes, leaps up and runs over to the open window. ‘We
can climb out,’she gasps. ‘We can jump—’
I yank her back, forcing her to sit down on the bed. ‘Listen to me. We can’t
run away – they’d catch us anyway, and think, Maya, think! What about the
others? We can’t just abandon them. We’re going to wait here, OK? No one’s
going to hurt you, I promise. Mum’s just being hysterical. And she wasn’t
trying to attack you, she was trying to rescue you. From me.’ I am fighting for
breath.
‘I don’t care!’ Maya is shouting again, tears coursing down her cheeks. ‘Look
what she did to you, Lochie! Your back is bleeding! I can’t believe she hurt
you like that! She was puling out your hair! She – she—’
‘Shh, sweetheart, shh . . .’ Turning to face her on the edge of the bed, I clasp
the tops of her arms in an attempt to hold her stil. ‘Maya, you’ve got to calm
down. You’ve got to listen to me. No one’s going to hurt us, d’you
understand? They just want to rescue you—’
‘From what?’she sobs. ‘From who? They can’t take me away from you! They
can’t, Lochie, they can’t!’
More yeling. We both freeze at the sound, this time coming from the street. I
am the first to reach the window. Mum is pacing up and down in front of the
house, shouting and screaming into her mobile phone.
‘You’ve got to come now!’she’s sobbing. ‘Oh God, please hurry! He’s
already punched me, and now he’s bolted himself in with her! When I went
in, he tried to suffocate her! I think he’s going to kil her!’
Curious neighbours are popping their heads out of windows and doors, some
already hurrying across the street towards her. I feel myself break out in a
cold sweat and my legs threaten to give way.
‘She’s caling Dave,’ Maya shouts, trying to pul away as I drag her from the
window. ‘He’s going to break the door down. He’s going to beat you up! I’ve
got to go down and explain everything! I’ve got to tel them you haven’t done
anything wrong!’
‘Don’t, Maya, don’t. You can’t! It won’t make any difference! You have to
stay here and listen. I have to talk to you.’
Suddenly I know what I must do. I know that there is only one solution, only
one way left to save Maya and the kids from harm. But she won’t listen,
struggling and kicking her bare feet against my legs as I lock my arms around
her to stop her from running to the door. I force her back down on the edge of
the bed, pinning her against me.
‘Maya, you have to listen. I – I think I have a plan, but you’ve got to listen or
it won’t work.
Please, sweetheart. I’m begging you!’
Maya stops struggling. ‘OK, Lochie, OK,’she whimpers. ‘Tel me, I’m
listening. I’l do it. I’l do whatever you want.’
Stil gripping her, I stare at her terrified, wild-eyed face and breathe deeply in
a frantic effort to organize my thoughts, calm myself, hold back the mounting
tears that wil only terrify her further. I tighten my grip on her wrists and
prepare to grab her should she make a run for the door.
‘Mum isn’t caling Dave,’ I explain, my voice shaking hard. ‘She’s caling the
police.’
Maya freezes, her blue eyes wide with shock. Tears hang on her lashes, the
colour is gone from her face. The silence in the room is broken only by her
frantic gasps.
‘It’s al right,’ I say firmly, struggling to keep my voice steady. ‘In fact it’s a
good thing. The police wil sort this out. They’l calm Mum down. They’l take
me away for questioning, but it wil only be—’
‘But it’s against the law.’ Maya’s voice is quiet with horror. ‘What just
happened. We’l be arrested because we’ve broken the law.’
I take another deep breath, my lungs cracking under the strain, my throat
threatening to close up completely. If I break down, it’s al over. I’l frighten
her so much she’l stop listening to me and wil never agree to what I’m about
to suggest. I have to convince her that this is the best way, the only way.
‘Maya, you’ve got to listen, we have to go through this fast, they could be
here any minute.’ I stop to catch my breath again. Despite the terror in her
eyes, she just nods, waiting for me to continue.
‘OK. First you’ve got to remember that being arrested does not mean going to
prison. We won’t be going to prison because we’re only teenagers. But listen
to me now: this is very, very important. If we both get arrested, we’l be kept
in for questioning. That could take a few days. Wila and Tiffin wil come back
to find us gone. Mum wil probably be drunk, and even if she’s not, Social
Services wil be caled in by the police and al three kids wil be taken away
because of what we’ve done. Just imagine Wila, imagine Tiffin, imagine how
terrified they’l be. Wila was worried—’ My voice quavers and I break off for
a moment. ‘W-Wila was worried about spending just one night away!’ Tears
force their way into my eyes like knives. ‘D’you understand? D’you
understand what wil happen to them if we both get arrested?’
Maya shakes her head at me in silent horror, mute with shock, fresh tears
filing her eyes.
‘There is a way,’ I carry on desperately. ‘There’s a way we can prevent al that.
They won’t take them away if there’s one of us here to look after them and
cover for Mum. D’you get it, Maya?’ My voice begins to rise. ‘One of us has
to stay. It has to be you—’
‘No!’ Maya’s cry slices straight through my heart. I tighten my grip on her
wrists as she begins to pul away. ‘No! No!’
‘Maya, if they’re taken away by Social Services, neither of us wil ever see
them again until they’re adults! They’l be scarred for life! If you let me go,
there’s a good chance I’l be out in a few days.’ I stare at her, desperately
hoping she trusts me enough to believe this lie.
‘You stay!’ Maya looks at me, her eyes imploring. ‘You stay and I’ll go! I’m
not scared. Please, Lochie. Let’s do it that way!’
I shake my head in desperation. ‘It won’t work!’ I say franticaly. ‘Remember
that conversation we had a few weeks ago? No one wil believe us if we say it
was you who forced me. And if we tel them it was consensual, they’l arrest us
both! We have to do it like this. Don’t you understand?
Think, Maya, think! You know there are no other options! If one of us is to
stay behind, it has to be you!’
Maya’s whole body crumples forward as the reality hits her. She fals towards
me but I cannot take her in my arms, not yet.
‘Please, Maya,’ I beg her. ‘Tel me you’l do it. Tel me now, right now.
Otherwise I’l go crazy not knowing – not knowing whether you and the others
are safe or not. I won’t be able to take it. You’ve got to do it. For me. For us.
It’s our only chance to ever be together as a family again.’
She hangs her head, her beautiful amber hair hiding her face from view.
‘Maya—’ A frantic sound escapes me and I give her a shake. ‘Maya!’
She nods silently, without looking up.
‘You’l do it?’ I ask.
‘I’l do it,’she whispers.
Several minutes pass and she doesn’t move. With shaky hands, I wipe the
sweat from my face.
Then, suddenly, Maya raises her head with a strangled sob and holds out her
arms for comfort. I can’t do it. I simply can’t. With a sharp shake of the head,
I move away from her, straining my ears for the sound of a siren. A low
murmur of voices rises from beneath us – no doubt concerned neighbours,
rushing in to comfort our mother. Denied the hug she so desperately needs,
Maya seeks comfort instead from a pilow drawn up against her chest.
Rocking back and forth, she appears to be in a state of complete shock.
‘There’s one more thing . . .’ I turn to her, realizing suddenly. ‘We – we have
to get our stories straight. Otherwise they’l hold me for longer and you’l be
puled in repeatedly for questioning and things wil get much worse—’
Maya closes her eyes as if to shut me out.
‘We haven’t got time to make anything up,’ I say, my voice catching on every
word. ‘We’l – we’l just have to tel it exactly how it was. E-everything that
happened, how it first started, how long it’s been . . . If our stories don’t
match up they could arrest you too. So you’ve got to tel the truth, Maya,
d’you understand? Everything – every detail they ask you for!’ I take a frantic
breath. ‘The only thing we’re going to add is that – is that I forced you. I
forced you into everything we did, Maya. D’you hear me?’
I’m losing control again, the words shaking like the air around me. ‘The first
time we kissed, I said you had to go along with it, or – or I’d beat you. I
swore that if you told anyone, I’d kil you. You were terrified. You realy
believed I was capable of it, and so from then on, every time I – I wanted you,
you – you just did what I asked.’
She looks up at me in horror, silent tears spiling down her cheeks. ‘They’l
send you to prison!’
‘No.’ I shake my head, struggling to sound as convincing as possible. ‘You’l
simply say you don’t want to press charges. If there’s no accuser, there’l be no
court case. I’l be out in a few days!’ I stare at her, silently imploring her to
believe me.
She frowns and shakes her head slowly, as if desperately trying to
comprehend. ‘But that doesn’t make sense . . .’
‘Trust me.’ I’m breathing too fast. ‘Most sexual abuse cases are never taken to
court because the victims are too afraid or ashamed to press charges. So you’l
just say you don’t want to press charges, either . . . But, Maya’ – I reach out
and grip her arm – ‘you must never, ever say this was consensual. You must
never, ever admit to taking part in this freely. I forced you. Whatever they ask,
whatever they say, I threatened you. D’you understand?’
A stunned nod.
Unconvinced, I grab her roughly by the arms. ‘I don’t believe you! Tel me
what happened! What did I do to you?’
She looks up at me, bottom lip quivering, eyes glistening. ‘You raped me,’she
replies, and presses her hands to her mouth to muffle a scream.
We huddle together beneath the duvet one last time. She is curled in towards
me, cheek resting against my chest, shaking in shock. I hold her tight, staring
up at the ceiling, terrified I wil start crying, terrified she wil see just how
afraid I am, terrified she wil suddenly realize that even though she won’t press
charges, there’s someone else who wil.
‘I d-don’t understand,’ Maya gasps. ‘How could this happen? Why did Mum
come back today of al days? How the hel did she get in without her key?’
I’m too stressed to even think about that, or care. The only thing that matters
is that we’ve been caught. Reported to the police. I never realy thought it
could actualy come to this.
‘It must have been a neighbour. We weren’t careful enough with the curtains.’
Maya shakes with a silent sob. ‘You’ve stil got time. Lochie, I just don’t
understand! Why won’t you run?’ Her voice rises in anguish.
Because then I won’t be around to tell my version of the story. The version I
want the police to hear. The version that absolves you of all wrongdoing. If I
run, they could arrest you instead. And if we both go, we expose ourselves as
accomplices and it’s all over.
I say nothing, just hold her tighter in the hope that she wil trust me.
The sound of the siren makes us both start. Maya jack-knifes from the bed
and tries to leap for the door. I force her back and she starts to cry.
‘No, Lochie, no! Please! Let me go downstairs and explain. It looks so much
worse like this!’
I need it to look worse. I need it to look as bad as it can. From now on I have
to think like a rapist, act like a rapist. Prove I’ve been holding Maya against
her wil.
Sounds of slamming car doors rise from the street below. Mum’s hysterical
voice starts up again.
The front door bangs. Heavy treads in the halway. Maya screws up her eyes
and clings to me, sobbing silently.
‘It’l be al right,’ I whisper desperately in her ear. ‘This is just protocol. They’l
only arrest me so they can question me. When you tel them you don’t want to
press charges, they’l just let me go.’
I hold her tight, stroking her hair, hoping that one day she’l understand, that
one day she’l forgive me for lying. Careful not to think, careful not to panic,
careful not to waver. Loud voices from below, Mum’s mainly. The sound of
multiple footsteps on the stairs.
‘Let go of me,’ I whisper urgently.
She doesn’t respond, stil pressed up against me, her head buried against my
shoulder, arms wound tightly around my neck.
‘Maya, let go of me, now!’ I try to unhook her arms. She won’t let go. She
won’t let go!
The thuds against the door make us both start violently. The noise is folowed
by a sharp, authoritative voice: ‘This is the police. Open the door.’
I’m sorry, but I’ve just raped my sister and am holding her here against her
will. I cannot be so obliging.
They give me a warning. Then the first strike is heard. Maya lets out a
terrified scream. She stil won’t let go of me. It’s vital I turn her round so that
when they get in, they find me grasping her with her back to me, arms pinned
by her sides. Another crack. The wood around the bolt splinters. Just one
more strike and they wil be in.
I push Maya away from me with al my strength. I look into her eyes – her
beautiful blue eyes –
and feel the tears surge. ‘I love you,’ I whisper. ‘I’m so sorry!’ Then I raise
my right hand and strike her hard across the face.
Her scream fils the room seconds before the lock breaks and the door crashes
open. The doorway is suddenly crowded with dark uniforms and crackling
radios. My arm circles Maya’s arms and waist, pinning her back against me.
Beneath the hand clapped over her mouth, I feel a reassuring trickle of blood.
When they order me to let go of her and step away from the bed, I cannot
move. I need to co-operate, but physicaly I can’t. I am frozen in fear. I am
terrified that if I uncover Maya’s mouth, she wil start to tel them the truth. I’m
terrified that once they take Maya away, I wil never see her again.
They ask me to put my hands up. I begin to loosen my grip on Maya. No, I’m
screaming inside.
Don’t leave me, don’t go! You are my love, my life! Without you, I am
nothing, I have nothing. If I lose you, I lose everything. I raise my hands very
slowly, fighting to keep them in the air, fighting against the overwhelming
urge to take Maya back into my arms, kiss her one last time. A female officer
cautiously approaches as if Maya were a wild animal, about to take flight, and
coaxes her out of the bed. She lets out a smal, muffled sob, but I hear her take
a deep breath and hold it. Someone wraps a blanket around her. They are
trying to usher her from the room.
‘No!’she screams. Bursting into a sudden voley of broken sobs, she turns
franticaly back towards me, blood staining her lower lip. Lips that once
touched me so gently, lips I know so wel, love so much, lips I could never
have imagined hurting. But now, with her cut lip and tear-stained face, she
looks so shocked and battered that even if she were to lose her resolve and tel
the truth, I’m almost confident she would not be believed. Her eyes meet
mine, but under the officers’ watchful gaze I’m unable to give her the slightest
sign of reassurance. Go, my love, I beg her with my gaze. Follow the plan. Do
this. Do this for me.
As she turns, her face crumples and I fight against the urge to cry out her
name.
As soon as Maya is out of the way, the two male officers descend upon me.
Each grabbing me by an arm, they instruct me to stand up slowly. I do so,
tensing every muscle and clenching my teeth in an effort to stop shaking. A
thick-set officer with smal eyes and a puffy face smirks as I get up from the
bed and the sheet fals away and I’m left standing in my boxers. ‘Don’t think
we need to frisk this one,’ he chuckles.
I can hear the sound of Maya crying downstairs. ‘What are they going to do to
him? What are they going to do to him?’she keeps shouting.
The reply is repeated over and over by a soothing female voice. ‘Don’t worry.
You’re safe now.
He won’t be able to hurt you again.’
‘Have you got some clothes?’ the other officer asks me. He looks not much
older than me. How long has he been in the police force? I wonder. Has he
ever been involved in a crime as disgusting as this?
‘In my b-bedroom . . .’
The young officer folows me to my room and watches me get dressed, his
radio sputtering into the silence. I feel his eyes on my back, on my body, ful
of disgust. I can’t seem to find anything clean.
For some irrational reason, I feel the need to wear something that’s freshly
washed. The only thing to hand is my school uniform. I sense the man’s
impatience in the doorway behind me but I am so desperate to cover my body
that I can’t even think straight, can’t remember where I keep my things.
Finaly I pul on a T-shirt and jeans, shoving my bare feet into my trainers
before realizing that my Tshirt is inside out.
The bulky officer joins us in the room. They seem far too big for this confined
space. I’m painfuly aware of my unmade bed, the socks and underwear that
litter the carpet. The broken curtain rail, the old chipped desk, the peeling
wals. I feel ashamed of it al. I glance at the smal family snapshot stil tacked to
the wal above my bed, and suddenly wish I could take it with me. Something,
anything, to remind me of them al.
The older officer asks me some basic questions: name, date of birth,
nationality . . . My voice stil manages to shake despite al my efforts to keep it
steady. The more I try not to stammer, the worse it gets. When my mind goes
blank and I can’t even remember my own birthday, they stare me down, as if
they think I’m deliberately withholding this information. I strain for the sound
of Maya’s voice but can hear nothing. What have they done to her? Where
have they taken her?
‘Lochan Whitely,’ the officer states in a flat, mechanical tone. ‘An alegation
has been made to the police that you raped your sixteen-year-old sister a short
time ago. I am arresting you for breach of Section Twenty-five of the Sexual
Offences Act for engaging in sexual activity with a child family member.’
The accusation hits me like a fist in my stomach. This makes me sound like
more than a rapist: a paedophile. And Maya, a child? She hasn’t been one for
years. And she isn’t below the age of consent! But of course, I realize
suddenly, even just two weeks shy of her seventeenth birthday, she is stil
considered a child in the eyes of the law. At eighteen, however, I am an adult.
Thirteen months.
Might as wel be thirteen years . . . The officer is now reading me my rights.
‘You do not have to say anything. But it may harm your defence if you do not
mention when questioned something which you later rely on in Court.
Anything you do say may be given in evidence.’ His voice is deliberate,
heavy with authority; his face a mask – blank, cold, devoid of al expression.
But this is not some cop show.
This is real. I have committed a real crime.
The young officer informs me they wil now take me outside to the ‘transport
vehicle’. The corridor is too narrow for the three of us. The big officer leads
the way, his tread heavy and slow. The other grips me tightly just above the
elbow. I’ve been able to hide the fear until now, but as we approach the
staircase, I suddenly feel a surge of panic begin to rise. Stupidly, it’s triggered
by nothing more than the need to pee. But suddenly I realize I’m desperate to
go and have no idea when I’m next going to get the chance. After hours of
questioning, locked up in some cel, in front of a whole bunch of other
prisoners? I stumble to a halt at the top of the stairs.
‘Keep moving!’ I feel the press of a firm hand between my shoulder blades.
‘Can I – can I please just use the bathroom before I go?’ My voice comes out
frightened and frantic. I feel my face burn, and as soon as the words are out of
my mouth, I wish I could take them back. I sound pathetic.
They exchange glances. The thick-set man sighs and nods. They let me into
the bathroom. The younger officer stays in the open doorway.
The cuffs don’t make it easy. I feel the man’s presence fil the smal room.
Shuffling round so I have my back to him, I struggle to unbutton my jeans.
Sweat prickles across my neck and down my back, trapping the T-shirt
against my skin. The muscles in my knees seem to vibrate. I close my eyes
and try to relax, but I need to go so badly it’s impossible. I can’t. I just can’t.
Not like this.
‘We haven’t got al day.’ The voice behind me makes me flinch. I button up
and flush the empty toilet. Turning round, I’m too embarrassed to even raise
my head.
As we jolt and shuffle our way down the narrow stairs, the young officer says
in a gentler tone,
‘The station’s not far. You’l have some privacy there.’
His words throw me. A smal hint of kindness, a note of reassurance, despite
the terrible thing I’ve done. I feel my façade begin to slip. Breathing deeply, I
bite my lip hard. Just in case Maya sees me, it’s imperative I make it out of
the house without faling apart.
Voices rise and fal from the kitchen. The door is firmly shut. So that’s where
they’ve taken her. I hope to God they are stil treating her as the victim,
comforting her rather than bombarding her with questions. I have to grit my
teeth, clench every muscle in my body to prevent myself from running to her,
hugging her, kissing her one last time.
I notice a pink skipping rope hanging over the banisters. A single Jely Baby
from last night remains on the carpet. Smal shoes are scattered over the rack
by the front door. Wila’s white sandals, and the lace-up trainers she has finaly
learned to tie – al so tiny. Tiffin’s scuffed school shoes, his much-prized
footbal boots, his gloves and ‘lucky’ bal. Above them their school blazers
hang discarded, empty, like ghosts of their real selves. I want them back, I
want my children back. I miss them, the pain like a hole in my heart. They
were so excited to go that I didn’t even have time to hug them. I never got to
say goodbye.
Just as I am being jolted past the open door of the front room, a movement
catches my eye and makes me stop. I turn my head towards a figure in the
armchair and, to my astonishment, find Kit. He is sitting, white-faced and
immobile, beside a woman police officer, his carefuly packed Isle of Wight
bags lying carelessly discarded at his feet. As he slowly turns towards me, I
stare at him, uncomprehending. I am pushed from behind, told to ‘move it’. I
stumble against the door-frame, my eyes begging Kit for some kind of
explanation.
‘Why are you here?’ I can’t believe he is witnessing this. I can’t believe they
somehow got hold of him before he left, involving him too. He’s only
thirteen, for chrissakes! I want to scream. He should be on the trip of his life,
not watching his brother being arrested for sexualy abusing his sister. I want
to kick at them in fury, force them to let him go.
His eyes leave my face, traveling down to the cuffs circling my wrists, then to
the police officers trying to drag me away. His face is white, stricken.
‘You told him!’ he shouts suddenly, making me jump.
I stare at him, stunned. ‘What?’
‘Coach Wilson! You told him about the heights thing!’ Suddenly he is
screaming at me, his face distorted with fury. ‘As soon as I got to school, he
took me off the abseiling list in front of the whole class! Everyone laughed at
me, even my friends! You ruined what was going to be the best week of my
life!’
Forcing myself to keep breathing, I feel my heart start to pound. ‘It was you?’
I gasp. ‘You knew? About Maya and me? You knew?’
He nods wordlessly.
‘Mr Whitely, you need to come with us right now!’
The comment about Maya and me being left home alone, the sound of the
door while we were kissing in the kitchen . . . Why on earth didn’t he confront
us? Why wait until now before teling?
Because he didn’t want to be taken into care. Because he never intended to
tel.
For some strange reason I am desperate for him to know I never asked him to
be taken off the abseiling list, never dreamed he might be humiliated in front
of his friends, never meant to ruin his first ever trip, the most exciting day of
his life. But the officers are shouting at me, pushing me out of the front door
with considerable force now, banging my shoulders against the wals, dragging
me towards the waiting police car. I twist and turn my head, franticaly trying
to cal back to him over my shoulder.
The neighbours have come out in ful force, congregating en masse around the
waiting police car, watching with fascination as I am pushed down into the
back seat. The belt is drawn across me and the door beside me slams. The
large officer gets into the front, his radio stil crepitating, the younger one gets
into the back, beside me. The neighbours are closing in now like a slow wave,
leaning, peering, pointing, their mouths opening and closing with silent
questions.
Suddenly there is a violent thud against the door at my side. I whip my head
round in time to see Kit, pummeling franticaly at the window.
‘I’m sorry!’ he screams, the sound heavily muffled by the reinforced glass.
‘Lochie, I’m sorry, I’m sorry, I’m sorry! I didn’t think about what would
happen – I never thought she’d cal the police!’ He is crying hard, in a way he
hasn’t done for years, tears lashing his cheeks. His body convulses with
violent sobs as he punches at the window in a frenzied bid to free me. ‘Come
back!’ he screams.
‘Come back!’
I wrestle with the locked door, desperate to tel him it’s OK, that I wil be back
soon – even though I am wel aware this isn’t true. More than anything
though, I want to tel him it’s OK, that I know he never intended for it to come
to this, that I understand he simply lashed out in hurt and anger and bitter,
bitter disappointment. I want to let him know that of course I forgive him, that
absolutely none of this was his fault, that I love him, that I always have,
despite everything . . .
A neighbour drags him off and the car begins to pul away from the kerb. As
we pick up speed, I turn my head for one last look and, through the back
window, see Kit sprinting after us, his long legs pummeling the pavement, the
familiar look of single-minded determination on his face – the same
determination he showed during al those footbal, catch, and British Buldog
games we used to play . .
. Somehow he keeps pace with the car until we reach the end of the narrow
street, until we accelerate out onto the main road. Franticaly craning my head
to keep him in sight, I see him finaly stumble to a halt, his hands by his sides:
defeated, crying.
You don’t let Kit lose! I want to shout at the officers. You never let any of
them lose! Even when giving them a run for their money, you always, always
let them catch you in the end.
He stands there, staring at the car as if wiling us back, and I watch him
rapidly shrink as the space between us grows. Soon my little brother is just a
tiny speck in the distance – and then I can no longer see him at al.
CHAPTER TWENTY-SIX.
Lochan.
We stop in a large car park ful of different kinds of police vehicles. Once
again I am taken firmly by the arm and puled out. Pain from my bladder
makes me wince as I stand, the breeze against my bare arms causing me to
shiver. After crossing the tarmac, I am led through some kind of back
entrance, along a short corridor and through a door labeled CHARGE ROOM.
Another uniformed officer sits behind a tal desk. The two officers at my side
address him as Sergeant and inform him of my offence, but to my great relief
he barely looks at me, mechanicaly tapping my details into his computer. The
charge is read out to me yet again, but when I am asked if I understand it, my
nod is not accepted. The question is repeated and I’m forced to use my voice.
‘Yes.’ This time I only manage a whisper. Away from the house and the
danger of further upsetting Maya, I can feel myself losing strength:
succumbing to the shock, the horror, the blind panic of the situation.
More questions folow. Again I am asked to repeat my name, address, date of
birth. I struggle to reply, my brain seems to be slowly shutting down. When
asked my occupation, I hesitate. ‘I – I don’t have one.’
‘Are you on unemployment benefit?’
‘No. I’m – I’m stil at school.’
The sergeant looks up at me then. My face burns beneath his penetrating gaze.
Questions about my health folow, and my mental state is also questioned – no
doubt they think only a psychopath would be capable of such a crime. I’m
asked if I want a solicitor and respond immediately with a shake of the head.
The last thing I need is someone else to be involved, to hear about al the
terrible things I’ve done. Anyway, I am trying to prove my guilt, not my
innocence.
After being uncuffed, I am told to hand over my possessions. Fortunately I
have none and feel relieved I didn’t take the photo from my room. Perhaps
Maya wil remember it and keep it safe. But I can’t help hoping she’l cut off
the two adults at either end of the bench and just keep the five children
sandwiched in the middle. Because, ultimately, that was the family we
became. In the end we were the ones who loved each other, who struggled
and fought to stay together. And it was enough, more than enough.
They ask me to empty my pockets, remove the laces from my shoes. Again
the tremor in my hands betrays me, and as I kneel between the suited legs on
the dirty lino, I sense the officers’
impatience, their contempt. The shoelaces are placed in an envelope and I
have to sign for them, which strikes me as absurd. A body search folows, and
at the touch of the officer’s hands running over me, up and down my legs, I
start to shake violently, holding onto the edge of the desk to steady myself.
In a smal anteroom, I am seated on a chair: my photo is taken, a cotton swab
scraped around the inside of my mouth. As my fingers are pressed one by one
against an ink pad and then down onto a marked piece of card, I am overcome
by a feeling of complete detachment. I am a mere object to these people. I am
barely human any more.
I am thankful when I am finaly pushed into a cel and the heavy door slams
shut behind me. To my relief it is empty: smal and claustrophobic, containing
nothing more than a narrow bed built into the wal. There is a barred window
near the ceiling, but the light that fils the room is purely artificial, harsh and
over-bright. Graffiti and what looks like faeces smear the wals. The stench is
foul – far worse than the most disgusting of public urinals – and I have to
breathe through my mouth to avoid gagging.
It takes me for ever to relax enough to empty my bladder into the metal toilet.
Now, finaly away from their watchful eyes, I cannot stop trembling. I fear that
an officer wil burst in at any moment, am acutely aware of the smal window
in the door, the flap just beneath it. How do I know I am not being watched
right this minute? Normaly I am not this prudish, but after being puled out of
bed in my underwear, frogmarched semi-naked to my bedroom by two
policemen, forced to dress in front of them, I wish there was some way of
covering myself up for ever. Ever since hearing the horrific charge, I have
been feeling acutely ashamed of my whole body, of what it has done – of
what others believe it has done.
Flushing the toilet, I return to the thick metal door and press my ear against it.
Shouts echo down the corridor, drunken swearing, a wail that goes on and on,
but they seem to be coming from some way away. If I keep my back to the
door, then even if an officer peers at me through the window, at least he won’t
be able to see my face.
No sooner have I ascertained that I finaly have some degree of privacy than
the safety valve in my mind that had kept me functioning until now opens, as
if by force, and the images and memories flood in. I make a sudden dash for
the bed, but my knees give way before I reach it. I sink down on the concrete
floor and dig my nails into the thick plastic sheet sewn onto the mattress. I pul
at it so violently, I’m scared it might rip. Doubling over, I press my face hard
against the stinking bed, muffling my nose and mouth as much as I can. The
gut-wrenching sobs tear at my whole body, threatening to split me apart with
their force. The whole mattress shakes, my ribcage shuddering against the
hard bed-frame, and I am choking, suffocating, depriving myself of oxygen
but unable to raise my head to draw breath for fear of making a sound. Crying
has never hurt so much. I want to crawl under the bed in case someone looks
in and sees me like this, but the space is far too smal. I cannot even remove
the bed-sheet in order to cover myself – there is simply nowhere to hide.
I hear Kit’s anguished cries, see his fists pound against the window, his skinny
frame racing to keep up with the car, his whole body crumpling as he realizes
he is powerless to rescue me. I think of Tiffin and Wila playing at Freddie’s,
running round the house with their friends in excitement, oblivious of what
awaits them on their return. Wil they be told what I have done? Wil they be
questioned about me too – asked about al the cuddles, the bath-times, the
bedtimes, being tickled, the rough-and-tumble games we used to play? Wil
they be brainwashed into thinking I abused them? And in years to come, if we
ever get the chance to meet again as adults, wil they even want to see me?
Tiffin wil have vague memories of me, but Wila wil have known me for only
the first five years of her life – what, if any, memories, wil she retain?
Finaly, too weak to keep her from my thoughts any longer, I think of Maya.
Maya, Maya, Maya.
I choke her name into my hands, hoping that the sound of her name wil bring
me some comfort. I never, ever should have taken such a terrible risk with her
happiness. For her sake, for the children’s sakes, I should never have alowed
our relationship to develop. I cannot regret it for myself – there is nothing I
wouldn’t have endured just for the few months we had together. But I never
thought about the danger to her, the horror she would be forced to undergo.
I am terrified of what they might be doing to her right now – bombarding her
with questions she wil struggle to answer, torn between protecting me by
teling the truth and accusing me of rape to enable her to protect the children.
How could I have put her in such a position? How could I have asked her to
make such a choice?
The clash and crash of keys and metal locks jolts through my body, startling
me into confused, panicked consciousness. An officer orders me to get up,
informs me I’m being taken to the interview room. Before I can get my body
to respond I am seized by the arm and jolted to my feet. I pul away for a
moment, desperate to get my thoughts in order – al I need is a moment to
clear my head, remember what it is I have to say. This could be my only
chance and I have to get it right, al of it, make sure there isn’t the slightest
discrepancy between Maya’s story and my own.
I am cuffed once again and led down several long, brightly lit corridors. I
have no idea how long it’s been since I was shoved into the cel – time has
ceased to exist: there are no windows and I cannot tel what time of day or
night it is. I feel dizzy with pain and fear: one wrong word, one wrong move
and I could mess it al up, let something slip that would somehow implicate
Maya in this too.
Much like my cel, the interview room is harshly lit: bright, fluorescent light
turning the whole room an eerie yelow. It isn’t much bigger than the cel, but
now the stench of urine is replaced by sweat and stale air, the wals are bare
and the floor carpeted. The only furniture is a narrow table and three chairs.
Two officers are seated on the far side: a man and a woman. The man looks to
be in his early forties, with a narrow face and close-cropped hair. The
hardness behind the eyes, the grave expression, the set of the jaw al suggest
that he has seen this many times before, has been breaking criminals down for
years – he looks sharp and shrewd, and there is something tough and
intimidating about him. The woman, on the other hand, looks older and more
ordinary, with scraped-back hair and a world-weary expression, but her eyes
also have that sharp gaze. Both officers look as if they have been wel-trained
in the art of manipulating, threatening, cajoling or even lying to get what they
want from their suspects. Even in my confused, hazy state, I immediately
sense that they are good at what they do.
I am directed to the grey plastic chair placed opposite them, less than half a
metre away from the edge of the table and backed up against the wal behind
me. We may as wel al be in a cage together: the table is not very wide and it al
feels far too close for comfort. I am acutely aware of my clammy face, the
hair sticking to my forehead, the thin fabric of my T-shirt clinging to my skin,
the sweat patches visible on the material. I feel dirty and disgusting, the taste
of bile in my throat, sour blood in my mouth, and despite the officers’
impassive expressions, their revulsion is almost tangible in this smal,
enclosed space.
The man hasn’t looked up since I was brought in, but keeps scribbling away
in a file. When he does raise his eyes, I feel myself flinch and automaticaly
try to scrape my chair back, but it does not budge.
‘This interview is going to be recorded and videoed.’ Eyes like smal grey
pebbles bear into mine.
‘Do you have a problem with that?’
As if I have a choice. ‘No.’ I notice a discreet camera in the corner of the
room, trained on my face. Fresh sweat breaks out across my forehead.
The man flicks the switch of some kind of recording device and reads out a
case number, folowed by the date and time. He goes on to state, ‘Present is
myself, Detective Inspector Sutton. To my right, Detective Inspector Kaye.
Opposite us, the suspect. Would you identify yourself, please?’
Who exactly is he speaking to? Other police officers, truth-analysts, the judge
and jury? Wil this interview be played in court? Wil my own descriptions of
my heinous crime be played back to my family? Wil Maya be forced to listen
to me stutter and stumble my way through this interrogation and then be
asked to confirm whether I’ve been teling the truth?
Don’t think about that now, for chrissakes. Stop thinking about that now – the
only two things you should be focusing on right now are your demeanour and
your words. Everything that comes out of your mouth must be completely and
utterly convincing.
‘Lochan Whi—’ I clear my throat; my voice is weak and uneven. ‘Lochan
Whitely.’
The next few questions are the usual: date of birth? Nationality? Address?
Detective Sutton barely looks up, either jotting things down in his file or fastforwarding through my notes, his eyes flicking rapidly from side to side.
‘Do you know why you’re here?’ His eyes meet mine very suddenly, making
me start.
I nod. Then I swalow. ‘Yes.’
Pen poised, he continues to look at me, as if waiting for me to continue. ‘For
– for sexualy abusing my sister,’ I say, my voice strained but steady.
The words hang in the air like smal red puncture wounds. I feel the
atmosphere thicken, tighten.
Even though the interrogating officers have it al written down in front of
them, my actualy saying the words aloud, in the presence of both a video
camera and a voice recorder, makes it al suddenly unalterable. I barely feel as
if I’m lying any more. Perhaps there is no one universal truth. Consensual
incest to me, sexual abuse of a child family member to them. Perhaps both
labels are correct.
And then the questions begin.
At first it’s al background stuff. The tedious, endless minutiae: where I was
born, the members of my family, everyone’s dates of birth, the details
surrounding our father, my relationship with him, with my siblings, with my
mother. I stick to the truth as much as possible, even teling them about our
mother’s late shifts at the restaurant, her relationship with Dave. I am careful
to omit the parts that I hope Mum and Kit wil have the sense to gloss over
too: her drinking problem, the fights over money, the move to Dave’s house,
and finaly the almost total abandonment of her family. Instead, I tel them that
she has only recently started working late shifts and that I babysit in the
evenings, but only once the children are in bed. So far, so good. Not an ideal
family set-up, but one that just about fits within the bounds of normality. And
then, after they have been given every little detail, from the number of rooms
in our house to our respective schools, our grades and extra-curricular
activities, the question is finaly asked:
‘When was the first time you had any kind of sexual contact with Maya?’ The
officer’s gaze is direct and his voice as expressionless as before, but he
suddenly seems to be watching me carefuly, waiting for the slightest shift in
my expression.
Silence thickens the air, draining it of oxygen, and I am aware of the sound of
my own rapid breathing, my lungs automaticaly crying out for more air. I’m
aware too of the sweat running down the sides of my face and certain he can
see the fear in my eyes. I am exhausted and in pain and desperate for the toilet
again, but clearly the interview has a long time yet to run.
‘When – when you say sexual contact, do you mean like – like feelings, or
when we first – I mean, I first t-touched her, or—?’
‘The first time you had any inappropriate exposure or contact.’ His voice has
hardened, his jaw tightened and the words shoot out of his mouth like smal
bulets.
Fighting my way through the fog and panic, I try to come up with the correct
answer. It is vital I get al this right so it wil match up exactly with Maya’s
account. Sexual contact – but what exactly does that mean? That first kiss the
night of her date? Or before that, when we were dancing?
‘Would you answer the question!’ The temperature is rising. He thinks I’m
staling in order to try to exonerate myself, when in reality it’s the opposite.
‘I – I’m not sure of the exact date. It m-must have been November sometime.
Y-yes, November—’ Or was it October? Oh God, I am messing this al up
already.
‘Tel me what happened.’
‘OK. She – she came home from a date with a guy from school. We – we got
into an argument because I was giving her the third degree. I was worried – I
mean, angry – I wanted to know if she’d slept with him. I got upset—’
‘What do you mean by upset?’
No. Please.
‘I started—I began to cry . . .’ Like I’m going to do now, just at the memory
of the pain I felt on that night. Turning my head towards the wal, I bite down
hard, but the pain of my teeth cutting into my tongue doesn’t work any longer.
No amount of physical pain can cover up the mental agony. Five minutes into
the interrogation and already I’m faling apart. It’s hopeless, everything’s
hopeless, I’m hopeless, I’m going to fail Maya, fail them al.
‘Then what happened?’
I try every trick in the book to keep the tears at bay, but nothing works. The
pressure mounts, and I see from Sutton’s expression that he thinks I am
staling for time, pretending to feel remorse, lying.
‘Then what happened?’ This time, his voice is raised.
I flinch. ‘I said to her – I tried to – I said she had to – I forced her to—’
I can’t get the words out, even though I’m desperate to, wishing I could
scream them from the rooftops. It’s like being forced up in front of the class
again, the words clogging up my throat, my face burning with shame. Except
this time I’m not being asked to read out an essay, I’m being interrogated
about the most intimate and personal details of my life, al those tender
moments spent with Maya, al those precious times that have made the last
three months the happiest I’ve ever known. Yet now they are being smeared
across our family like the faeces in the cel – putrid, foul, horrific abuse,
myself as perpetrator, forcing my younger sister into revolting sexual acts
against her wil.
‘Lochan, I strongly suggest you stop wasting our time and start to co-operate.
As I’m sure you’re aware, in the UK, the maximum sentence for rape is life
imprisonment. Now, if you co-operate and show remorse for what you’ve
done, that sentence wil almost certainly be reduced, perhaps even to as little
as seven years. But if you lie or try to deny anything, we wil find out anyway
and a judge wil be far less lenient.’
Again I try to answer, again I fail. I see myself through their eyes – the sick,
screwed-up, pathetic sex addict, reduced to abusing a younger sister he once
played with, his own flesh and blood.
‘Lochan . . .’ The female detective is leaning towards me, clasped hands
stretched out across the table. ‘I can see you feel bad about what happened.
And that’s good. It means you’re beginning to take responsibility for your
actions. Perhaps you didn’t realy believe that having a sexual relationship
with your sister would harm her, perhaps you never meant it when you
threatened to kil her, but you need to tell us exactly what happened, exactly
what you did, what you said. If you try to gloss over things or leave things out
or stal or lie, then things are going to get much, much worse for you.’
Taking a deep breath, I nod, trying hard to show them that I’m wiling to cooperate, that they don’t have to keep up this Good Cop, Bad Cop charade in
order for me to confess. Al I need is the strength to pul myself together, hold
back the tears and find the right words to describe al the things I forced Maya
to do to me, al the things I forced her to endure.
‘Lochan, do you have a nickname?’
Detective Kaye is stil doing her paly stuff, where she pretends to comfort and
befriend me in the hope that I wil trust her enough to relax, calm down,
believe she is trying to actualy help rather than to extract a confession.
‘Loch—’ I blurt. ‘Lochie—’ No, oh no. Only my family cal me that. Only my
family!
‘Lochie, listen to me now. If you co-operate with us today, if you tel us
everything that happened, it wil make a big difference to the outcome of al
this. We’re al human. We al make mistakes, right?
You’re only eighteen, I’m sure you didn’t realize the severity of what you
were doing, and a judge wil take that into consideration.’
Yeah, right. How stupid do you think I am? I’m eighteen and I’ll be tried as
an adult. Save your manipulating lies for the ones who are really trying to
conceal their actions.
I nod and dry my eyes on my sleeve. Tearing at my hair with cuffed hands
raised above my head, I begin to talk.
The lies are the easy part – forcing Maya to stay off school, getting into bed
with her every night, repeating the same threat, again and again, whenever she
begged me to leave her alone. It’s when I have to tel them the truth that I
flounder – it’s our truth, our innermost secrets, our most intimate times, the
precious little details of our brief, idylic moments together. Those are the
parts that make me stammer and shake. But I force myself to continue, even
when I can’t hold back the tears any longer, even when they start spiling
down my cheeks and my voice starts to shake with repressed sobs, even when
I feel their looks of revulsion merge with ones of pity.
They want to know every little detail. The time on the bed, our first night
together. What I did, what she did, what I said, what she said. How I felt . . .
How I responded . . . How my body responded . . . I tel them the truth, and
someone reaches into my chest and slowly starts splitting me apart. When we
finaly reach this morning’s events, when it comes to what they refer to as
‘penetration’, I want to die to stop the pain. They ask me if I used protection,
they ask me if Maya cried out, they ask me how long it lasted . . . It hurts so
much, feels so utterly humiliating, so completely degrading, that I feel sick.
The interrogation seems to go on for hours. It feels like the middle of the
night and we have been shut up in this tiny, airless room for al eternity. They
take turns popping out for coffee or snacks. They offer me water, which I
decline. Eventualy I am so wrung out that al I can do is suck on my middle
two fingers like I used to as a smal child and slump sideways against the wal,
my voice completely hoarse, face sticky with congealed sweat and tears.
Through a thick haze, I hear them inform me that I wil be escorted back to my
cel and that the interview wil continue tomorrow.
The tape is switched off, another officer comes to colect me, but for a few
moments I can’t even get to my feet. Detective Sutton – who, for the most
part, has remained cold and impassive – sighs and shakes his head with a look
bordering on pity. ‘You know, Lochan, I’ve been in this job for years and I
can tel that you’re feeling remorse for what you’ve done. But I’m afraid it’s al
rather too late.
Not only are you charged with committing a very serious crime, but your
threats appear to have left your sister so terrified, she has signed a statement
swearing that your sexual relationship together was fuly consensual and
instigated by her.’
Al the air exits my body. My exhaustion evaporates. Suddenly only the
thudding of my horrified heartbeat fils the air. She told them the truth? She
told them the truth?
‘A signed statement – but that’s void now, right? Now that I’ve admitted
everything, told you exactly what happened. You know she only said those
things because I told her to, because I said I’d have her kiled if I ended up in
prison. So no one believes her, do they? Not now I’ve confessed!’ My
cracked, dried-up voice is shaking hard, but I must stay calm. Showing
remorse is one thing, but I have to somehow disguise the extent of my horror
and disbelief.
‘That’l depend on how the judge sees it.’
‘The judge?’ I’m shouting now, my voice verging on hysteria. ‘But Maya’s
not the one being accused of rape!’
‘No, but even consensual incest is against the law. Under Section Sixty-five
of the Sexual Offences Act, your sister could be tried for “consent to being
penetrated by an adult relative”, which carries a sentence of up to two years in
prison.’
I stare at him. Speechless. Stunned. It cannot be. It cannot be.
The detective sighs and tosses the file back onto the table in a sudden gesture
of weariness. ‘So unless she retracts her statement, your sister now faces
arrest too.’
Why? Maya, my love? Why, why, why?
Colapsed on the floor, half propped up against the metal door, I stare blindly
at the opposite wal.
My whole body hurts from lying completely motionless for what must be
several hours now. I no longer have the strength to continue banging my head
back against the door in a desperate, frenzied attempt to think of a way of
somehow getting Maya to retract her statement. After shouting over and over,
pleading with the guards to let me cal home, I eventualy lose my voice
completely. Maya and I wil never be alowed to contact each other again – at
least not until I’ve served out my sentence which, according to that
interrogation officer, could be over a decade from now!
My mind is faling apart and I can barely think, but as far as I understand it,
the fact is that unless Maya retracts her statement, she wil be arrested just as I
was, possibly even in front of Tiffin and Wila. With no one to look after them,
no one to cover for our mother’s drinking and neglect, al three children wil
doubtlessly be taken into care. And Maya wil be brought to the police station,
subjected to the same humiliations, the same interrogations, and accused, just
as I was, of committing a sexual crime. Even with my word against hers, there
wil be little I can do. If I continue to insist I am the abuser, they wil
immediately question why I am suddenly so desperate to absolve Maya of al
wrongdoing – especialy after having both repeatedly abused and threatened to
kil her should she tel anyone. I wil be cornered, powerless to protect her, for
the more I insist that Maya is innocent and I am the guilty one, the more
likely they wil be to believe Maya’s confession. It won’t take them long to
figure out that I’m taking the blame to protect her, that I’m lying because I
love her and that I would never abuse, threaten or harm her in any way. And
of course there’s Kit – the only real witness. Even Tiffin and Wila, if they are
questioned, wil insist that never once did Maya ever appear afraid of me –
that she was always smiling at me, laughing with me, touching my hand, even
hugging me. And so they wil realize that Maya is as complicit in this crime as
I am.
Whatever I try to do now is hopeless, especialy as any attempts to catch Maya
out wil fail as she wil be the one teling the truth. She’l easily be able to
explain away the blow to her lip as my last, desperate attempt to make it look
as if I was abusing her.
Maya wil be brought to court and sentenced to two years in prison. She wil
start off her adult life behind bars, separated not only from me, but from Kit,
Tiffin and Wila, who love her so much. Even after serving out her prison
sentence, she wil emerge emotionaly scarred, and stuck with a criminal record
for the rest of her life. Denied al access to her other siblings for her crime, she
wil find herself utterly alone in the world, ostracized by her friends, while I
remain locked up, serving out a considerably longer sentence because I’l have
been tried as an adult. The thought of al this is, quite simply, more than I can
bear. And I know that, unless I can somehow get through to her, the stubborn,
passionate Maya who loves me so much wil not capitulate. She has made her
choice. How I wish I could tel her I would rather be locked away for life than
put her through any of that . . .
No use sitting here faling apart. None of this can happen. I will not let it. Yet
despite thinking and thinking for hours on end, lashing out sporadicaly
against the cold concrete around me in utter frustration, I cannot come up
with any way to get Maya to change her mind.
I’m beginning to realize that nothing wil make Maya retract her statement and
accuse me of rape.
She’l have had time now to realize that, by doing so, she wil send me to
prison. If I’d run, as she initialy suggested, if by some miracle I’d managed to
avoid getting caught, she would have lied in a heartbeat for the sake of the
children. But knowing that I am sitting here, locked in a prison cel, the rest of
my life dependent on her accusation or confession, she wil never capitulate. I
realize this now with earth-shattering certainty. She loves me too much. She
loves me too much. I so wanted her love, al of it. I got my wish . . . and now
we are both paying the price. How stupid I was to ever ask her to do this, I
realize, to expect her to sacrifice my freedom for hers. My happiness meant
everything to her, as much as hers did to me. Had the situation been reversed,
would I have even considered falsely accusing Maya in order to avoid a
punishment of my own?
Yet stil the regret gnaws away at me. If I’d run when I had the chance, if I’d
left and somehow escaped arrest, Maya would not have confessed. Nothing
would have been gained by teling the truth, it would have only hurt the
children. She would have never confessed if I hadn’t been caught . . .
My gaze travels slowly up the wal to the smal window in the corner, just
below the ceiling. And suddenly the answer is right there in front of me. If I
want Maya to retract her confession, then I must not be here to receive a
sentence, I must not be trapped in a cel facing jail time. I must leave.
Unpicking the threads of the sheet sewn onto the mattress soon causes my
hands to stiffen and my fingers to go numb. I keep track of the time between
guard checks, counting rhythmicaly to myself beneath my breath as I carefuly,
methodicaly, sever the seams. Whoever designed these cels has done a good
job of ensuring their security. The smal window is so high off the ground it
would require a three-metre ladder to reach it. It is also barred, of course, but
the bars stick out at the top.
With an accurate throw, I feel confident that I can lasso a loop over the spiked
bars so that the knotted strips of torn sheet hang down just low enough for me
to reach, like those ropes we used to climb in PE. I was good at that, I
remember, always the first to the top. If I can achieve a similar result this
time, I wil reach the window, that smal patch of sunlight, my gateway to
freedom. It’s a crazy plan, I know. A desperate one. But I am desperate. There
are no options left. I have to go. I have to disappear.
The bars covering the glass show signs of rust and don’t look that strong. So
long as they don’t break before I actualy reach the window, this could work.
Six hundred and twenty-three counts since the last steps were heard outside
my cel door. Once I am ready, I’l have ten minutes or so to pul this off. I’ve
read about people managing to do this before
– it doesn’t just happen on cop shows. It is possible. It has to be.
After finaly working my way round the entire edge of the plastic sheet, I give
it a smal tug and feel it shift under me, no longer attached to the mattress
beneath. Positioning it in front of me, I use my teeth to make the first tear and
begin to rip, bit by bit. By my rough calculations, three strips of sheet tied
together should be just about long enough. The material is tough and my
hands are aching, but I can’t risk just yanking at the sheet for fear of the
sound of tearing being overheard. My nails are torn, my fingertips a bleeding
mess by the time the material is separated into three equal pieces. But now al
I have to do is wait for the guard to pass.
The footsteps begin to approach, and suddenly I am shaking. Shaking so hard
I can hardly think. I can’t go through with it. I’m too much of a coward, too
damn scared. My plan is ridiculous – I am going to get caught, I am going to
fail. The bars look too loose. What if they break before I reach the window?
The footsteps begin to recede and I immediately start tying the strips together.
The knots have to be tight, realy tight – enough to take my ful weight. Sweat
pours off me, running into my eyes, blurring my vision. I have to hurry, hurry,
hurry, but my hands won’t stop shaking. My body screams at me to stop, back
down. My mind forces me to keep going. I have never been this afraid.
I miss. I keep missing. Despite the weight of the plastic material and the
heavy knotted loop at the end, I cannot get it to catch on one of the spikes. I
made the loop too smal. I overestimated my ability to hit a target while
panicking with unsteady hands. Finaly, in mad desperation, I hurl it right up
to the ceiling and, to my astonishment, the loop comes down to catch on a
single outer spike, the knotted strips of sheet hanging down against the wal
like a thick rope. I stare at it for a moment in total shock: it’s there, waiting to
be climbed, my path to freedom. Heart pounding, I reach up to grasp the
material as high as I can. Puling myself up with my arms, I raise my legs,
draw up my knees, cross my ankles to trap the material between my feet and
begin to climb.
Reaching the top takes far longer than I’d anticipated. My palms are sweaty,
my fingers weak from al the unpicking and tearing, and unlike school
climbing ropes, the strips of sheet have almost no grip. As soon as I reach the
top, I hook my arms round the bars, my feet scrabbling for a foothold against
the bumpy, chipped wal. The toe of my shoe finds a smal protrusion, and
thanks to the grip of my trainers, I am able to cling on. Now for the moment
of truth. Have the bars been loosened by my climb? Wil a final, violent
downward pul cause them to break away from the wal?
I haven’t time to inspect the rust around the fastenings now. Like a rock
climber on a cliff’s edge, I cling to the bars with my hands and to the wal with
my feet, every muscle in my body straining against the pul of gravity. If they
catch me now, it’s al over. But stil I hesitate. Wil the bars break? Will they
break? For one brief moment I feel the golden light of the dying sun touch my
face through the dirty window. Beyond it lies freedom. Shut up in this airless
box, I am able to catch a glimpse of the outdoors, the wind shaking the green
trees in the distance. The thick glass is like an invisible wal, sealing me off
from everything that is real and alive and necessary. At what point do you
give up –
decide enough is enough? There is only one answer realy. Never.
The time has come: if I fail, they wil hear me and either keep me under
surveilance or transfer me to a more secure cel, so I’m acutely aware that this
is my one and only chance. A terrified sob threatens to escape me. I’m losing
it – someone wil hear. But I don’t want to do this. I’m so afraid.
So very afraid.
With my left arm stil hooked over the bars, taking almost the ful weight of my
body – metal cutting into flesh, digging into bone – I release one hand to
reach for the sheet hanging down below me. And then I realize this is it. The
guard wil be back down the corridor any minute now. I have no excuses any
more. It’s time for me to set us al free. Despite the terror, the blinding white
terror, I slip a second loop over my head. Tighten the noose. A harsh sob
breaks the stil air. And then I let go.
Wila’s big blue eyes, Wila’s dimpled-cheeked smile. Tiffin’s shaggy blond
mane, Tiffin’s cheeky grin. Kit’s yels of excitement, Kit’s glow of pride.
Maya’s face, Maya’s kisses, Maya’s love.
Maya, Maya, Maya . . .
EPILOGUE
Maya
I stare at myself in the mirror on my bedroom wal. I can see myself clearly,
but it’s as if I’m not actualy there. The reflection thrown back at me is that of
another, an impersonator, a stranger. One who looks like me, yet appears so
normal, so solid, so alive. My hair is neatly fastened back, but my face looks
alarmingly familiar, my eyes are the same – wide, blue. My expression is
impassive – calm, colected, almost serene. I look so shockingly ordinary, so
devastatingly normal. Only my ashen skin, the deep shadows beneath my
eyes, betray the sleepless nights, the hours and hours of darkness spent staring
up at a familiar ceiling, my bed a cold tomb in which I now lie alone. The
tranquilizers have long been binned, the threat of hospitalization dropped now
that I’m managing to eat and drink again, now that I’ve regained my voice,
found a way of making my muscles contract then relax in order to be able to
move, stand, function. Things are almost back to normal: Mum has stopped
trying to force-feed me, Dave has stopped covering for her to the authorities,
and both have drifted back across town together after restoring some kind of
order in the house and putting on a convincing show for Social Services. I
have returned to the familiar role of care-provider, except that nothing is
familiar to me any more, least of al myself.
A basic routine has resumed: getting up, showering, dressing, shopping,
cooking, cleaning the house, trying to keep Tiffin and Wila and even Kit as
busy as possible. They cling to me like limpets –
most nights al four of us end up together in what used to be our mother’s bed.
Even Kit has regressed to a frightened child, although his valiant efforts to
help and support me make my heart ache. As we huddle together beneath the
duvet in the big double bed, sometimes they want to talk; mostly they want to
cry and I comfort them as best I can, even though I know nothing can ever be
enough, no words can ever make up for what happened, for what I put them
through.
During the day there is so much to do: speak to their teachers about returning
to school, go to our sessions with the counselor, check in with the social
worker, make sure they are clean, fed and healthy . . . I am forced to keep a
checklist, remind myself what I’m supposed to be doing at each point during
the day – when to get up, when to have meals, when to start bedtime . . . I
have to break down each chore into little steps, otherwise I find myself
standing in the middle of the kitchen with a saucepan in one hand, completely
overwhelmed, lost, with no idea why I’m standing there or what I’m supposed
to do next. I start sentences I cannot finish, ask Kit to do me a favour and then
forget what it was. He tries to help me, tries to take over and do everything,
but then I worry that he is doing too much, that he too wil have some sort of
breakdown, and so I beg him to stop. But at the same time I realize he needs
to keep busy and feel he is helping and that I need him to.
Since the day it happened, the day the news came, every minute has been
agony in its simplest, strongest form, like forcing my hand into a furnace and
counting down the seconds knowing they wil never end, wondering how I can
possibly endure another one, and then another after that, astonished that
despite the torture I keep breathing, I keep moving, even though I know by
doing so the pain wil never go away. But I kept my hand in life’s furnace for a
single reason only – the children. I covered for our mother, I lied for our
mother, I even told the children exactly what to say before Social Services
arrived – but that was when I stil had the arrogance, the ridiculous, shameful
arrogance to believe that they would stil be better off with me than taken
away and placed in care.
Now I know different. Even though I have slowly reestablished some sort of
routine, some semblance of calm, I have turned into a robot and can barely
look after myself, let alone three traumatized children. They deserve a proper
home with a proper family who wil keep them together and be able to counsel
and support them. They deserve to start afresh – embark on a new life where
the people who care for them folow society’s norms, where loved ones don’t
leave, or fal apart, or die. They deserve so much better. No doubt they always
have.
I do honestly believe al this now. It took me a few days to convince myself
fuly, but eventualy I realized that I had no choice: there was actualy no
decision to make, no option but to accept the facts. I do not have the strength
to continue like this, I cannot go on another day: the only way to cope with
such crushing guilt is to convince myself that, for their own sakes, the
children wil be better off elsewhere. I wil not alow myself to think that I too
am abandoning them.
My reflection hasn’t changed. I’m not sure how long I’ve been standing here,
but I’m aware that some time has passed because I am starting to feel very
cold again. This is a familiar sign that I have ground to a halt, come to the end
of the current step and forgotten how to make the transition to the next. But
maybe this time my delay is deliberate. The next step wil be the hardest of al.
The dress I bought for the occasion is actualy quite pretty without being too
formal. The navy jacket makes it look suitably smart. Blue because it is
Lochan’s favourite colour. Was Lochan’s favourite colour. I bite my lip and
blood wels up on the surface. Crying is apparently good for the children –
someone told me that, I don’t remember who – but I’ve learned that for me, as
with everything I do now, there is no point to it. Nothing can relieve the pain.
Not crying, laughing, screaming, begging. Nothing can change the past.
Nothing can bring him back. The dead remain dead.
Lochan would have laughed at my clothes. He never saw me so poshly
dressed. He would have joked I looked like a city banker. But then he would
have stopped laughing and told me that actualy I looked beautiful. He would
have chuckled at the sight of Kit in such a smart suit, suddenly seeming so
much older than his thirteen years. He would have teased us for buying Tiffin
a suit too, but would have liked the brightly coloured footbal tie, Tiffin’s own
personal touch. He would have struggled to laugh at Wila’s choice of outfit
though. I think the sight of her in her treasured violet ‘princess dress’
that we got her for Christmas would have brought him close to tears.
It has taken so long – nearly a month because of the autopsy, the inquest and
al the rest – but finaly the time has come. Our mother decided not to attend,
so it wil just be the four of us in the pretty church up on Milwood Hil – its
cool, shady interior empty, echoey and quiet. Just the four of us and the
coffin. Reverend Dawes wil think Lochan Whitely had no friends, but he’l be
wrong – he had me, he had al of us . . . He wil think Lochan wasn’t loved, but
he was, more deeply than most people are in a lifetime . . .
After the short service we wil return home and comfort each other. After a
while I wil go upstairs and write the letters – one to each of them, explaining
why, teling them how much I love them, that I’m so, so very sorry.
Reassuring them that they wil be wel looked after by another family, trying to
convince them, as I did myself, that they wil be much better off without me,
much better off starting over. Then the rest wil be easy, selfish but easy – it
has been carefuly planned for over a week now.
Obviously I can’t possibly remain in the house for the children to find, so I
wil go to my refuge in Ashmoore Park, the place I caled Paradise, which I
once shared with Lochan. Except this time I shal not return.
The kitchen knife I’ve been keeping beneath the stack of papers in my desk
drawer wil be hidden beneath my coat. I wil lie down on the damp grass, stare
up at the star-studded sky and then raise the knife. I know exactly what to do
so that it wil be over quickly, so quickly – the same way I hope it was for
Lochan. Lochie. The boy I once loved. The boy I stil love. The boy I wil
continue to love, even when my part in this world is over too. He sacrificed
his life to spare me a prison sentence.
He thought I could look after the children. He thought I was the strong one –
strong enough to go on without him. He thought he knew me. But he was
wrong.
Wila bursts into the room, making me start. Kit has brushed her long, golden
hair, wiped her face and hands clean after breakfast. Her baby face is stil so
sweet and trusting, it pains me to look at her.
I wonder whether, when she is my age, she wil stil look like me. I hope
someone wil show her a picture. I hope someone wil let her know how much
she was loved – by Lochan, by me – even though she won’t be able to
remember it for herself. Out of the three of them, she is the most likely to
make a ful recovery, the most likely to forget, and I hope she does. Perhaps, if
they alow her to keep at least one photo, some part of it wil jog her memory.
Perhaps she wil remember a game we used to play or the funny voices I used
to do for the different characters in her books at bedtime.
She hesitates in the doorway, unsure whether to advance or retreat, clearly
desperate to tel me something but afraid to do so.
‘What is it, my darling? You look so beautiful in your dress. Are you ready to
go?’
She stares at me, unblinking, as if trying to gauge my reaction, then slowly
shakes her head, her big eyes filing with tears.
I kneel down and hold out my arms and she launches herself into them, her
smal hands pressed against her eyes.
‘I d-don’t want to – I don’t want to go! I don’t! I don’t want to go say
goodbye to Lochie!’
I pul her close, her smal body sobbing softly against mine, and kiss her wet
cheek, stroke her hair, rock her back and forth against me.
‘I know you don’t, Wila. I don’t want to either. None of us do. But we need
to, we need to say goodbye. It doesn’t mean we can’t visit his grave in the
churchyard, it doesn’t mean we can’t stil think about him and talk about him
whenever we want.’
‘But I don’t want to go, Maya!’she cries, her sobbing voice almost pleading.
‘I’m not going to say goodbye, I don’t want him to go! I don’t, I don’t, I
don’t!’ She starts to struggle against me, trying to pul away, desperate to
escape the ordeal, the finality of it al.
I wrap my arms tightly around her and attempt to hold her stil. ‘Wila, listen to
me, listen to me.
Lochie wants you to come and say goodbye to him. He realy wants that a lot.
He loves you so much
– you know that. You’re his favourite little girl in the whole world. He knows
you’re very sad and very angry right now, but he realy hopes one day you
won’t feel so bad any more.’
Her struggles become more half-hearted, her body weakening as her tears
increase.
‘W-what else does he want?’
Franticaly I try to come up with something. For you to someday find a way to
forgive him. For you to forget the pain he caused you even if it means you
have to forget him. For you to go on to live a life of unimaginable joy . . .
‘Wel – he always loved your drawings, remember? I’m sure he’d realy like it
if you made him something. Maybe a card with a special picture. You could
write a message inside if you want to – or otherwise just your name. We’l
cover it in special transparent plastic, so that even if it rains, it won’t get wet.
And then you could take it to him when you go and visit his grave.’
‘But if he’s asleep for ever and ever, how wil he even know it’s there? How
wil he even see it?’
Taking a deep breath, I close my eyes. ‘I don’t know, Wila. I honestly don’t
know. But he might
– he might see it, he might know. So, just in case he does—’
‘O-OK.’ She draws back slightly, her face stil pink and tear-stained, but with a
tiny glimmer of hope in her eyes. ‘I think he wil see it, Maya,’she tels me, as
if begging me to agree. ‘I think he wil.
Don’t you?’
I nod slowly, biting down hard. ‘I think he wil too.’
Wila gives a smal gulp and a sniff, but I can tel her mind is already on the
work of art she is going to create. She leaves my arms and moves off towards
the door but then, as if suddenly remembering something, turns back.
‘So what about you then?’
I feel myself tense. ‘What d’you mean?’
‘What about you?’she repeats. ‘What are you going to give him?’
‘Oh – maybe some flowers or something. I’m not artistic like you. I don’t
think he’d want one of my drawings.’
Wila gives me a long look. ‘I don’t think Lochie would want you to give him
flowers. I think he’d want you to do something special-er.’
Turning away from her abruptly, I walk over to the window and peer up at the
cloudless sky, pretending to check for rain. ‘Tel you what – why don’t you go
and start making the card? I’l be down in a minute and then we can al set off
together. And remember, on the way home we’re going to have cakes at—’
‘That’s not fair!’ Wila shouts suddenly. ‘Lochie loves you! He wants you to
do something for him too!’
She runs out of the room and I hear the familiar sound of her feet thudding
down the stairs.
Anxiously I folow her to the end of the corridor, but when I hear her ask Kit
to help her find the felt-tips, I relax.
I return to my room. Back to the mirror I can’t seem to leave. If I keep
looking at myself, I can persuade myself I’m stil here, at least for today. I
have to be here today, for the children, for Lochie. I have to turn off the
mechanical switch just for these next few hours. I have to let myself feel, just
for now, just for the funeral. But now that my mind is thawing, coming back
to life, the pain begins to rise again, and Wila’s words won’t leave me alone.
Why did she get so angry? Does she somehow sense that I’ve given up? Does
she think that because Lochie’s gone, I no longer care what he might have
wanted from us, for us?
I suddenly grip the sides of the mirror for support. I am on dangerous ground
– this is a train of thought I cannot afford to folow. Wila loved Lochan as
much as I did, yet she is not hiding behind an anaesthetic; she is hurting as
much as I am, yet she is finding ways to cope, even though she’s only five.
Right now she isn’t thinking about herself and her own grief, but about
Lochie, about what she can do for him. The least I can do is ask myself the
same question: if Lochie could see me now, what would he be asking for?
But of course I know the answer already. I’ve known the answer al along.
Which is why I’ve carefuly avoided thinking about it until now . . . I watch
the eyes of the girl in the mirror fil with tears.
No, Lochie, I tel him desperately. No! Please, please. You can’t ask me for
that, you can’t. I can’t do it, not without you. It’s too hard. It’s too hard. It’s
too painful! I loved you too much!
Can a person as kind as Lochie ever be loved too much? Was our love realy
destined to cause so much unhappiness, so much destruction and despair? In
the end, was it wrong after al? If I am stil here, doesn’t that mean I have the
chance to keep our love alive? Doesn’t that mean I stil have the opportunity to
make something good come out of al this rather than unending tragedy?
He gave up his life to rescue mine, to rescue the children. That was what he
wanted, that was his choice, that was the price he was wiling to pay for me to
continue living, for me to have a life worth living. If I die too, his ultimate
sacrifice wil have been in vain.
I sway forward so that my forehead presses against the cold glass. I close my
eyes and start to cry, silent tears tracking down my cheeks. Lochie, I can go to
prison for you, I can die for you.
But the one thing I know you want, I can’t do. I can’t go on living for you.
‘Maya, we need to leave. We’re going to be late!’ Kit’s voice cals up from the
hal. They’re al waiting, waiting to say goodbye, to take the first step towards
letting go. If I am to live, I wil have to start letting go too. Let go of Lochie.
How can I possibly ever do that?
I look at my face one more time. I look into the eyes Lochie used to cal as
blue as the ocean. Just a few moments ago I told myself that he never realy
knew me if he thought, even for a second, that I could survive without him.
But what if I’m the one who is wrong? Lochie died to save us, to save the
family, to save me. He wouldn’t have done that if he’d thought, even for a
moment, that I wasn’t strong enough to go on without him. Perhaps, just
perhaps, at the end of the day, he is right and I am wrong. Perhaps I never
knew myself as wel as he knew me.
I walk slowly towards my desk and pul open the drawer. I slide my hand
under the piles of paper and close my fingers around the knife’s handle. I pick
it up, its sharp edge glinting in the sun. I hold it under my jacket and go
downstairs. In the kitchen, I open the cutlery drawer and place it right at the
very back, out of sight. Then I push the drawer firmly closed.
A violent sob escapes me. As I press the back of my wrist against my mouth,
my lips meet the cool silver. Lochan’s present to me. Now it’s my turn.
Closing my eyes against the tears, I take a long, deep breath and whisper,
‘OK, I’l try. That’s al I can promise you right now, Lochie, but I’l try.’
As we leave the house, everyone is fussing and squabbling. Wila has lost her
butterfly clip, Tiffin claims his tie is choking him, Kit complains that Wila’s
moaning wil make us al late . . . We file out through the broken gate and onto
the street, al dressed up in the smartest clothes we have ever owned. Wila and
Tiffin both want to hold my hand. Kit hangs back. I suggest he takes Wila’s so
that we can swing her between us. He obliges, and as we launch her high into
the air, the wind whips back her long dress, revealing a pair of bright pink
knickers. As she clamours for us to do it again, Kit’s eyes meet mine with an
amused smile.
We walk down the middle of the road holding hands, the pavement far too
narrow for al four of us together. A warm breeze brushes across our faces,
carrying the smel of honeysuckle from a front garden. The midday sun beams
down from a bright blue sky, the light shimmering between the leaves,
scattering us with golden confetti.
‘Hey!’ Tiffin exclaims, his voice ringing with surprise. ‘It’s nearly summer!’
The End.
